
Beth Shapiro, Executive Director of Citymeals-on-Wheels and Anne E. Cohen, Co-President
Scooter, ASPCA Cat of the Year. Scooter now visits a nursing home and rehabilitation hospital every week and serves as a constant inspiration to the elderly and to patients who lack mobility due to injuries and strokes. During one of Scooter’s first hospital visits, a stroke victim who doctors said would never open her eyes or speak watched as the cat snuggled up close to her. It was then that Scooter had worked his first miracle: the patient opened her eyes and began chatting away like they were old friends.
Walter Bobbie, Judy Kaye, and Ted Chapin
Audra Boltion and Regina Brooks
Arlene Shuler, Raymond Lamontagne, with Stephanie and Fred Shuman
Liz McCreery and Greta Shugrue
Jan and Ann Sussman
House of Flowers Centerpiece
The packed house at the Plaza for Citymeals-on-Wheels 26th Annual “Power Lunch for Women."
Sarah Uriarte Berry, Rebecca Luker, and Debbie Gravitte
Jill Rappaport, ASPCA Presidential Service Award for Media Excellence.
Esther Fuchs, Wendy Dietze, and Alexandra Lebenthal
Lara Spencer and Sandra Lee
Allison Bandier Koffman and Patty Crawford
Pumpkins carved in the likeness of Dennis and Randi Riese, honorees at Citymeals-on-Wheels 26th Annual “Power Lunch for Women.
Lillian Vernon and Vicky L. McLoughlin
Karen Klopp and Sara Ayers
Joel Grey
Jamee Gregory
Anne E. Cohen and Lara Spencer
Tricia Napor and Ann Froman
Andrea Fahnestock, Frances Scaife, and Mark Gilbertson
Caroline Dean and Mark Gilbertson
Paula Zahn, Bette Midler, and Donna Hanover
Fiorello Centerpiece
Gala Curtain Call - Debbie Gravitte, Rebecca Luker, Joel Grey, Kelli O'Hara, Raul Esparza, Victoria Clark, and Walter Bobbie
Declan Gregg, ASPCA “Tommy P. Monahan” Kid of the Year, with Fiona and Scooter.
Pumpkin carved in the likeness of Paula Zahn.
Dave Granville, Jeff Pfeifle, Sally Spooner, and Alex Jakowec
Maribel Lieberman
Chicago Centerpiece
Bill Fischer and his daughter, Stacy Fischer-Rosenthal
Photographs by Stephanie Berger (City Center).
Svetlana and Herbert Wachtell
Chef and restaurateur, Ed Brown.  The bidding for his live-auction item of a personally-prepared 7-course dinner for 8 in the winner’s own home started at $10,000 and, in the enthusiastic bidding, quickly escalated to two $20,000-dinners for 10 with a private performance by the legendary singer and songwriter Roberta Flack, one of the luncheon’s guests.
Brian Stokes Mitchell, Adrienne Arsht, Raul Esparza, Michele Esparza, Derrick Baskin, Allyson Tucker, and Daniel J. Watts
Victoria Clark
Gael Greene in 1961 promoting her first book, Don’t Come Back Without It.  The writer worked at New York magazine for 40 years, first as its “Insatiable Critic” and then as a columnist.  She went to great lengths to hide her identity from restaurant owners, including wearing a hat to cover her eyes in public appearances and photographs.
Georgina Bloomberg and John Talley
Gael Greene, restaurant critic and author, co-founded Citymeals-on-Wheels in 1981with James Beard after she read an article in The New York Times about homebound elderly in New York who had nothing to eat on holidays and weekends.  The writer of that article, Dorothy Gaiter, also received special recognition at this year’s Power Lunch.  To date, Citymeals has delivered 46 million free meals to shut-in seniors.
Diana Taylor and Elizabeth Halliday
Michele Oka Doner
Sue Chalom
Mark Stempel, Abby Spielman, and Charlotte and Gary Trimarchi
Philanthropic husband and wife duo, Dennis and Randi Riese, honorees at this year’s Power Lunch, have provided 500,000 meals by Gael Greene’s estimate, through their long and generous support of Citymeals.
A special performance was given by award-winning actress and singer Audra McDonald, who sang a beautiful rendition of “Make Someone Happy.”
Margo MacNabb Nederlander, Linda Lambert, and Mia McDonald
Stephanie Shuman, Fred Shuman, and Cathie Black
Alexandra Hack and Amanda Espy
Lauren Vernon
Pamela Morgan, Francine Farkas, and Gerogette Farkas
Cindy Barshop
Victoria Clark, Linda Viertel, Jack Viertel, and Marc Bruni
Tren'ness Woods-Black and Roberta Flack
Felicia Taylor and Elaine Langone
Craig Pfeiffer, one of the $10,000 men and Reva Wurtzburger
John Reilly, John Zerafa, Elizabeth Brandler, Fiona, Declan Gregg, Scooter, Jill Rappaport, and Laura Ingalls
Restaurateur, Ed Brown, one of the $10,000 men
Michael Lynne, one of the $10,000 men
Rob Fisher, Ted Chapin, Jack Viertel, Judith Dakin, and Walter Bobbie
Sharon and John Loeb
Kelli O'Hara
John Zaccaro, one of the $10,000 men and his daughter, Donna Zaccaro
Gael Greene, Paula Zahn, and Ann Froman
Rob Fisher, Rob Berman, Ted Chapin, and Jack Viertel
Whitney Fairchild and Jessica Zirinis
Former police commissioner, Bill Bratton, one of the $10,000 men and his wife, Rikki Klieman
Jared Grimes, Megan Sikora, and Daniel J. Watts
Lisa McCarthy and Dr. Lewis Berman
Raul Esparza
Marina Killery and David Orentreich
Fiona, ASPCA Dog of the Year. Fiona’s miraculous story of survival has since garnered more than 5.5 million views online, a testament to what can be accomplished when homeless animals get a second chance.
One of Citymeals-on-Wheels beneficiaries.
Chuck and Ellen Scarborough
Rob McClure
Valerie Roussel and Betsy Bernardaud
Paula Zahn, one of the honorees of this year’s Power Lunch, has been involved with Citymeals-on-Wheels for over 20 years.  To the assembled crowd, she told the moving story of a homebound senior she visited – a 95-year-old former nurse who is afflicted with glaucoma and hearing loss, who has outlived her friends and family, and whose only human contact is through the meal-delivery service.  The former news anchor also pointed out that Citymeals’ beneficiaries often live only a block or two from our own comfortable apartments.
Harriette Rose Katz
Dennis Riese and his son Tyler
Gael Greene and actress, Dorothy Kretchmer.  Dorothy has attended every single Power Lunch – all 26 of them.  The first one was held in her husband, Jerome’s restaurant, the Gotham Bar and Grill.

Marcus Wainwright, Prabal Gurung, Diane von Furstenberg, and Vera Wang
Rose Hartman and her incomparable women
Sonja Tremont Morgan
CeCe Cord and Robin Cofer
Anne Dopffer, Kalita Doolin, Alan Governar, and Sonja Tremont Morgan
Carolyn Murphy and Liya Kebede
Margherita Missoni
Olivier Theyskens and Jamie Bochert
Carmen Dell'Orefice
Andre Leon Talley and Carolina Herrera
Lauren Santo Domingo
Arizona Muse
Pilar Molyneux, Kathleen Springhorn, Juan Pablo Molyneux, and Jay Paul
Virginia Smith and Patrick Robinson
Lisa Simonsen
Cassandra Seidenfeld
Robert D Wickham, Sarah Page, Chips Page, and Kate Wickham
Tommy Hilfiger and Dee Ocleppo
Janna Bullock, Katherine Todd, and Jamie Danzinger
Yaz Hernandez
Susan Gluck and Dr. Laura Torrado
Maggie Norris
Allison Williams and Peter Som
Emma Stone
Carla Darlington Jr., Andrew Kotchoubey, and Irene Goodkind
Jenna Lyons
Barbara Maddock, Sandra Jones, Carole Mahoney, Jay Paul, Dick Maddock, and Brian Mahoney
Michele Mattei, Margaret MacKenzie, and friend
Emma Stone, Diane von Furstenberg, Anna Wintour, and Christopher Bailey
Eugenie Angles
Grace Fuller, Selby Drummond, and Emma Morrison
Bertrand Lortholary, Consul General of France
Cody Horn and Thakoon Panichgul
Brenda Straus and Jean Astrop
Rachel Roy and Louise Row
Jean Shafiroff and Rose Hartman
Erin Fetherston
Robin Cofer and Dominick D'Alleva
Kylie Case and Gilles Mendel
Mario Grauso and Vera Wang
Hal Witt and Olivia Flatto
Jerry Gehman, Nancy Gehman, Elizabeth Scott, and Stanley Scott
Shala Monroque
Max Osterweis and Erin Beatty
Leigh King, Johanna Stout, Sacha Brown, and Erin Kent
Kathryn Neale Shaffer, Meredith Melling Burke, Kelly Connor, and Selby Drummond
David Byrne and Sally Singer
Eden Zohar, Jorden Bickham, and Maya Sasaki
Stacey Engman
Meredith Melling Burke, Toby Maguire, and Jennifer Meyer
Miranda Kerr
Ashley Greene and Emma Stone
Madame Mayhem
Irene Goodkind and Jean Astrop
Selby Drummond, Valerie Boster, and Nina Arianda
Stephanie Winston Wolkoff
Antonio Azzuolo, Billy Reid, and Carlos Campos
Charlotte Kemp Muhl
Alexa Chung
Ken Downing and Wes Godon
Karlie Kloss and Jourdan Dunn
Gwendoline Christie
Amy Astley
Sylvana Ward Durrett
Christina Ricci
Baronne Bernard d'Anglejan-Chatillon, Mary Jane Pool, Eugénie Angles, Marquette de Bary, and Nancy Gehman
Sarah Brown and Meredith Melling Burke
Jenny Dyer, Chelsea Clinton, and Marc Mezvinsky
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Lucia Hwong Gordon and Chiu-ti Jansen
Eugénie Angles, Mary Jane Pool, and Francine du Plessix Gray
John Patrick, Hannah Bronfman, Elettra Wiedemann, and James Marshall
Alexi Ashe and Seth Meyers
Charles Vorbach, Barbara Coughlin, and Sarah Vorbach
Lynne McMillan, Hunt Slonem, and Caroline Ferguson
Richard de Combray and Miles Morgan
Lazaro Hernandez, Liya Kebede, Liv Tyler, and Jack McCollough
Coco Rocha and James Conran
Emma Stone, Greg Chait, and Christopher Bailey
Dakota Fanning and Jason Wu
Liv Tyler
Beau Sam, Tammy Lee, Mark Guigucci, and Camilla Chateau
Checking in the guests at The Ninth Annual CFDA/ Vogue Fashion Fund Awards.
Mario and Simone Rinaldi
Kathleen Giordano and Dr. Penny Grant
Keren Craig and Georgina Chapman
Beverley Zabriskie and Nathalie Angles
Nancy Gehman and Marianne Wyman

Jackie and Julia Widmann
Ben Kraus and Guy Lawrence
Tulla Booth and Ed Segal
Ebbie Ashabi and Debbie Mahoney
Cheerina Verde and Sunny Khalsa
Barbara Regna and Jamee Gregory
Jackie, Dr. Roger, and Julia Widmann
Jackie Smith, Chief Emeritus of Pediatric Orthopedics Dr. Leon Root, Florence Kwiatkowski, and Danielle Rucco
Michelle Isabelle-Sterk, Terrie Sultan, and Christopher French
Jack Youngerman
Lucy Puig, Jose Pincay-Delgado, and Dana Humphrey with Tito
Ross Bleckner, Alicia Longwell, and Eric Fischl
Matthew Allen and Catherine Azmoodeh
Alice Hope, Debbie Bancroft, and Alexandra Stanton
Konstantine Grcic, Ivonne Frowein, and Hubie Frowein
Tupper Thomas, Millicent Mercer Johnsen, and Joanne Oplustil
Lys Marigold, Skye Marigold, Jörn Weisbrodt, Dianne B, Rufus Wainwright, and Clo'e Floira
Ashleigh Simpson and Damien Debruijn
Grayson Handy and Kate Edmonds Donner
Dr. Roger Widmann, Dr. Leon Root, and Richard Menschel
Terrie Sulton, Eric Fischl, Christoher French, and April Gornik
Dr. Thomas Sculco, Paula Root, and Dr. Leon Root
Countess Dagmar de Brantes, and Tony Tichenor
George Williams and Dr. Cathleen Raggio
Joanne Pateman, Grisel Baltazar, Roz Block, and Sarah Jaffe Turnbull
Whitney Scott and actor Peter Jacobson
Philip Isles and Bridget Marks
Dr. Cathleen Raggio, Erin Carter, and Lou Shapiro
Alice Quinn and Mary Wieboldt
Valerie Gimbel, CeCe Black, and Suzette Smith
Mark Gilbertson, Deborah Royce, and Ron Wendt
Bruce Lewin and Kristina Lewin
Melanie Chisholm, Justine Keithline, Mary Van Pelt, and Missey Condie
Anthony Manfredonia and Herta Kriegner
Audrey Gruss, Susan Gutfreund, and Margo Langenberg
Paula and Dr. Leon Root withCynthia Sculco
Elaine Arace, Michele Lindsay, and Audrey Gruss
David Haworth and Janine Brown
Rosalie Brinton and John Wegorzewski
Elaine Arace, Gaylen White, and Huguette Hersch
Edelia Garcia, Rochelle Rodriguez, and Patient Care Assistant Edward Rivera
Deborah Sale, HSS Trustee Ellen Wright and her husband Joe, and Cate Plepler
Doug Ousley and Dawn Fern
Dr. Thomas Sculco, Lara Lerner, and Dr. Roger Widmann
David Haworth, Kate O'Brien, Dr. Wayne Jensen, and Amy Buchheit
Larry Kaiser, Jean Shafiroff, and Martin Shafiroff
Norma Dana, John Danzer, and Tupper Thomas
Jamee Gregory, Liz Peek, Audrey Gruss, and Clelia Zacharias
Phil Schmerdeck, Jayne Barlow, and Ben Krupinski
Clelia Zacharias, Stephanie Foster, and Lis Waterman
Kamie Lightburn, Stephanie Loeffler, and Paige Hardy
Debra McCall and Ned Smyth
Robin Reardon Nelson, Norman Nelson, and Alexes Reardon
Sophie Haddad and friends
Dr. Anil and Dana Ranawat
Thomas Schultz, Michele O'Keefe, Daniel O'Keefe, and Mary Schultz
Dr. Shevaun Doyle and Lisa Drefus
Sara Hobel and Jessica Tcherepnine
Brooke and Drew Harlow
Sheila Stephenson and Betsy Bacon
Barbara Dayton, Peter Dayton, and Sydney Albertini
Pam Laudenslager and Liz Eielson
HSS Trustee Lara Lerner, actor Peter Jacobson, and Whitney Scott
Jean Shafiroff, Nancy Gehman, Patricia Shiah, and Elizabeth Stribling
Marianne Engle and Amy Conway
Pia Lindstrom and CeCe Black
John Olsen, Pam Laudenslager, and Edward Callaghan
Centrepieces of barnacles, wild coral roses, beach grass and exotic shells
Dr. Susan Cha, Sara Levy, Chase Lerner, daughter of far right HSS Trustee Lara Lerner, and Dr. Stephanie Perlman
Kate Edmonds Donner, Alex Donner, and Charity Poth
Eric Freeman and Ross Bleckner
Jack Cristy and Ruth Appelhof
Alison Minton
Denise Gale, Mark Segal, and Christa Maiwald
Stephen Jones and Dr. Emily Dodwell
Andrea Fahnestock and George Hambrecht
Elyn Kronemeyer and Jeff Kronemeyer
The Big Cat lounge
Barbara and Peter Regna
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Sean T. Smith & www.AnnieWatt.com (Morris)
More than 600 gathered at The Parrish Museum's new home in Watermill.
The new Parrish ...
Lara Chase Lerner
Mildred Brinn and Tim Davis
One of seven enclosed galleries.
Alice Aycock, Klaus Kertess, Billy Sullivan, and Susan Penzner
Janna Bullock with Helen and Larry Remmel
April Gornik
Rod O'Connell, Vicki Downey, James Robertson, Maureen Robertson, Jim Karoli, Rachel Leonard, and Kate Edmonds Donner
Virginia Newman Yocum and Janet Mavec
Heidi Conant and James Hathaway
Renee Adrienne Smith, Cassandra Seidenfeld, and Lucia Hwong Gordon
Malcolm Morley

Natalie Kates
Sebastian Varney and Katie Kreider
Miguel Flores-Vianna and Julia Noran
Darcy Penick and Sid Lee
Kim Le, Curtis Young, and Annika Connor
John Rosselli and Bunny Williams
Jill Cohen and Michael Boodro
Anne Keating and Paul Carlucci
Kayce Freed Jennings, Patrick McMullan, and Coco Rocha
Francois and Ketty Maisonrouge
Ted Dawson, Rosemaie Feitelberg, and Bart Boehlert
Genevieve Bahrenburg
Firoo Zahedi, Beth DeWoody, and George Farias
Jason Wright and Sarah Simms Rosenthal
Adora Chew, Gina Yun, and Christina Baynes Reid
Jack Pierson
Vincent Fremont and Shelly Fremont
Mitchell Rosenthal
Andrew Rosen, Diane von Furstenberg, and Jim Gold
Howard Meitiner
Alex Papachristidis, Ketty Maisonrouge, Nancy Druckman, and Jill Dienst
Todd Henderson and Sarah Morgan
Terry de Gunzburg
Tina Brown and Diane von Furstenberg
Rose Marie Bravo and Kathy Nedorostek
Wilbur and Hilary Ross
Gail Pasano and Jaqui Lividini
Kasia McCormick and Angelika Ronson
Mitchell Rosenthal and Wole Coaxum
Ronald Lauder
Jean Shafiroff, Peter Price, and Judy Price
Danielle Snyder and Jodie Snyder
Victor John Villanueva and Edward Sunderland
Christian Deybier, Wendy Moonan, and Alexander Jakowec
James Reginato and Lee Mindel
Waris Ahluwaria and Coco Rocha
Doreen Remen
Suzy Rechtermann, Dan Quintero, and Kate Kelly Smith
Matthew Talomie, James P. Druckman, and Cynthia Frank
Alejandro Saralegui and Kendell Dronstrom
Milly de Cabrol and Miguel Flores-Vianna
Anne Keating and Rose Marie Bravo
Elizabeth Pyne and Patricia Sovern
Emily Rubenfeld, Lisa Rossi, and Caroline Brown
Arthur Wayne and Nazira Handal
Kristian Laliberte and Annie Georgia Greenberg
Michael and Seren Shvo
Jeoffrey Bradfield and Nancy Silverman
Sean Sullivan and Alana Frumkes
Tory Burch, Francisco Costa, and Bill Cunningham
Desiree Gruber and Kyle MacLachlan
Katie Couric and Victor Garber
Jeffrey Rosen, Marjorie Rosen, and Jacques Grange
Lenore Mahoney, Craig Lee, and Liz Ehrlich
Roberto Camacho
Anita Antonini and Marie Havens
Jamie Drake and Lloyd Princeton
Rosanne Morrison and Margaret Williamson
Vicki Shapiro and Teresa Maffucci
Patrick McMullan and Mary Brosnahan
Bryan Blatstein and Anne Fulenwider
Lindsey Morris and Chuck Chewning
Phoenix House held its annual Fashion Awards Dinner at the Mandarin Oriental.
Stephanie Cozzi, Lindsey Hockenberry, and April Hennig
Jamie Prentice and Maggie Betts
Carolyn Englefield, Pierre Passebon, and Dara Caponigro
Josie Natori and Harriet Weintraub
Mary McDonald and Ruggiero Messina
Stacey Bendet
Christopher Mason and Pamela Taylor
Sean Avolio and Suzy Malick
Burt Tansky
Jaithan Kochar, Eddie Ross, David Duncan, Sonia Anand, and Michael McGraw
Jenny Dyer
Ruggiero Messina, Robert Rufino, and David Duncan
Joseph Grazi and Ari Grazi
Marci Klein, Holly Parmelee, and Simon Pinniger
Anna Safir and Eleanora Kennedy
Suzanne Murphy
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Christopher Mason and Peter Baconovic
Benjamin Towill and Phil Winser
Elizabeth Harrison and Sever Garcia
Michael Feinberg and Mitch Kreiger
Dulce Celones and Joe Palughi
Eric Hughes, Nathan Turner, and Sarah Jessica Parker
Dave Giffen, Roz Morris, and John Gauld
Patti Lebow and Diane Coffey
Ali Wentworth with Tiffanys auction winner
Rina Anoussis, Takas Anoussis, and Debbie Korb
Christina Juarez, Cece Cord, and Robert Turner
Stacey and Matthew Bronfman
Reed and Delphine Frakoff
Tom Cashin, Deborah Kass, Vincent Fremont, and Jean Butler
Kyle DeWoody and Joe Sheftel
Kate Kelly Smith and Jonathan Rosen
Hannah Bronfman, Waris Ahluwaria, and Bettina Prentice
Shirley Cook
Carolyn Roehm and Nathan Turner
Newell Turner, Michael Boodro, and Michael Clinton
Callie Jenschke, Debbie Wilpon, and Jessica Wilpon Kamel
Keith Scott, Ira Mothner, and Sharon Scott
Emma Hall and Mark Quilhot
Jacques Grange and James P. Druckman
Burt Tansky and Howard Meitiner

Steve Earle, Honoree James Hobley, and Caroline Hamilton
Vivian Scott Chew and Ray Chew
Cynthia Fisher and Vicki Kellogg
Marc Wong and David Sobacinski
Lindsey Mullholland and Charlotte Squarcy
Bobby Sanabria and Orchestra
Janice Becker and Caitlin Carter
Fe Fendi and Barbara Tober
Tsutomu Karino and Joyce Adewumi
Barbara-Taylor Bradford and Robert Bradford
Shirley Dixon-Miller, Brantley Knowles, Beverley Sherrid, Esther "Faity" Tuttle, and Kathleen Elizabeth Springhorn
Afro Cuban Jazz Orchestra In Concert
John and Sinead Kerr
Lloyd Williams and Justin Dicioccio
Lou Toscano, Talina Toscano and Toscano Family
Charles Neuhauser and Jill Spiller
Lou Toscano, Stephen Wiltshire, and Rosa Martinez
Emily Hughes, Sarah Hughes, and Rebecca Hughes
Artwork by Trent Altman
Sophia and Timothy Hartch
Victoria Sirota, Ed Lowentahal, Ilene Lowenthal, Vivian Scott Chew, Ray Chew, and Justin Dicioccio
Andrew urbanski, Barbara Orzakiewicz, and Chris Dezinno
Hugh Hildesley
Mary Anne Caton and Lila Kerns
Reverend Jacques Degraff and Bob Tate
Eric Dunlap and Leslie Arlette Boyce
John Kerr and Nadine Ahmed
Kelly Sawatsky, Jeremy Fletcher, and Shelley Dicioccio
Ed Lowentahal and Ilene Lowenthal
Robert Sirota, Peter Robbins, Elsa Jean Davidson, and Winston Majatte
Trudy Francis and Stephanie Francis
Cece McCarton and Stephen Wiltshire
Roberta Silver and Leonard Lauren
Diane Isaac and Tracy Hyter-Suffern
Michele's wishes
Michele's birthday cake
Laura Kirkman Evans, John Evans, Kim Hartswick, and Maria Ann Conelli
Charles Askegard
Photographs by AnnieWatt.com (McCarton, Manhattan School); PatrickMcMullan.com (Career Transition); Kenny Jacobson (Ice Theatre).
Michele Herbert, Patricia Shiah, Lucia Hwong Gordon, and Bonnie Pfeiffer
Linda Wood Guy and Ronald Guy
Lorey Hayes, Robert Sirota, and Victoria Sirota
Stephanie Francis, Joyce Adewumi, Richard Franklin, and Janette Housman
Mark Sherrid, Beverley Sherrid, and Martha Foley
Joni Berry
Polly Guerin, Carol Lynch, and Kathleen Elizabeth Springhorn
Debbie Gordon, Richard Dwyer, and Dorothy Hamill
Janice Becker, Anka Palitz, Cynthia Fisher, Stuart Wicht, and friends
Sue Samuel, Elka Samuels Smith, Jason Samuels Smith, and Jojo Smith
Jana Trantow and Neil Sarkar
Charlotte Armstrong and Sharon Vaino
Kats Abe, Voza Rivers, and Tsutomu Karino
Darnell Abraham
Peter Robbins and Jodi Robbins
Voza Rivers and Justin Dicioccio
Dr Karen Clayton
Marina Case Alario, Caroline McLain, Martha Everett, Marilee Reiner, and Clark Reiner
Esther "Faity" Tuttle and Allison Coliskey
Linda Walton and Christian Sands
Matt Savage
Kris Sebastin and Dr Rich Besser
Honoree Amanda Lamunyon and Sherry Lamunyon
Chuck Friedlander and Bruce Burrows
Helen Evans, Esther "Faity" Tuttle, and Arax Simsarian
Talina Toscano
Sharon Mackey, Assemblyman Keith Wright, and Karen Witherspoon
Mitzi Perdue
Alfred Fiandaca, Lisa Huertas, and Craig Dix
Dorothy Hamill and Charles Pavarini III
Allison Walmark and Eliza Walmark
Thomas and Patricia Shiah
Rio Wyles
Barbara Schiff and Kim Silverstein
Gerard McKeon, Dr Cece McCarton, Raquel Suarez, and Myron Johnson
Loren Schoenberg, Walter Edwards, and Darwin Davis
Jean Shafiroff, Fe Fendi, and Lucia Hwong Gordon
Tiffani Chambers and Reggie Chambers
Congressman Charles Rangel, Ray Chew, and Assemblyman Keith Wright
Ray Chew, Justin Dicioccio, Lloyd Williams, Peter Robbins, and Loren Douglass
Karen Oberlin with Genius of Autism Honorees
Matthew Appelstein, Judy Appelstein, Jamie Appelstein, Jerry Appelstein, and Melissa Appelstein
Angela Lansburry and Ben Vereen
Patricia Ricketts
Robert Ryan and Rachel Moore
Nicole Miller and Michel Mercure
Shoshana and Yair Kagan
Peter Shaw, Stephanie Levinsky, and Angela Lansburry
Rick Patterson and Nina Ferrell
Lloyd Williams and Ade Williams
Lila Kerns, and Heather and Wade Speas
Kathleen Stowell
Assata Alstonm and Pamela Walker
Caroline Yoon and Nicola Fernandes
Dave Whitmore, Dr Kathy Pajak, Christian Sands, Michelle Castro, and Loren Douglass
Yamira Siu-Jabbaar and Wallace Jabbaar
Lawrence Herbert, Michele Herbert, and Loren Herbert
Audrey Svensson, Sharon Vaino, and Nancy Shackelford Jones
Lynne Goldberg and Jerry Appelstein
Sandy and Greg Kriser
Kyle Cousins and Amanda Lamunyon
Richard Dwyer and Amanda Mochan
Tate Wingate and Tracy Perlongo
Keri Bowers, Elyse Kroll, Dario Toledo, Sara Daum, and Ivy Feldman
Kathleen Elizabeth Springhorn, Audrey Svensson, and Deirdre Bay
Jin Sun and Hsiuhua Chiang
Ade Williams and Valerie Williams
Cynthia Fisher AND Pat Cody
Beverley Sherrid, Helen Evans, and Sharon Vaino
James Hobley
Betsy Healy and Sharon Vaino
The McCarton Foundation hosted its second annual Genius of Autism event.
Robin Van Bokhorst, Marissa Van Bokhorst, and Christina Rose
Hunter Brown

Barbara Saltzman, Bill Moran, and Lois Wagner
Adam Graev, Larry Graev, and Jeremy Goldstein
Nancy Skoglund, Kathleen Dowling, and Peter Skoglund
Dr. Dave Robbins and Brook Christopher
Joe Daniels, Lauren Weisberg, Victoria Dunham, and John Regan
Sherry White, Jim White, and JoAnn Blair
Prushar Dungrani and Ruchi Dungrani
Dr. Stephen Warren, Dr. Constance Chen, Dr. Lauren Cassell, Jacques Blinbaum, and Dr. Len Horovitz
Mary Davison and Marvin Davison
Joan Boening and Michael Ambler
Ralph Baruch and Jean Baruch
Maria Fishel, Kenneth Fishel, and Christina Rose
Richard Oldenburg
Brooke and Robby Mountain
Mike Bracken, Lindsay Bracken, John Ferguson, and Elizabeth Pyne
Dr. Jane Farhi and James Barron
Cricket Burns
Patricia Burnham, Bill Brock, and Pamela Harris
Shyama Matthews, Michael Strongin, Evan Bornstein, John Sujit, and Dr. Drorit Or
Slawomir Moch, Kathleen Lamborn, Michael Scully, and Marie Norton
Kiliaen van Rensselaer and Dori Cooperman
Sarah von Maltzahn, Dixi von Maltzahn, Florence Peyrelongue, and Jose Guerra
Bill Manger and Lil Phillips
Teresa O and Svetlana Acquista
Gaylee Beinecke and John Beinecke
Graziano de Boni, Kiliaen van Rensselaer, and Dr. Laura Ruof
Mikel Whitte and Bettina Nelsen
Andrew Harms, Meg Panzer, Ryan Osterman, Kim Mason, John Lyddane, and Jessica Bresnan
Marybeth Winningham and Virginia Ritter
Kristina Hanley and Kimberly Short
Kamie Lightburn, Richard Lightburn, Michelle Smith, and Andrew Oshrin
Bonnie O'Hara, Bob O'Hara
Jennifer MacLear, Bruce MacLear, and Richard Lightburn
Abigail Yap, Jenny Suh, Aaron Ness, and Serena Ness
Alison Newman and Elle Winter
Emily Ryan and Adam Ryan
Nancy Lane, Jeffery Lane, Cece Asch, George Asch, and Phyllis Mack
Kay McEnroe and Bob Downey
Katie Tozer and Jeremy Goldstein
Chrissy Gaffney and Tyler Gaffney
Matthew Claster, Cindy Doninger, and Bari Claster
Asia Mernissi and Jason Bowman
Carter Beal and Amy Beal
Alexandra Smith, Andrew Schonebaum, and Dominique Kun
Dr. David Seinfeld and Smadar Seinfeld
Sulavha Patel and Dr. Nirav Patel
Dr. Shyama Matthews, Ron Barrett, and Dr. Surekha Maddula
Mel Oldenburg and Ronald Spencer
John and Martha Glass
Michael Dowling, Richard Goldstein, Dr. Ruth Westheimer, Elie Wiesel, Cyndi Lauper, and Bob Woodruff
Kamie Lightburn and Mark Gilbertson
Elie Wiesel and Marion Wiesel
Post-Cyndi Lauper
Jean Shafiroff
Jonathan Kuhn, Pamela Schwegel, and AJ Schwegel
Laurie Costantino and Peter Costantino
Gayle Sobel and Dr. Howard Sobel
Marnie Worth, Stephen Worth, Kamie Lightburn, and Richard Lightburn
Megan Hamilton and Maddy Potvin
Dr. Nancy Lipsitz, Dr. Rafael Ortiz, Dr. Emille Agrait, and Dr. David Langer
Dorothy Lewis, Richard McFadden, and Diane Dunne
Paul Guenther, Diane Guenther, Ellen Crown, and Dan Crown
Ed Roos and Maryann Roos
Kenn Dudek, Heather Hynes, Alexis Preston, Katie Tozer, and Jeremy Goldstein
Reha Kocatas, Jennifer Oken, Chrissy Gaffney, and Tyler Gaffney
Victoria Goldman, Lloyd Goldman, Ellen Crown, and Dan Crown
Dr. Neha Rathod and Dr. Barthid Rathod
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Cutty McGill (IFAADS).
Eleni’s Park Avenue Tree Lighting cookies.
Sunny Biasi, Duane Biasi, and Sarah Goldstein
Michele Ateyeh and Dan Scheffey
Tama and Brad Bernstein
Charles Bergman, Barbara McLaughlin, and Parks Commissioner Veronica M. White
Maria McCaskill and Tom McCaskill
Cyndi Lauper
Judy Hiltz and William Hiltz
Michael Dowling, Will Hiltz, Elie Wiesel, and Ellen Crown
Ralph Nappi, Maureen Nappi, Candy Goldstein, and Richard Goldstein
Kathleen Dowling and Laurie Costantino
Konrad Keesee, Barbara Broeder, and Jerome Jacalone
Dennis Dowling, Lynn Dowling, Dr. Ira Nash, and Dr. Beth Nash
Dancing at Lenox Hill Hospital's Annual Autumn Ball.
Dr. Imran Ashraf, Dr. Jennifer Montes, Dr. Brian Walters, and Dr. Naiem Nassiri
Mario and Maria Maccioni
Barbara McLaughlin and Jim Herbert
Caitlin Tashjian and Jack Lynch
John Mazzola and Sylvia Mazzola
Chinny Trivedi
The crowd pre-Cyndi Lauper
Molly Denihan and Alison Coffey
Bob Downey, Lorna Savage, Adine von Burchard, and Roy Zuckerberg
Edith Kopelwitz, Nikki Fontanella, and Jutta Weiss

James Coleman and Cynthia Ott
Board Member Gregory Rogers recieving the Ackerman Corporate Partner Award presented by John O'Neill
Photographs by www.AnnieWatt.com(Doubles)
Top: Judy Exton, Gerald and Agnes Hassell, and Alan Griffith. Bottom: Tom Exton and Penny Griffith
Gala Co-Chair Martha Fling, Board Chair John O'Neill and Ackerman Institute President Lois Braverman
Gala Co-Chairs Martha Fling and Alice Netter
Valerie and Carl Kempner
Tom and Lisa Wilkinson
Judith Stern Peck
Sydney Oliver and Steven B Tanger
Alyson and Jeff Lindsey
Herb Chambers and Melissa Lees
Chris Gillespie, Lois Braverman, and Martha Fling
Wendy Carduner
Gala Co-Chair Martha Fling presenting the Ackerman Distinguished Service Award to Baron Davis
Katherine Chapman and Tom Stemberg
Bill and Alli Achtmeyer
Thomas A. Renyi, Elizabeth Renyi, Andrew van der Vord, and Agnes Hassell
Bruce and Jeannie Evans with Event Chairs Andrew and Nikki Van der Vord
Javier Gomez and Camilla Barungi
Rosemary Brennan, Joan Agag, and Agnes Hassel
Rebecca Seidenberg and Krista Ference
Carol Maslow and Board Member Arthur Maslow
Ted and Susan Gamble
Margaret Randle and James McDaniel
Gallery Bowling at The thirteenth annual Storybook Ball at the Museum of Fine Arts, Boston.
Museum of Fine Arts, Boston
Board Member Diana Benzaquen
Ally Coulter and Leonard Lauren
Tom Hamilton with wife Terry
Ruth and Tom Reilly
Paola Bacchini-Rosenshein and Arnie Rosenshein
Dr. Ronald Kleinman, Martha Kleinman, Katherine O’Keeffe, Kerry Swords, Susan Treacy, and Dr. Joseph Vacanti
Paige Corbin, Renee Adrienne Smith, and Alexandra Segalas
Gregory Rogers, Dana Rogers and Ben Rogers
Kathleen O'Neill, Board Chair John O'Neill, and Ackerman Institute President Lois Braverman
Suzanne Murphy and Cynthia Ott
Nina Taselaar
Will Gridley and McCall Gaeng
Live Auction with Lenny Clarke
MGHfC patient Tommy McGraw
Elena and Tom Matlack
Kate Edmonds Donner and Alex Donner
Lenny Clarke with Lori and Dr. Peter L. Slavin, President of MGH
Board Member and Recipient of the Ackerman Corporate Partner Award Gregory Rogers and Natalie Morales
Joseph C. Williams and Board Member Jeannie Ackerman Curhan
R. Couri Hay, Janna Bullock, Towson Remmel, and Zoe Bullock-Remmel
Hugh Hildesley and Alice Netter
Cheryl Wills
Board Member Linda Dishy and Bernard Dishy
Rosie Heffernan, Charlene Harock, and Ada De Maurier
Dovile Drizyte and Eric Mourlot
Laura and Brent Nicklas
Young Professional Council Members Shannon Schoonbeek and Alexandra Sexton
Alexandra Porter and Beverly Landstreet V
Ian and Katherine O’Keeffe with Kerry and Brendan Swords
Founder and President Emeritus of The White House Project Marie Wilson and Lois Braverman
Isabel and Anya Shiva

Dorothy Belshaw, George Belshaw, and Alice Belshaw
Charlie Eighton, Jojo Mignone, Caroline Mignone, and Allison Mignone
Alice Weinberg, Maddie Weinberg, and Will Weinberg
Caroline Karellas and Mike Karellas
Erica Evans, Wesley Evans, Carter Evans III, and Carter Evans Jr.
Henry, Alex, and Charlotte Mishkin
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Dr. Barbara Landreth and Kelly Ripa
Miles Tamis, Jennifer Tamis, Chris Tamis, and Henry Tamis
Chloe Kolikowski, Vilma Vale-Brennan, and Alexa Brennan
Yvonne Soucy and Marilu Torres
Ann Achilleoudis, Graziela Dauhajre, Alina Achilleoudis, Aris Achilleoudis, Adelle Dauhajre, and Arianna Achilleoudis
Alison Brettschneider, Courtney Nataraj, Kathlene Kocatas, Allison Aston, Dr. Gerald Laughlin, Dr. Barbara Landreth, Mark Consuelos, Kelly Ripa, Dr. Laura Forese, Whitney Chatterjee, Merrill Curtis, Martha Busconi, Erica Armstrong, and Tricia Hazelwood Moffitt at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell Medical Center's 23rd annual Light Up a Life benefit.
Alva Carlston, Lydia Carlston, and Ada Carlston
Margo and Aylan Brenna
Kelly Cleary, Ben Britain, Jack Britain, and Sean Britain
Graziela Asturias, and Christian, Alexander, and Andreas Loucopoulos
Heather and Chloe McAuliffe
Renee Domingo, Alvaro Domingo, Marilu Torres, and Alejandro Nunez
Placido Domingo, Renee Domingo, and Alvaro Domingo
Monica Capriles, Fernando Azpurura, and Alexandra Capriles
Emilio Pedroni, Isabela Pedroni Spinola, and Esmeralda Pedroni Spinola
Aitana, Gala, Gerardo, and Carmen Rodriguez
Michael and Sofia Brennan
Dan and Jake Paduano
Emma and Sarah Nataraj
Silvia and Victoria Cardinale
Olivia and Brad Aston
Nona Bianca, Jebbia Bianca, and Miles Bianca
Conrado and Tancredi Tenaglia
Alexandra Capriles, Alexandra Capriles, Monica Capriles, Fernando Azpurura, and Capriles
Dr. Gerald Laughlin and family
Marilu, Alvaro, and Nicole Domingo
Juliet and Tristan Arrieta
Chloe Kolikowski and Alexa Brennan
Sergio and Esmeralda Pedroni Spinola
Martin and Carlos Rodriguez Pastor
Jackie Gold, Jordyn Flynn, and Claire Filler
Bridie Hatch, Amy Hatch, and Harlow Hatch
Max Schwartzreich, Leigh Schwartzreich, and Dylan Schwartzreich
Rocco, Cosima, and Leticia Presutti
Kelly Ripa, Hello Kitty, Captain America, and Mark Consuelos
Lisa and Allan Elson, and Alex Kavour
Yaz Hernandez, Vilma Vale-Brennan, Renee Domingo, and Esmeralda Pedroni Spinola

Sueleika Jaouad
Denise Rich, Kanye West, and Kim Kardashian
Stephanie March
Scott A. Dahnke, Jason N.R. Herrick, and Loretta Dahnke
Dr.Stephen D.Nimer and Mrs.Nimer
Marvette Britto
Craig Kielburger, Eva Halner, Liz Aldous, and Jessica Brigantino
George Hamilton and Joan Collins
Nelly
Jacob the Jeweler and Angela Arabov
Zach and Betty Lonstein
Mimi Lieber and Daniel Sullivan
Stevie Holland
Robert and Alisa Roever
Graham W. J. Beal
Zach Lonstein, E. Robert Goodkind, and Elie Rubinstein
Geraldo Rivera and Erica Rivera
Haim Steinbach and Gwen Smith
Hofit Golan
Russell Simmons and Hana Nitsche
Bar Rafaeli
Crystal Renn
Ashanti and Nelly
Bonnie Pfeifer Evans
Fern Mallis
Irina Shayk and Lorraine Schwartz
Kim Kardashian and Kanye West
Stephanie Pratt
Tina Knowles, Lorraine Schwartz, Ofira Sandberg, Kim Kardashian, Bar Rafaeli, and Kanye West at the annual Angel Ball to support Gabrielle's Angel Foundation.
Elizabeth Fekkai
Bill Griswold, Stephanie La Nasa, and Christopher Malstead
Guests
Brooke Milstein
Sarah Sze
Shoshanna Lonstein Gruss and Cynthia Nixon
Lisa Yuskavage, Norman Kleeblatt, Yvonne Force Villareal, and Charlotte Eyerman
Elie Rubinstein and Shoshanna Lonstein Gruss
Elliot Carlen and John Silberman
Sarah Sze and Klaus Biesenbach
Jason Hirsch and Emily Ouestecky
Gala Co-Chairs Scott Dahnke and Capera Ryan
Charles and Valerie Diker
Steve Reiner, Leonard Petlakh, and E. Robert Goodkind
Niki Haskell
Donald Moffett, Sarah Sze, Siddhartha Mukherjee, and Robert Gober
Smokey and Frances Robinson
Leon Harris and Gigi Stone
Kimberly Chandler
Christine and Doug Harmon
Michael and Elizabeth Chu
Hunt Slonem and Lily Cavendish
Star Jones
Denise Rich and Michele Rella
Cynthia Nixon, Mark Bilski, Mimi Lieber, and Amanda Bilski
Smokey Robinson
Ivana Trump and guest
Mimi Lieber and Gia Machlin
Stephanie March, Kyle Weiss, Alina Cho, Dallas Jessup, and Matthew Settle
Martin Friedman
Jena Sims and Tom Buckley
Ann and Jonathan Binstock
Frederick and Stephanie Clark
Frank and Michele Rella
Sarah Sze and Matvey Levenstein
Deborah Ryan, Capera Ryan, Joyce Greenberg, and Tom L. Freudenheim
Louis Rose and Alexandra Lind Rose
Rory Hermelee and Wendy Kahn
Photographs by Rob Rich (Angel Ball); Carly Otness/BFANYC (World of Children).
Margot and Robert Linton
Lucia Hwong Gordon
Cindi Leive, Jim Gold, and Alina Cho
Victoria Silverstadt
Angela Simmons
Maria Alfonsin and Matthew Settle
Gerard Butler
Kim Cho and Alina Cho
James Keach and Jane Seymour
Star Jones and Natalie Cole
Clive Davis
Tiki Barber and Tiki Lynn Johnson
Bar Rafaeli and Jessica Stam
Shontelle
Natalie Cole
David Gordon, Jason Herrick, and Graham W. J. Beal
Capera Ryan, Alexandra Drucker, and Yasaman Djunic
Solange Knowles
Jonathan Alter and Elie Rubinstein
Patricia Lenkov and Cynthia Nixon
Natasha Poly, Eva Cavalli
High Voltage
AFA Director Pauline Willis
Michael Lorber and Sonja Morgan
Lester Smith, Sue Smith, and Nile Rogers
Harry Leibowitz and Kay Issacson-Leibowitz

Margo MacNabb Nederlander, and Nicole Sexton
Jaime Jimenez, Mario Buatta, Christopher Hyland, and Vincente Wolf
Di Mondo and Eric Javits Jr
C. Devone
Ginny Day, Helen LaKelly Hunt, and Connie Chung
Alina Cho, Colin Cowie, and Susan Magrino
Lisa Kanning and Laura Kirar
Brittany Sellers
Deborah Rocker, Lee Rocker, and Yvonne Force Villareal
Ana Pincus and Hyatt Bass
Carol Wilkinson
Sandra Long; Atmosphere
Geoffrey Bradfield, Aslihan Sabanci, and Roric Tobin
Lucia Hwong Gordon and Paola Bacchini
Paul Sterman, Marlyn Sexton, and Harry Johns
Richard Lovejoy and friends
Harry Johns, Robin Meltzer, James Keach, Jane Seymour, Trevor Albert, and Princess Yasmin Aga Khan
Hilary Gumbel, Louis Robbins, Alexandra Lebenthal, and Claudia Lebenthal
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia and Liliana Cavendish
Leonard Lauren
Richard Kaplan, Barbara Ripp, Edwina Sandys, Christopher Highland, and Patricia Fisher
Richard and Lily Birnbach
Roric Tobin, Justin Bova, Jenny Gonzalez, Geoffrey Bradfield, Tina Krivoshein, Justyna Watorec, and Ted Kim
Andrea Stark, Sharon Bush, Alisa Rover, and Michelle Herbert
Marjorie Gubelmann and Darcy Miller
Barbara Tober
Thom Filicia and Laura Beck
Edward and Julie Minskoff
John Silberman, Jeffrey Deitch, Larry Gagosian, and Martin Margulies
Dawne Marie Grannum and Dr. Penny Grant
Maggie Norris
Jed Walentas, Andrew Tarlow, Peter Lawrence (Wythe Hotel – American Made honoree)
Jean Shafiroff, Martin Shafiroff, Yaz Hernandez, and Valentin Hernandez
Larry Herbert and Judy Etzin
Hayden Hosford
Roric Tobin, Helena Lehane, and Geoffrey Bradfield in Geoffrey's designer room at Holiday House.
Dr. Penny Grant and Britnee Bryan
Eboni Gates, Ana Oliveira, Ruth Burgos, and Jennifer Davis
Delah Brucelli and Helena Lehane
Eboni Gates, Ruth Burgos, Gordon Hazel, Jennifer Davis, and Connie Chung
Liliana Cavendish, Bonnie Pfeifer Evans, and Suzanne Murphy
Charlotte Moss, Kamie Lightburn, and Webb Egerton
Monique Van Vooren; Atmosphere
Elana Chernousoba and Linette Semino
Stephen Javaras, Meagan, Kennally, Christopher Hyland, Iris Dankner, and Vincente Wolf
Harriet and Frank Stella
Anne Hearst McInerney, Candice Bushnell, and Bettina Zilkha
Alexa Hampton and Christopher Hyland
Tony Shafrazi and China Chow
Hannah Parker and Terri Coppersmith of The Central Park Conservancy
Lisa Holton, Kathryn Weill, Diana Taylor, and Aiyoung Choi
Robert Lynch, Maria Bell, and Josh Groban
Mort Gleddrman, Robert Lynch, Rona Sebastian, Steven Spiess, Ken Ferguson, and Nora Halpern
Walk in the Park participants
Peg Mastrianni
Anne and Jay McInerney
Maurice Dubois and Andrea Dubois
Amy Freeze
Eleanora Kennedy and Lee W. Robinson
Julian Lethbridge and Anne Bass
Walk in the Park participants with Amy Freeze of ABC News
Randall Tarasuk, Beth Haridopolos, Eileen Boyd, and Charles Pavarini III
Karen Mills, Administrator of the U.S. Small Business Administratin and Willie Geist
/Willie Geist and Martha Stewart
Aslihan Sabanci, Iris Dankner, David Klein, and Culuhan Koruyan
Michelle Smith, Richard Ziegelasch, and Judy Poller
Catherine White, Else Rahn, Burnt Heiberg, William Cummings, and Lilielle Bucks
Paul Allen and Herbie Hancock
Geoffrey Bradfield
Jeffrey Bilhuber, Martha Stewart, and Sirio Maccioni
Jana Bullock
Rita Cosby and Tomaczek Bednarek
Susan Cullman and Connie Chung
Chiu-Ti Jansen
Princess Yasmin Aga Khan, Trevor Albert, Jane Seymour, James Keach, and Robin Meltzer
Martha Stewart with Award Winners
Stephen Javaras and Meagan Kennally
Blaise Labriola, Anejade Vaccarella, Princess Yasmin Aga Khan, and Nicholas Luchsinger
Barbara Tober and Donald Tober
Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg, Mayor of New York City, speaks about the importance of small businesses
Deborah Krulewitch and Jane Hudis
Daryl Simon and Margie Loeb
Kira Faiman and Ghislaine Maxwell
Lisa Reinhart, Brian Stokes Mitchell, and Mikhail Baryshnikov
Merilee Bostock and Kate Bostock-Shefferman
Martha Stewart and Calvin Klein
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Pilar Guzman, Editor in Chief of Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia gives opening remarks at Martha Stewart's American Made
Jim Orphanides, Trudy Borenstein-Sugiura, Nora Orphanides, and Graham Lustig
Joan Roth, Sherri Sandler, Diane Koones, and Joan Davidson
Somers Farkas, Brooke Shields, and Muffie Potter Aston
Alexandra Lebenthal
Jean Shafiroff, Diana Taylor, Hyatt Bass, Susan Fulwiler, Sarah Jones, Soledad O'Brien, Ginny Day, Helen LaKelly Hunt, and Ana Oliveira
Muffin Dowdle, Thomas Joseph, and Sarah Carey
Hilary Gumbel, Bryant Gumbel, and Robin Meltzer
Cecilia Raymond, Sofia Raymond, Jackson Raymond, Brad Raymond, Charlie Raymond, Soledad O'Brien, and Connie Chung
Dakota Jackson and Ally Coulter
Richard Serra
Al-Nasser, Greg Kan, and Roric Tobin
James Rosenquist, Lin Arison, Harry Hersh, Sarah Arison, Paul Lehr, and Mimi Thompson
Brooke Shields, John McEnroe, Princess Yasmin Aga Khan, and Patty Smyth
Charlene Haroche, Ms. Brewer, Michelle Herbert, Lucia Hwong Gordon, and Bonnie Pfeifer Evans
YoungArts
Madison Avenue BID President Matthew Bauer  with Fogal girls
Travis and Nicholas Acquavella
Sara Gore and Stephen Fanuka
Renee Rockefeller, Alex Navab, and Mary Kathryn Navab
Yolanda Santis, Maria Eugenia Haseltine, and Fernanda Kellogg
Kevin E. Parker, Philip V. Moyles, and John Q. Doyle
Roberta Greenberg and Roselee Morell
Sylvia Hassenfeld and Trudy Elbaum Gottesman
Simone Mailman, Mary Snow, Kristin Clark, and Alexia Ryan
Jackie Williams, Kitty Sherrill, Sara Ayres, Shabnam Henry, Alexandra Lind Rose, and Allison Aston
Ken Langone, James Speyer, MD, Elaine Langone, and William Carroll, MD
Marcie Pantzer, Sarah Montgomery, Sarah Machiels, and Sharon Jacob
Jarmo Savera, Jaana Sareva, and James Speyer, MD
Kim White and Elaine Crocker
Sloan Overstrom and Blair Husain
Christopher Ohrstrom, The Duchess of Devonshire, The Duke of Devonshire, and Bonnie Burnham
Trudy Elbaum Gottesman and Robert Gottesman
Cynthia Hazen Polsky and Leon Polsky
Blair Husain, Daniel Cappello, Sloan Overstrom, and Claudia Overstrom
Kevin E. Parker, Stephen J. Dannhauser, Robert Benmosche, Daniel J. Rusty Staub, Philip V. Moyles, and Mark Messier
Bonnie Burnham and Kenneth Chenault
David Cundey, Marianne Boesky, Maryellen Cundey, and Liam Culman
Liz and Jeffrey Peek
Charles Wishart and Bebe Zecha
Judgie Graham, Erika Bearman, and Daniel Cappello
Cheryl Rosario, Steve Lemson, Joanie Stronger, and Chris Ohrstrom
Reed Coleman, Stephanie Kearney, Lindsey Coleman, Francesca del Balzo, and James Kearney
Ros L'Esperance, David Howe, and Kathryn Tyree
NYU Cancer Institute Gala 2012 at the Plaza Hotel
Herbert Lepor, MD and Silvia Formenti, MD
Julia Coleman, Aimee Eberle, and Claire Capello
Claudia Overstrom and Cynthia van Eck
Karen Klopp and Debbie Bancroft
Elizabeth and John Sanchez
Travis Acquavella and Lesley Schulhof
Jay Aston, Di Petroff, and Jamie Beard
Christian Leone, Dennis Basso, Michael Cominotto, and David Schulhof
Dr. Henry Kissinger and Sydney Houghton Weinberg
Marica Vilcek and Jan Vilcek, MD, PhD
Rosalind Wholey, Robert Wholey, and Jill Kargman
Dan Quart and Louis Rose
Christine Schwarzman and Honorable Maguy Maccario-Doyle
Fazle Husain, Rob Pitts, and Toni Sacconaghi
Alexandra Lind Rose and Sara Ayres
Robert I. Grossman, MD, Lori Fink, James Speyer, MD, and William Carroll, MD
Basil Zirinis and Tiffany Dubin
Lindsey Pryor and Liz Peek
Gabrielle Bacon, Jackie Williams, and Tania Connery
Tyler Bracken, Amanda Starbuck, and Lindsay Bracken
Aerin Lauder and Marina Purcell
Mary Snow and Sara Ayres
Christopher Ohrstrom, The Duke of Devonshire
Tracy and Stanley Shopkorn
Larry Fink, Robert I. Grossman, MD, Dean and CEO NYU Langone, James Speyer, MD, and Ken Langone
Elbrun Kimmelman, Peter Kimmelman, and Giosetta Capriati
The Duchess of Devonshire, Caroline Kennedy, and Edwin Schlossberg
David Diamond, David Parker, Steve Rosen, Karen Zukowski, John E. Stern, and Sarah E. Lawrence
Arielle Lenza, Mark Messier, and Linda Giammona
Amy Griffin, Betsy Pitts, and Kristin Clark
Daniel J. Rusty Staub and Kevin E. Parker
James G. Brooks, Yann Coatanlem, and Trevor Potter
Carol Mack, Leslie Stephens, and Todd Romano
Robert Benmosche and Daniel J. Rusty Staub
Atmosphere
Claire Vinson, Philip Williams, Gene Williams, Jackie Williams, Francesca del Balzo, Harry Williams, Eugene Williams, and Lauren McGrath at The Boys' Club of New York's 64th Fall Dance.
Joseph Solari, Camilla Solari, Emily Boshart, and Tom Henry
Carol Alt and Linda Giammona with U.S. Military Volunteers
Al Pisa and Christina Murphy
Annabelle Fowlkes and Burwell Schorr
Edward Skyler, Arielle Lenza, and William Dawson, Jr.
Kenan Turnacioglu, PhD, James Speyer, MD, Lori Fink, Joshua Samuelson, and William Carroll, MD
Anson Beard, Dara O'Hara, Timothy O'Hara, and Veronica Beard
Linda Giammona with New York's Bravest
The Duke of Devonshire, The Duchess of Devonshire
Steve Brown, Laura Drexel, and Linda Rosario
Alonso Davila and Patricia Fuller
Salvatore Cassano, Stephen J. Dannhauser, and John Q. Doyle
Robert I. Grossman, MD, Dean and CEO NYU Langone, Billie Tisch, Philip Moskowitz, MD, Tom and Alice Tisch
Lindsey Coleman and Christopher Weekes
Jaime Morales, Dara O'Hara, Timothy O'Hara, and Sean Spellman
Gizem Dorter and Mark Weber
Robert I. Grossman, MD and Elisabeth Cohen, MD
Robert I. Grossman, MD, with Edward and Maya Manley
Giosetta Capriati and Peter Kimmelman
Allison Aston and Andrew Fry
Marina Kellen-French and Stella Sichel
Alexia Ryan, Helene Comfort, and Mary Snow
Jackie Williams and Mark Gilbertson
Lara Trafelet and Palmer O'Sullivan
Connie and Marty Silver
Benjamin Doller, Jay Cantor, Judy Price, and Peter Price
Mica Ertegun and Jack Shear
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Jay Brady (NYU)

Joel Miller, Zoe Miller, and Steve Miller
Sheri and Allan Benton
Sharee Stephens, Kate Prescott, Kiersten Page, and Emily Long
ERLC Exec. Dir. Kathleen Durham
Amanda Hearst
Holly Wentzel, Adam Stoeckel, and Jan Slifka
Jeff Pfeifle and David Granville
Photographs by AMNH/D. Finnin; PatrickMcMullan.com (God's Love).
More fun in the Glow Zone
Vincente Wolf and Margaret Russell
Bette Midler
Vice Chair Zibby Right with husband Andrew and children
Rebecca and Jon Bond
Adam Stoeckel and Holly Wentzel
Sheila Johnson and Della Britton Baeza
Lance Lepere, Bette Midler, Michael Kors, Karolina Kurkova, and Archie Drury
Is this tail real?
Theodora Richards, Patti Hansen, Alexandra Richards, and Molly Madden
Antonia Cohen, Michael Cohen, and Victoria Richardson
Brenda Neal and Honoree Leonard Kurz
Steve Simons, Blaine Trump, Lynda Carter, and Robert Altman
Cory Bond and Bekah Jenkins
A ferocious Cozy's Cuts dinosaur do
Medalists and Presenters with Exec. Dir. Kathleen Durham and Board Member Mary Jane Von Allmen
Orpheus bassist Jordan Frazier with Orpheus Board Chairman Marc Mayer and Meera Mayer
Calhoun Sumrall and Julie Einhorn
Another Bongor Biz stilt walker amuses children
Amy Millman, Rachel Sitz, Rosa Korhonen, and Nicole Grinsell
Jonny Moseley
Adam Lippes, Jessica Hart, and Derek Blasberg
Connie Steensma with composer Augusta Read Thomas
Karen Caldwell
Elisabeth Thieriot and Nune Worranuji
Patrick and Lara Verdonck
Alan Rodgers, Curtis Bashaw, and Robby Browne
Ann Selden, Elizabeth Healy, and Kathrine Fleming
Jo and Leslie Garfield
Patricia Keegan and Margot Slater
John Mason, Neal Rosenberg, Gutavo Monroy, Frank Germany, Jerry Jacobson, and David Terbeen
Tiffany & Co. Gem dig
Erin Heatherton
Lizabeth Newman
Barbara Callahan and Steven Krohn, Board President
Opening Night soloists Nathan Gunn, Sasha Cooke
Victoria Richardson and Leigh Wasson
Rev. Jennifer Linman, Rev. Mark Collins, Jeri Sedlar, Honoree Edward Cardinal Egan, Nancy Houghton, Bishop Andrew St. John, Rev. Boniface Ramsey, and Rev. Brenda Husson
Lauren Remington Platt
Doris Mack
Gala Co-chairs Nancy Carr and Jeri Sedlar
Paul Perlin, Julie Perlin, Susan Lindenauer, Art Lindenauer
Children meet Buddy from Jim Henson Company's Dinosaur Train
Chairman Allison Mignone with husband Roberto and children
Gillian Bleimann and Paige Crist
Karlie Kloss and Jessica Hart
Peter Buffett, Jennifer Buffett, and Elizabeth Lesser
Asia Baker, Claiborne Swanson Frank, and Vanessa Getty
Chairmen Carney and Melissa Hawks with children
Marguerite Yates, Hugh Hildesley, and Natalie Cacciato
David and Manuela Roosevelt
Mary White, Katharine Leech, Tara Stack, Nancy Chaffetz, Connie Steensma
Kathy Sloane and Cynthia Friedman
Nancy Brenner, Rachel Hoffheimer, Ashley Brenner
Betsy and David Rowe
Children color Lord & Taylor Butterfly Placemats
Shain Schley, Mary Ball, and Vijay Anand
Bongar Biz hula-hoops it up with kids in the Glow Zone
Laurie and Richard Brueckner
Claiborne Swanson Frank
Amy Cappellazzo, Terry Lundgren, Tina Lundgren, and Paul Wilmot
Lori Oscher, Stephanie Reiner, and Eleanor Willets
Giovanni Marie-Roper
Michele Goss and Paul Pelosi
Chanel Iman
Tyson Ballou and Barbara Fourneau
George Wade, Robert Livermore, Barbara Wade, Wendy Wade, Rev. Brenda Husson,and Pam Deane
Dana Wallach Jones and children
Tina Brown
Danielle Dineen, Kristen La Valle, David La Valle, and Kelly Fitzgerald
RJ King and Cory Bond
Chairman Rebekah Mercer and children
Medalists Peter Buffett, Jennifer Buffett, Muriel Siebert, Tina Brown, Sheila Johnson,and Joel Miller
Chloe Malle
Paul Pelosi, Christina de Limur, and Adrianna Pope Sullivan
RJ King, Dorian Grinspan, Elizabeth Von Thurn und Taxis, and Adam Lippes
2012 Family Party Chairmen. Bottom row : Jessica Murphy, Melissa Hawks, Zibby Right, Michelle-Marie Heinemann, Museum President Ellen V. Futter, Allison Mignone, Laura Whitman, Janet Boris, Robin Roberts, Kim Lippmann. Top row: Shaiza Rizavi, Alexandra Mondre, Ursula Corgan, Beth Kojima, Joella Lykouretzos, Jessica Marinaccio, Hannah An, Rebekah Mercer, Benedetta Casamento.
Vice-Chair Benedetta Casamento and Museum President Ellen Futter
Lisa Podos
Gwyneth Paltrow and Blaine Trump
Bongor Biz stilt walker greets partygoers
Children enjoy glowing tattoos
Anna Wintour and Bee Shaffer

Jim Luce and Barbara Carr
Jennifer Isham, Priscilla Rattazzi, Liza Lerner, and Susan Moss
Dr. Robert Wickham and Countess Nicholas Bobrinskoy
June and Paul Schorr
Elizabeth Jacoby and Tina Livanof
Mario Buatta
-Sergio Millerman, Malu Millerman, Donald Tober, and Barbara Tober
The Piaget table
Gabriel Rivera-Barraza, Maria Penacova, and Moises de la Renta
The Peggy Rockefeller Rose Garden
Janis Cecil, Andres Serrano, and Michele Gerber Klein
Co-Chairs Nonie Sullivan, Mary Davidson, and Jeanie Burn wearing Piaget
Chus Ezqerra, Fabrizio Arengi Bentivoglio, Fe Fendi, and Enrica Arengi Bentivoglio
Sherry Locherlaue, Kathy Edwards, and Emily Allen
Dara Mitchell and Mike Offit
Gloria Muller and Marianne Strong
Charlotte Moss and Mario Buatta
Mark McCarty and Fernanda Kellog
Shoshanna Lonstein Gruss
Hazel Cathers, Captain Eric Tausch, and Sue Tausch
Gianluigi and Adrianne Vittadini
Benny Tabatabai, Kristina Kovalenko, and Rebecca Rooney
Ann Rapp and Hunt Slonem
Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean
Julie and Nicholas Sakellariadis
Audrey Gruss, Ann Dexter Jones, and Jacqueline Weld Drake
Andrew Orshin and Michelle Smith
Jacob Zucker, Lizzi Bickford, Barbara Hemmerle-Gollust, and Gregory Beltrame
Susan Gutfreund
Sylvia Tosun Singing
CeCe and Lee Black
Jeanie and Harry Burn
Diane Ayala, Major General Juan G. Ayala, Dr. Robert Wickham, Kate Wickham, Louis Pedinoff, Jay Pedinoff, and Katie Gardner
Adrienne Vittadini, Gianluigi Vittadini, and Mercedes Levin
Marvin Scott, General David H. Petraeus, and Lorri Scott
Adam Smith and Liz Peek
Robert Rionda, Charlotte Moss, Roric Tobin, and Geoffrey Bradfield
Alison Chase, Mitzi Perdue, and David Christian
General David H. Petraeus and Ivan Obolensky
Bruce Bierman and Wendy Moonan
Patrick McMullan, Mary McFadden, and Edgar Batista
Amy Laurent and Sahel Golestan
Sahel Golestan
Sam Allen and Natalie Leeds Leventhal
Wilson and Eliot Nolen
Allison Bourke, Nonie Sullivan, Maureen Chilton, Jeanie Burn, and Mary Davidson
Roberto Pumarejo and Lilly Scarpetta
Ellen and Ian Graham
John Kluge and Arden Wohl
Carolina Alvarez Mathies and Angel Sanchez
Geoffrey Bradfield and Catherine Petree-Biron
Jeanne Jones
Tia Walker, Lizzi Bickford, and Barbara Hemmerle-Gollust
Catherine Petree-Biron and Tom Murro
Benjamin Patton and General David H. Petraeus
Mina Deutsch, Catherine Petree-Biron, and Amelia Meloni
General David H. Petraeus and Alison Chase
Jose Hernandez, Kevin McGovern, Chuck Scarborough, Dr. Judy Kuriansky, and John Skarin
General David H. Petraeus, and Margo and John Catsimatidis
Catherine Petree-Biron, Sahel Golestan, Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean, Amy Laurent, and Tom Murro
Susan Nagel and Mitzi Perdue
Maestro Igor Babailov and General David H. Petraeus
Hartley Rogers and Amy Falls
Chris, Hazel, Tristian, Jennifer, and James Cathers
Jeannie Pearman, Marvin Davidson, and Mary Davidson
Alexia Hamm Ryan, Jamee Gregory, and Mary Snow
Gigi Gabr, Shafik Gabr, Anna Haughton, and Pamela Fiori
Sigourney Weaver, Eleanora Kennedy, Shafik Gabr, and Gigi Gabr
Paula and Robert Gossett
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia and Cecile David-Weill
Michael Kennedy and Karen Klopp
Katie Tozer, Kamie Lightburn, Tara Wilson, and Rema Parachini
Emily Andren and Rod O'Connnell
Sydney Picasso, Ambassador John Loeb, Sharon Handler Loeb, and Wendy Vanderbilt
Jacqueline Weld Drake  addresses the crowd at Casita Maria's annual “Fiesta 2012.”
Melissa and Chappy Morris
Charlotte Moss and Harriet Weintraub
Lisa Klein  and Eleanora Kennedy
Rita Cosby and Tomaczek Bednarek
Cpt Russell Grant, Barbara de Portago, and General David H. Petraeus
Friederike biggs (right) and friends
Joseph Singer, Mish Tworkowski, and Jim Kloiber
Sarah Calderon, Daisha Rivas, and Foster Alcantara
Dr Annette Rickel ands Daisy Soros
Joan Siffert and Darryl 'DMC' McDaniels
Debbie Pipines and Barbara Harbach
Peter Kukielski with Maureen and Richard Chilton
John and Carmine Thain
Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean, Alan Meyers, Rocko, and Nick Cannon
Oliver James, Kiera Chaplin, Toni Lubetsky, and Paul Lubetsky
Stephanie van Hassel, Jacob Zucker, Barbara Hemmerle-Gollust, Gregory Beltrame, Lizzi Bickford, and Jason Canady
Lizzie and Jonathan Tisch
Mary and Robert McManus
Karen LeFrak and Margaret Russell
Duane Hampton and Edward Lee Cave
Dan Ladne, Judy Bliss, and Rick Perkins
Allison Aston, Jamee Gregory, Sigourney Weaver, Eleanora Kennedy, Anna Haughton, Charlotte Moss, Dr. Annette Rickel, Kamie Lightburn, Pamela Fiori, Mary Davidson, and Sloan Overstrom
Chris and Grace Meigher
John Loring
Nick Cannon and Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean
SSMAC's Junior Committee
Amy Hoadley and Melanie Holland
Amanda Essex, Alexandra Rose, and Victoria Vought
Richard and Kamie Lightburn
Ari and Coco Kopelman
Moises de la Renta, Ellie Rines, and Isabelle Edwards
Deeda Blair, Pierre Durand, Peter Lyden, and Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
IAna Ramos, Tony Bechara, Yaz Hernandez, and Patrick McMullan
Nonie and John Sullivan
Zita Davisson
Steven Stolman, Lauren Grushkin, and Louis Renzo
Marshall Watson and Lisa McCarthy
Polly Onet, Scott Snyder, and Audrey Gruss
Jamie Figg and Deeda Blair
Carlos Alvarez-Aranyos, Moises de la Renta, and Laurent Biron
Chris Meigher, Amanda Meigher, and Grace Meigher
Andrea Fahnestock and George Hambrecht
Laurie and Peter Grauer
The Sullivans
Memrie Lewis and Julia Utsch
Tom and Heather Leeds
Santiago Rodriguez and Jil Larsen
Kate and Dr. Robert Wickham
Victoria Leeds and Charles Jacoby
Christopher Mason
Mitzi Perdue, General David H. Petraeus, Major General Juan G. Ayala, and Robert McManus
Sigourney Weaver, Eleanora Kennedy, Craig Thompson, and Dr. Annette Rickeli
Kamie Lightburn, Michel Witmer, Sloan Overstrom, and Allison Aston
Lana Smith and John Kluge
Photographs by Annie Watt(Antiques Show, Military Ball, Casita Maria).
Ann Pyne, Jamee Gregory, and Betty Sherrill
Marianna and George Kaufman
Myrna Haft, David Wax, and Jieun Wax
Maureen and Richard Chilton and friends
Jean De Montaillou and Mary Davidson
Charlotte Moss, Adam Smith, and Pamela Fiori
Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean, Darryl 'DMC' McDaniels
Lizzi Bickford and Stephanie van Hassel
Deborah and Chuck Royce
Marvin and Mary Davidson
Laurent Biron and Catherine Petree-Biron
Martha and Peter Webster
Michael and Anna Safir
Alexis Zanbrano, Jesus Torres, Gabriel Rivera-Barraza, Moises de la Renta, Maria Penacova, and Laurent Biron

Jerry Ann Woodfin and Victor Costa
Brian d'Arcy James
Isabella Meisinger and Aso O. Tavitian
Daisy Prince
June Dyson, Irene Roosevelt Aitken, and Konrad K. Keesee
Barbara and James S. Reibel
Wes Gordon, Judy Dimon, and Paul Arnhold
Laurie Beckelman, Henry Urbach, and Robert Stern
Jill Newhouse and Thomas Denzler
EV Day and Ted Lee
Paula Zahn, Helen During, Honoree Henry Arnhold, and Helen Clark (former Prime Minister of New Zealand)
Henry Neville and David Patrick Columbia
Emily T. Frick and Robert L. Froelich
Lisa Dennison
James Reginato and Henry Urbach
Sheila and Robert F. Hoerle
Richard Thomas, Georgiana Bischoff, Oskar Eustis, and Oliver Platt
Paul Arnhold, Jody Arnhold (Benefit Chairman), Julia Arnhold, and Wes Gordon
John Bennett, Paola Antonelli, and Hilary Lewis
Laurie Eustis and Lewis Lapham
Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon, Michele Beiny Harkins, and Jeffrey H. Munger
Sidney R. Knafel, Andrea Woodner, and Londa Weisman
Dudley Johnson with Benefit Chairman Elizabeth Eveillard and Pauline Eveillard
Stephen Lash and Director Emerita Anne L. Poulet
Katherine Waterston, Ari Graynor, and Lapham's Quarterly Editor Lewis Lapham
John Garraty and Elise Frick
Henry Urbach and Beth De Woody
Elisabeth de Picciotto, Honoree Henry Arnhold, and Mary Ann Fribourg
Elisabeth de Picciotto and Ezra Zilkha
Rick Beinecke, Mary Phipps, and Candace Beinecke
Lisa Towbin, Bob Towbin, and Yves Istel
Patsy and Gobind Bulchandani (seated) with daughter Ayesha Bulchandani-Mathrani
Corinne and Etienne Breton in the Frick's galleries
Honoree Henry Arnhold speaks in the long West Gallery at the Frick Collection's Autumn Dinner.
Photographs by  Christine A. Butler and Mary Hilliard (Frick); Sandra Hamburg (Glass House)
Bryce Pinkham, Emily Young, and Justin Levine
Paul Fribourg and Elaine Wolfensohn
Francois Poulet and Inge Reist
Benefit Chairs Jean-Marie and Elizabeth Eveillard with Andrew Gundlach, Marina French, and Wolfram Koeppe
Vanessa and Pauline Black of The Four Graces winery
Aggie Gund, Henru Urbach, and Frank Stella
Laurie Eustis, Lewis Lapham, Kathleen Begala, and Yves Istel
Cheryl and Blair Effron
Richard Thomas
Jon Landau and Hester Diamond with a guest
Heath Calvert and Laurie Eustis
Scott Drevnig, Liz Diller, Henry Urbach, Hilary Lewis, Christy MacLear, Hunter Palmer, and Ric Scofidio
Lisa Phillips
Jerry Bogert with Susan and Keith Kroeger
Christine Schwarzman and Frick Deputy Director and Peter Jay Sharp Chief Curator Colin B. Bailey
Ayesha Bulchandani-Mathrani, Maureen Nash, David Goldman, and Sandeep Mathrani
Obi Odogwu and Mary Beth Mandanas
Sofia and Peter P. Blanchard
Benefit Chairmen Jody and John Arnhold
Henry P. and Susan Johnson with Michael Kellen
Cynthia Davidson, Guest, Harriet and Frank Stella, and Robert Stern
Heather McDowell Levin and Adam K. Levin
Susannah Hunnewell and Antonio Weiss with Frick Deputy Director and Peter Jay Sharp Chief Curator Colin B. Bailey
Chairman Margot Bogert, Director Ian Wardropper, and Director Emerita Anne L. Poulet
Effie and Robert Fribourg and Marie Nugent-Head Marlas and James C. Marlas
Pat and David J. Braga
Sarah McNear and Mark Schaffer
Hamish Linklater and Oliver Platt
Honoree Henry Arnhold receives commemorative Tiffany tray from Director Ian Wardropper
Ari Graynor, Katherine Waterston, and Emily Young
Katherine Waterston, Ari Graynor, and Emily Young performing
Patterson Sims and Paola Antonelli
Rob Nathan and Annie Sundberg
Peter Brant, Larry Gagosian, and Frank Stella

Judith Insell, Arturo O'Farrill, and Yvette L. Campbell
Tamara Tunie, Valerie Simpson, and Gregory Generet
Lisa and Richard Witten
Jamie Klein and friend
Michelle Fizer-Peterson and Lydia Carlston
Kelsey Goldsmith, Helen Shelton, and Lindsay Bubbico
Melvin van Peebles and friends
Christopher Williams and Janice Savin Williams
Susan Calhoun and Aileen Bruner
Felix Swing Band set the mood!
Heather Stastney, Yvonne Lynam, and Lauren Imperial
Pauline Reyniak, Giorgiana Magnolfi, Annabella Murphy, and Kim Shariff
Rye City Councilwoman Catherine Parker with her husband David Walker and Denise and Jim Richards
Bruce Gitlin and Bruce Neman
Harlem School of the Arts Advance Jazz Combo
Hamish Bowles and Juan Montoya
David and Jane Walentas
Carl and Barbaralee Diamonstein-Spielvogel with Steve Otis and Karen Keogh
Allison and Peter Rockefeller with Suzanne Clary and Cathy Rosenstock all in Great Gatsby attire
Dr. Henry Jarecki with Melvin Van Peebles and friend
Rona Sebastian and Mort Gleberman
Wendy Carduner and Muffie Potter-Aston
Karen LeFrak, Gillian Miniter, Susan Rudin, and Jennifer Rich
Mimi Magarelli, Rosanne Aresty, and Leigh Garry
Robyn Joseph and Kamie Lightburn
Olivier Theyskens and Marcia Mishaan
Kehinde Wiley and Russell Simmons
Sheri Babbio and Stacey Goneos
Rocco Landesman and Herb Alpert
Lydia Carlston and Mats Carlston
Arthel Neville
Jordan Hall
Hal Rubenstein and Fern Mallis
Walter Greene, Elinor Tatum, and Michael Feeney
Chef Kurt Gutenbrunner and Maximilian Josef Riedel
Zina Lang, Andy Smith, and Kay Booth
Scott and Caroline Wallach
Stefan Sagmeister
Allison Rockefeller marvels at the 1838 Mansion door which has been restored to its original dimensions and awaits a final coat of paint and installation in the Jay mansion
John Jay Medal honorees Barbaralee Diamonstein-Spielvogel (left) and Kitty Aresty (right) with Congresswoman Nita Lowey (center)
Julie Taymor, Maximilian Josef Riedel, Thomas Schutte, and Kehinde Wiley
Carl and Barbaralee Diamonstein-Spielvogel with Diana and Melvin Burruss
Juliana Terian
Larry and Sondra Salley with Suzanne Clary and Frank Sanchis
Photographs by Cuttty McGill (JHC).
Cathy Rosenstock and Warrie Price, President of the Battery Conservancy
Pratt Institute’s 125th Anniversary celebration at the Waldorf=Astoria.
Jeff Segall and Theresa Beyer
T.V. Carpio, Dana Fuchs, and Martin Luther McCoy
Glenda Bailey and Trudie Styler
Andrea Henderson Fahnestock and Nell Kleinschmidt
Mark Heimberger, Maya Lee, and Herb Alpert
Norma Dana, Anne Harrison, and Isabel Rattazzi
Karim Rashid
Pat and Fiona Kennelly
Richard and Emmy Klarberg, Rich Clary, and Janet and Lucien Burnett
Angela Kosinski and Erin Sinnott in flapper fringe and party paillettes
Jan Archer, John Jay Dubois and Sharon Dubois, and Steve Einstein
Maximilian Josef Riedel, Thomas Schutte, Arlene Dahl, and Marc Rosen
John and Jenny Hourihan Bailin
Student Performers
Rich Clary, Kitty Aresty, Ken Jenkins, Chairman of the Westchester County Board of Legislators, Suzanne Clary, and Steven Aresty
Casey Daurio, Karen Stone, and Steve Diskin
Kelsy Parkhouse
Gillian Miniter and Alvina Patel
Marcia Mishaan, Glenda Bailey, Trudie Styler, Anne Harrison, Carol Mack, and Peggy Siegal
The evening drew over 170 guests to see what's new at the 1838 Jay Mansion
Bill Moyers
Alina Cho
Bill and Linda Gordon with Karen and David Thomas
Anne Harrison and Doug Blonsky
Pamela Carlton and Charles J. Hamilton, Jr.
Barbara Warren, Yesim Philip, and Jennifer Carlston
John Jay Medal awardee and JHC Founder, Catherine "Kitty" Aresty (in red) with her husband Joe, daughter-in-law Rosanne, and son Peter
Mike Pratt
Gigi Mortimer and Jamie Tisch
Herb Alpert's award presentation
Mark Tallman and Christiane Seidel

Donna Moylan and Dr. Benjamin K. Chu
Jillian Gutman and Neil Grosscup
NJSO Interm President & CEO Susan Stucker with Mary Jo Sichak
Helen Blodgett
Marta and Fernando Nottebaum and daughter, Olivia
Steve Anderson and Christina Proscia
Marianne Veth and Chuck Veth
Carrie Dolan, Jason Birchard, and Tony Rotella
Alan Aviles, Dan Sisto, and Dr. Linda Brady
Marion and Willem deVogel
Pam Taylor, Eames Yates, Catherine Howard, and Taylor Pyne
Hayrides for the children
Louis Fair, Jr. and Blenda Wilson
Hilary and John Block
NJSO Opening Night Dinner
Jaime Sudberg, Becky Flammino, and Erica Koffler
Andy Kelleher, Ed Moslander, Kevin Nazworth, and Loris Eminente
Music Director Jacques Lacombe
Bonnie and Grant Uger
Carola Mack, Veronica Kelly, Eugene Kelly, and Veronica Kelly
Marie and the Hon. Micah Kellner with Elizabeth J. McCormack, recipient of the Distinguished Community Service Award
Everett Cook, and Judy and Russ Carson
Jan Nagel and Beverly Sloan
Janet Lacombe and NJSO Board Co-Chair Ruth C. Lipper
Robert and Judith Hall with Patricia Levinson
Patricia J. Wang and Karen Heller
Jeff Olsen, Amy Olsen, Tom Caputo, and Janet Caputo
Cocktails
Summer Brown
NJSO Board Co-chairs Stephen Sichak Jr. and Ruth C. Lipper with Music Director Jacques Lacombe and pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
Janet Lacombe with NJSO Principal Percussion David Fein
Elizabeth Saikia and ?
Summer Ellis, John Ellis, Mary Sunny McCoy, and Marion Meythaler
Rocky Reef Farm Pumpkins
Fernando and Marta Nottebohm
Dr. Harris M. Nagler, Martin D. Payson, and Dominick M. Stanzione
NJSO ECE VP Marshell Jones Kumahor with Melissa and Marlene Jean
Marion Meythaler, Sarah Klug, and Mary Sunny McCoy
Ragnar and Laureen Knutsen
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet with NJSO Chairman Emeritus Dr. Victor Parsonnet and his wife, Jane
Teresa Winans, Anna Winans, and Harry Chung
Soulymane Syibe and Stephen Hayek
Dr. Edgar and Harriette Mandeville
Photographs by www.AnnieWatt.com (Bowery); Fred Stucker (NJSO).
Brian Biles, Patricia Neuman, Jennifer Rentas, and Diane Rowland
Everett Cook, Marta Nottenbaum, Rebecca Seaman, and Tim Bontecou
Dr. Philip O. Ozuah, Ken Raske, Dr. Steven M. Safyer
Josh Kuriloff, recipient of the Special Tribute, with his wife, Amy, and son, Max
Catherine Cazes-wiley and friend
Saritha Gateau and Donna Woolridge
Ingrid Novak of the NJSO with David Huber, NJSO Trustee and CFO of Horizon Blue Cross Blue Shield of NJ, and his wife, Ellen
John J. and Ingrid Connolly
Paula Stark with composers Sarah Kirkland Sinder, Steven Mackey of Princeton University and Dr. Robert L. Aldridge of Rutgers University's Mason Gross School of the Arts
Interim NJSO President & CEO Susan Stucker (center) with Trustees Linda Bowden, Regional President of PNC Bank, and Gerald Appelstein
Jamey Nordby, Richie Horowitz, and Ed Morgan
Stephen M. Vajtay Jr., Michael Guariglia and NJSO Trustee Scott Kobler of McCarter English
Antoinette Cooper, NJSO Trustee and Director of US Private Banking and National Sales at TD Bank, with her husband, Lee Blair
Gail and Al Engelberg, Roger W. Ferguson, Jr., and J. Barclay Collins II
Kathleen Augustine, Marta Nottebaum, Everett Cook, Helen Blodgett, and Gloria Callen
L. Jablonowski, Reg Foster, and Sally J. Rogers
Fritz Henze, Chris Mailman, and Jim Mack
Jim Cornell, Larry Shapiro, and Tom Flexner
Oakleigh Thorne
Tahasha Impastato and Dick Impastato
Felicity Bontecou and Fernanda Kellogg
Linwood Oglesby of the Newark Arts Council, with Sharron Little of Prudential and guest
Cheryl Mitchell, Debbie Jonnes, and Jill Lamar
Craig and Gloria Callen
Joe Sano, Ed Morgan, and Father Francis
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibudet takes a bow after a private performance of Gershwin's "Embraceable You" for dinner guests
Dady family
Donna and Dick Verrilli
Whitney Blodgett and friend
Lee Perlman, Frank Cracolici, Beth Essig, and Dr. John W. Rowe
Mary Latimer Chung, Leo Schuster, and Judy Morgan
Steven and Kim Espinosa
Feli Thorne
Drs. Robert E. and Anna Kelly
Pam Doyle, Everett Cook, and Debbie Montgomery
Stephen Sichak Jr., NJSO Board Co-Chair and Senior VP at BD, with John Schreiber, President & CEO of NJPAC
Jessica and Peter Tcherepnine
The United Hospital Fund's 134th fund-raising campaign at the Waldorf.
Tom McDonald, Karen Salerno, Harmer Johnson, Paul Wolff, and Carol Wolff
Hugo Cassirer, Sarah Buttrick, and Max Goodwin
Nancy Hathaway
Music Director Jacques Lacombe with the NJSO and pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
Libet Johnson and CeCe Cord
Janice Ellig, Co-CEO of Chadick Ellig, with Michael Lipper
Nancy Henze, Noel Melhado, and Molly Schaefer
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet with guests Philip Crowley, Judy Orlando and John S. Tamagni
Peyrelongue Guerra family
Karen Davis, recipient of the Health Care Leadership Award; Jim Tallon; David Blumenthal; and NYS Commissioner of Health Dr. Nirav R. Shah
Mia and Jillian
Tim Bontecou, Barbara Tober, Pam Howard, and Jackie Drexel
Robyn Brenner, Executive Director of the Drumthwacket Foundation
Victoria Love Salnikoff and Jodi Dady
Tom Flexner, Max Goodwin, and Ottavio Serena
Everett Cook and Marta Nottebaum
Laurie-Anne Bentley and Blair Nordby
Josh Weston, NJSO Life Trustee, and his wife, Judy
Falconer Jennifer Pena, George Langa, Diandra Douglas, and Stacy Langa
Tom Flexner, Kathleen Augustine, Tim Bontecou, and Everett Cook
Roberta Renard of Renard Communications with pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
John Teal, Tim Bontecou, and Guest
Alexandra Nicklas and Sylvia Hemingway
Rina Desai, Dana Lutt, Michele Herbert, Mallory Sobel, and Marjorie Horne

Gaynor Rupert and Xander Ferriera
Lorne Herbert and Vicky Herbert
Helena Lehane and Geoffrey Bradfield
Whitney Douglas, Robert Douglas, and Claudia Overstrom
Gia in the Cathederal 1979
Bronson Van Wyck, Lydia Fenet, and Andrew Fry
Mario Buatta
Carol Mack, Amy Fine Collins, Lisa Fine, Mary Hilliard and Rachel Hovnanian
Tracy Snyder and Jamie Tisch
Jerry Applestein and Malinda Cloobeck
Chris Brown and Maud Ferrand
Joanne Moissiades and Suzanna Bowling
Gary Komarin and Karen Kelley
Eric Javits, Allison Rockefeller, Susan Henshaw Jones, (Museum Director), and Celerie Kemble
Valorie on the couch image with Erika Kapin
Denise Rich and Michele Herbert
Blair Husain and Chiara Edmands
Montana Thomas, Gary Springer, Richard, and Georgiana Thomas
Lauren Day Roberts and Lucia Hwong Gordon
Xander Ferriera and Hanneli Rupert
Kathy Prounis and Othon Prounis
Wilbur Ross and Hilary Geary Ross
Shafi Roepers
Heather Carrington and Carrie Maloney
Betsey Pitts and Simone Mailman
Joyce Brooks and Lorraine Cancro
Stewart Paperin, Lisa Firestone van Winterfeldt, Caspar van Winterfeldt
Ann Marie D'Angelo,Mimi Bermant Adler, and Cynthia Fischer
Walking the dog 1991
Judt Gilbert and John Wegorzewski
Virginia Tracy and Jennifer Kennedy
Patrick, Beth, and Jill McCaffrey with Rose Billings
Vance Kershner, Nancy Pearson, and Karl Krieger
Bartle Bull and Kathleen Vuillet
Judy Gilbert and Jeffrey Altshuler
Xiuli Meng and Aubrey Reuben
Thom Filicia, Cristina Greeven Cuomo, and Greg Calejo
Bill Manger and Martha Glass
Chris Riggi, Ron Riggi, and Larry Herbert
Artist Robert Farber
Amy Fine Collins and Daisy Olarte de Kanavos
Karon Cullen and Tom Dittmer
Stewart Sundlun, Joanne de Guardiola, Patricia Duff, and Roberto de Guardiola
Richard Kieler, Christain Zimmermann, and Alex Dube
Jill Roosevelt and Helen Lee Schifter
Mark Gilbertson and Carol Mack
The Herbert living room
Patricia Duff, Frederick Anderson, and Susan Magrino
Pat McCaffrey, Jeff Greco and Thomas Cook
Chris Moore and Liz Kelly
Claude Shaw and Lara Meiland Shaw
Lorne Herbert, Larry Herbert, Michele Herbert, Michele Riggi, and Chris Riggi
Enyinne Owunwanne, Sabah T Dweh-chenneh, Dawne Marie Grannum, Peter Jallah, and Folake Eniola
Museum of the City of New York's  "New York After Dark."
Margery Koven and Jay Koven
Marco Scarani, Emel Zilek, Teresa Colley, and Bruce Colley
Patricia Perlmuth, Anthony Kane, and Susan Kane
Amanda Espy and Alexandra Hack
Ramona Singer, Gabe Nies, Jacqueline Segura, and Susan Dunne
Ron Riggi and John Falk
Jake Bright
David Jack and Brendalyn Stempel
Laura Nicklas and Brent Nicklas
Anna Ivlieva
Richard Wiese, Nicci Wiese, and Dominick Salvatore
Mark Badgley and James Mischka
Anka Palitz and Carl Hewitt
Marianne Lafiteau and Henri Barguirdjian
Steve Jensen and Kevin Laue
Alex Kuczynski, Caspar van Winterfeldt, and Lisa Firestone van Winterfeldt
Sara Herbert Galloway and Andrea Warshaw Wernick
Lindsey and Reed Coleman
Jennifer Creel
Natalie Leeds Leventhal and Christian Leone
Tiffany Moller, Jennifer Creel, and Amanda Taylor
Richard Kielar and Dr. Susan Krysiewicz
Peggy and Alberto Mejia
Seeing Montana 1993
Sam Dangremond and Stefanos Kasselakis
Muffie Potter Aston and Mark Gilbertson
James Coleman and Cynthia Ott
Gary Springer and Errol Rappaport
Jeff and Ashley McDermott
Somers Farkas
Alexia Hamm Ryan, Mary Snow, and Helene Comfort
Michelle Rella,Michele Herbert, Michele Riggi, Chris Riggi, Denise Rich,Madhu Ruia, and Alisa Roever
Lee Glantz performs
Rena Desai and Madhu Ruia
Errol Rappaport, Ulrika  RED  Nilsson, and Robert Farber
Running Horses 1989
Lucia Hwong Gordon
Larry Herbert, Stewart Wicht, and Michele Herbert
Dana and Tom McGovern
Andrea Warshaw and Joel Wernick
Krista Krieger, Karl Krieger, Anita Sorensen Wallace, Konrad Krieger, and Katherine Krieger
Frances Schultz, Bill Smith, and Nina Griscom
Richard Thomas and John Wegorzewski
Andrea Warshaw Wernick and Gary Swanson
Chosan Nguyen in front of Hollywood 1982
Joe Sirola and Laurie Krotman
Annelise Peterson and Lesley Schulhof
Claire Carter and Cynthia Fischer
Allison Rockefeller, Eric Javits, and Celerie Kemble
Ann Marie D'Angelo, Nina Loory, Anka Palitz, and Michele Riggi
Tom Bell and Anka Palitz
Caroline and Tom Dean
Empire Diner 1979
Fernando Gentil, Lisa Gentil, Gabriella Gentil, and Fernando Jr. Gentil
Elizabeth de Kergorlay and Gilles Bensimon
Peter Nicholson, Jerry Applestein, and Carla Uzel
Photographs by www.AnnieWatt.com (Africa); Rob Rich (Jump for Joy).
Lorraine Cancro, Errol Rappaprt and Sara Herbert Galloway
George and Louise Monyemangene
Laurie Krotman and Susan Shattuck
Sara Ayres
Elizabeth Lacause, Melanie Brown, Marsha Wallace, and Lauren Gorden
Nicole Mellon
Jamee and Peter Gregory
Paola Rosenshein and Arnold Rosenshein
Grymes Cannon, Michelle Rella, Troy Curtis, and Lorne Herbert
Carrie Mackin and Noel Kurdi
Brooke Milstein, Tom Shiah, and Patricia Shiah

Shoshanna Gruss
Tom Cahill, Larry Gagosian, and Jeff Koons
Shelley Halperin, Stanley Kreitman, and C. B. White
Ellen Arthur, Bonny Rosen, Joan Diamond Panetz, and Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg
Kim Mimran, Adam Glassman, and Carolyn Angel
Marie-Josee Kravis and Patti Harris
Laura Nicklas and Kathleen Ryan
Tania Higgins, Gabrielle Bacon, Mary Snow, and Amanda Taylor
Lisa Salomon and Jo Hallingby
Natalie Leeds Leventhal and Maria Giulia Maramotti
Stavros Niarchos, Jessica Hart, and Alberto Mugrabi
Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg
Grace Fuller, Montana Coady Albrecht, and Cynthia Smith
Richard Roob, Tom Cahill, Agnes Gund, and Vito Schnabel
Christine De Lisle, Ken Kline, and Dolores Barclay
Stan Rumbough, Anki Leeds, and Philippe Bigar
Nancy Silberkleit
Paula Hunnicutt, Hilary Block, and Susan Dunrovich
Wendy Sarasohn and John Yunis
Erana Stennett, Susan Friedman, and Jay Kriegel
Adam Glassman and Marjorie Gubelmann
Chrissy Erp and Dorothy Lichtenstein
Byron and Sylvia Lewis
Will McDonough, Bettina Bryant, Darren Walker, and Carrie Mae Weems
Saundra Parks and Dr. Bert Peterson
Clifford Ross and Kate Levin
Donna Rosen, Lawrence Benenson, and Babette Rittenberg
Star Jones and B Michael
Ronald Lauder
Hayley Bloomingdale, Max Jones, and Indre Rockefeller
Kate Allen and Dara O’Hara
Nicole Gallo, Pat Lazak, Lindsay Maas, and Jay Paavonpera
Patti Harris, Sarah Arison, Agnes Gund, and Lisa Perry
Natalie Abatemarco and Anjelica Mantikas
Anne Bass
Andrew Flach and Jessica Burstein
Emery Westfall and Carol Beladora Westfall
? and Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg
Bill Susman, Sarah Weeks, Todd Bishop, and Emily Glasser
Hannah Griffin, Joscacia Reyneke, and Ely Turrietta
Caroline Dean, Dennis Basso, and Vera Wang
Margo Langenberg, Jon Nagel, and Susan Nagel
Gene Thompson and Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg
Robert Wagner and Jill Wagner
Elizabeth Kujawski and Ann Temkin
Valerie Rooks and Mika Sterling
Patricia Weeks and Jamie Connor
Alexis Thomas, Francis Kairson, and Stephanie Palmer
Brie Bythewood and Alicia Bythewood
Caroline Kennedy and Joel Grey
Yvonne Force Villareal, Sandra Lozano, and Dorothy Lichtenstein
Tia Walker, Jay Moorhead, and Leah Rumbough
Kate Doerge and Shoshanna Gruss
Ferebee Taube, Eleanor Ylvisaker, Courtney Corleto, and Shoshanna Gruss
DPC and David Applebaum on camera at Kykuit.
Carolyn Brown, Abenna Abboa-Offei, and Brendalyn King
Rochelle Ohrstrom
Vito Schnabel and Jemima Kirke
Ashley Wotiz, Melissa Meister, and Shoshanna Gruss
Stefan Kassel and Sam Dangremond
Frank Lautenberg and Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg
Mary Kate Olsen and Vito Schnabel
Martha Stewart, Marshall Cohen, Dorothy Lichtenstein, and Agnes Gund
Lulie Gund and Susannah Gund
Justine Koons, Marie-Josee Kravis, and Jeff Koons
Martha Stewart and Joe Mimran
David Mugrabi, Richard Sachs, and Libby Mugrabi
Michael Paniccia and Richard Andrews
Saundra Cornwell and Nina Cooper
Amanda Meigher, Allison Aston, and Joanna Baker de Neufville
Laura McCloy and John J. McCloy
Gene Thompson, Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg, Yigal Ozeri, and Lois Robbins
Carolyn Brown and Lloyd Brown
Leah Rumbough and Cole Rumbough
Sylvia Weisman, Adam Sabella, and Laura Sabella
Andrew Zaro, William Turen, and Fred Fish
Tamara Sandy, Rachel Hovnanian, and Darren Walker
Jean Shafiroff, Kathryn Chenault, Star Jones, and Alicia Bythewood
Michael Anthony Pegues, Carl Sylvestre, Brooke Laing, and Lindsay Menon
Christine Biddle and Christine Schott
Anne Niemeth, Chuck Niemeth, Edith Simpson, and Sharon Simpson
Tree Williams, James Reynolds, and Carrie Mae Weems
Ian Griffiths and Laura Lusuardi
Photographs by www.AnnieWatt.com (Mission); PatrickMcMullan.com (Studio).
Catherine Gund, Graham Gund, and Ann Gund
Aby Rosen and Mary Snow
Dr. Annette Rickel and Maria Giulia Maramotti
Blair Husain, Chiara Edmands, and Sloan Overstrom
Karen Gantz and Gail Engelberg
Mary Amor
Annie Taube, Bobby Graham, and Liz Manley
Michael Paniccia, Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg, and Judy Glickman
Ben Jordan, Cynthia Smith, Montana Coady Albrecht, Kelly Connor, and James Reed Hague
Emilia Fanjul, Joanna Baker de Neufville, Cynthia Smith, Dr. Annette Rickel, and Maria Giulia Maramotti
Kathalynn Davis and Kathy Boyle
Kendall Hague and James Reed Hague
Caroline Kennedy and Will McDonough
Natalie Hiscer, Dawn Sterling, Amir Benesh, and Tijana Skendzic
Richard Frankel, Shai Baitel, and Gene Thompkins
Jean Shafiroff, Dawne Marie Grannum, and Miriam Weisbecker
Tom Cahill, Caroline Kennedy, Vito Schnabel, Agnes Gund, Samantha Boardman Rosen, Jeff Koons, and Joel Grey at Studio in a School's 35th Anniversary Gala.
Sena Demir and Rachel Moseson
Anne Huntington and Elizabeth Kurpis
Natasha Elkon, Dick Glasebrook, and Claudia Demonte
Bronson van Wyck and Sarah Arison
English actress Sienna Miller arrives.
Teresa Prioli, on-camera reporter with Fox Five television.
The Dreamy iced coffee at Sylvester & Co. on Main Street in Sag Harbor.
Janet Lehr and Vered. As I was arriving, Janet and Vered were just leaving a showing of a Holocaust film.
Lana Iny, HBO media relations.

The fall golden light during Friday afternoon's sunset created a striking aura.
HIFF's honorary chairman Alec Baldwin. He is also the vice-chairman of the HIFF Board of Directors.
Joan Copeland, sister of Arthur Miller and Marilyn Monroe's sister-in-law, has a moment at the Ann Roth tribute.
Cynthia Wade, award-winning director and co-producer of Mondays at Racine, a fascinating HBO documentary about an Islip hair salon that opens the third Monday of every month to take care of the hair needs for chemotherapy patients.
At The Drawing Room, 66 Newtown Lane, Jennifer Bartlett's paintings on handmade mulberry paper, 7 October – 29 October 2012.
HIFF sponsors.
Unmistakably Bruce Weber.
Alexa Ammon and Greg Ammon. A decade after the devastating deaths of their adopted parents, and with much of their father's more than $75 million fortune gone, the Ukrainian-born twins clearly have relied on each other to survive. Adopted in 1992, their mother filed for divorce in 2000. The following year, Generosa Ammon moved into The Stanhope Hotel with her boyfriend electrician Danny Pelosi, triggering a series of events that led to the murder of Ted Ammon.
The Maidstone, Main Street, East Hampton. Press headquarters.
On the veranda, Pat Swinney Kaufman, executive director of the New York State Governor's Office for Motion Pictures and Television and secretary of the HIFF board, Lacy Davisson Doyle, and Joe Carroll.
Legendary costume designer Ann Roth arrives at Guild Hall to receive her award.
Hilaria Baldwin and Richard Gere.
Liz Garbus, the director of Love, Marilyn, the festival's opening film, shares thoughts with local personality Cognac Wellerlane.
Photographs by Augustus Mayhew.
Ann Roth shows her handbag memorializing her many award-winning costume creations to actor Nathan Lane.
Clockwise from top left: Richard Meier; Boyd Holbrook; James Lipton. "You have to stay in the tent ... get back in the tent," said one the security crew when I took one step outside of it to snap Mr. Lipton as he trudged up the rocky drive; Trudie Styler.
Leslie Iwerks, director of Citizen Hearst. I hoped for a more historical account of WR Hearst rather than a corporate-boasting film best shown at a shareholders annual meeting.
Tiffany Malloy, a junior publicist with the Frank Public Relations office who could not have been more professional and courteous.
In The Maidstone's garden.
"These are my clouds," said Mary Jane Brock about her sculptural topiary at the front entrance to her East Hampton home where we joined her for the spectacular afternoon sunset.
Sean Baker, director of the film Starlet.
Grenning Gallery, Sag Harbor. The gallery is featuring the recent paintings of Richard Fenske.
The flash mob.
And yet another choreographed ensemble group photo.
Nathan Lane and Ann Roth have a moment with Oscar.
Mary Jane Brock and Lacy Davisson Doyle.
Howard "Hawk" Koch Jr., president of the Academy of Motion Pictures Arts and Sciences.
The arrival of two black SUVs must mean Variety's Top Ten has arrived.
At Vered on Park Place in East Hampton, the current exhibition is "Needful Things."
Maidstone, lobby.
Co-founder and chairman of the Hamptons International Film Festival Stuart Suna and Liz Garbus.
The Baldwins chatting with publicist Tiffany Malloy.
2012 HIFF Honorary Chairman actor Alec Baldwin and yoga aficionado Hilaria Baldwin. Mr. Baldwin is also the vice-chairman of the Film Festival's board of directors. Many press members were discussing Mr. Baldwin's invigorating look.
The actors receive some direction before the photo op. The actors are, left to right, Domhnall Gleeson, Boyd Holbrook, Nate Parker, Bella Heathcote, Elyas M'Barek, Alicia Vikander, Scoot McNairy, and Adam Driver.
The red carpet at Guild Hall. With such notable sponsors, I was expecting a bit more for production values. The festival successfully stressed East Hampton's local small-town approach.
A few moments with the Baldwins in front of the cameras.
Our hosts, Stuart Sun and his wife Vicki Match Suna, with the family.
Callie Bundy, Star Watch on-camera reporter.
Gregg Ammon appeared to be closely monitored by his agent Morgan Ressa, a Los Angeles account executive with pmk+bnc.
Judith and Rudy Giuliani share a moment with Cognac Wellerlane.
Meryl Streep.
Alec Baldwin, Hilaria Baldwin, and Richard Gere.
Richard Gere. "I never get used to this, being blinded by all these lights," said Gere, as several hundred flash bulbs strobed for several minutes.
Mike Nichols enjoys a lite moment.
Alec Baldwin arrives. "He's changed," said one of the press members, commenting on Alec Baldwin's revitalized appearance. "Yoga, or maybe the haircut," I speculated. Hilaria Baldwin (right) wonders, too.
First Presbyterian Church. Main Street, East Hampton.
The guacamole and shrimp tacos were as wonderful as ever.
Elie Tahari's extraordinary shop on Main Street is a sublime architectural marvel.
The Maidstone Inn.
Intuition II is among the few yachts left in the harbor.
Cynthia Sansone and Rachel DiMalfetto, sisters who are the stars of Mondays at Racine. Bravo!
Founder and CEO of the UNEAC Entertainment Group, the 20-year-old Mr. Ammon is at work on Enemy of the People, a feature film based on Ibsen's play. Mr. Ammon worked on 59 Middle Lane for two years.
"A Fine Late May." Robert Dash, artist. Oil on canvas. 71" x 60". $35,000. Birnam Wood Gallery. 48 Park Place, East Hampton.
Bruce Weber arrives.
The Maidstone Inn, not quite the Beverly Hills Hotel, on one of October's most beautiful days.
Suna residence, Buckskill Road. Once again, I was quarantined in the press tent and not invited/permitted to actually attend the party. A bit of a crush in the press tent without circulating air and water for nearly two hours, as burly security guards in tight-fitting suits took their tasks quite seriously ("Stay in the tent ... you must stay within the tent ...) while small herds of industrious PR flacks kept a hectic pace. Another really lovely unforgettable first-class experience being handled by professionals.
East Hampton's gilded orphan twins Alexa Ammon and her brother Greg Ammon attended Friday night's opening of 59 Middle Lane, a documentary film produced and directed by Greg Ammon. The film follows the scandalous aftermath of the 2001 murder of their adopted father investment banker Ted Ammon, reportedly the first Hamptons homicide in two decades, the death of their adopted mother Generosa Ammon, the murder conviction of their stepfather Danny Pelosi, and the parentless waifs' journey back to the Ukraine where they discover their biological parents.
Festival chairman Stuart Suna, co-owner of Silvercup Studios.
Work in progress, Parrish Art Museum. Herzog & de Meuron, architect.
Michelle Wolf, store manager of the Elie Tahari boutique in East Hampton.
Clockwise from top left: Rosanna Scotto; Alina Cho; Dree Hemmingway.
Rand Stoll, an HIFF board member.
Nathan Lane, Ann Roth, Hilaria Baldwin, and Alec Baldwin.
Carrie Ann Salvi, East Hampton Star staff reporter.
Hilaria Baldwin slips into more comfortable shoes.
Click here for NYSD Contents

Gala Co-Chairman and Trustee Ann Ziff, Tim Jessell, and Trustee Renée Fleming
Trustee Laura Pomerantz
Mary Davidson and Melanie Holland
Judy and Larry Schlager
Sylvester and Gillian Miniter
Alexa Hampton and Ellie Cullman
Tim Cook, Brian Greeley, Tanzeen Syed, Aaron Goldman, Jonathan Gurwitz, and Dale Yates Berg
Lisa Klein and Brooke Milstein
Elaine Wolfensohn and Trustee Marilyn Horne
Photographs by Julie Skarratt & Chris Lee (Carnegie Hall); Frank Rocco/www.AnnieWatt.com(Holiday House); Sylvain Gaboury /PatrickMcMullan.com (Leviev).
Courtney Arnot, Claudia Overstrom, and Maria Villalba
Eleanora Kennedy and Kate Pickett
Gillian Segal, Justine Stamen Arrillaga, Stacey Reiss, Amy Waldman, and JJ Ramberg
Bianca Jagger and Anna Safir
Frank Famiglietti, Anne Brennan, and Harry Packman
Bruce and Suzie Kovner
Donna Stearns and Alicia Daniels
Danielle Dankner, Iris Dankner, and Jay Dankner
Iris Dankner and friends
Gary Parr and Maestro Alan T. Gilbert
Gail Hilson and Anne Sitrick
Trustee Dennis Nally and Karen Nally
Stephen Javares and Meagan Kennally
Robert Reeder and Chris Lanning with TEAK Fellows
Iris Dankner and Christopher Hyland
Yann Barin and Chloe Malle
Gala Chairman and Trustee Oscar de la Renta and Sarah Jessica Parker
Joan Weill, Linda Lindenbaum, Clive Gillinson, Chairman Sanford I. Weill, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, and Commissioner Kate D. Levin
David Klein and Myra Biblowit
Eleanora Kennedy, Ghighi Vittadini, and Adrienne Vittadini
David and Lisa Klein
Ghighi Vittadini, Pamela Fiori, and Michael Kennedy
Robyn Kurgeman and Paul Raps
Aslahan Sabanci
Paul Raps, Mary Davidson, Gene Pearman, David Klein, and Lisa Klein
Baritone Audun Iversen sings Carmina Burana with Maestro Riccardo Muti and the Chicago Symphony Orchestra and Chorus
Matthew Abbott, Brian Lavin, and D. Gordon Cruess
Justine Stamen Arrillaga, Marco Tablada, and Alyssa Tablada
Dr. Annette Rickel, Peter Pennoyer, and Jeannie Conway
Julie Green, Sara Snell, Connor Fusselman, and Kyle Davis
Maestro Riccardo Muti and the Chicago Symphony Orchestra
Livinia Snyder, Anna Safir, Michael Kennedy, and Catherine Carey
Tina Lundgren, Trustee Terry Lundgren, Sarah Jessica Parker, Trustee Robert Kraft, Ricki Lander, and Chairman Sanford I. Weill
Nazee Moinian
Trustee Judy Zankel and Geoffrey Colvin
John Yunis, Wendy Sarasohn, Kamie and Richard Lightburn
Bianca Jagger
Sallie Giorbano and Susan Calhoun
Jane Pontarelli and Mary Bryant McCourt
Brett Beldock
Sasha Cohen and Tina Lundgren
Dr. Annette Rickel and Anne Shelly Clarke
Beth Brenner,Kinga Lampert,Thom Filicia, and Myra Biblowit
Joan Dineen, Deborah Bowden, and Susanne Eason
Stephanie Menezes and Justine Stamen Arrillaga
Lynn Sorensen, Henry McVey, and Anne Brennan
Gala Co-Chairmen and Trustee Peter May and Leni May with Bill Cunningham
Carnegie Hall's 2012–2013 season opening night gala dinner in the Grand Ballroom at The Waldorf-Astoria.
Jaime Jimenez
Harry Heissman and Susanna Salk
Robert S. Kaplan, and Gillian Segal
Trustee Burton Resnick, Judy Resnick and guests
Dr. Annette Rickel, Lindsey Pryor, and Robyn Joseph
Allison Aston, Kamie Lightburn, and Lisa Klein
Roric Tobin, Iris Dankner, and Geoffrey Bradfield
Jane Schwartz
Randy Winn and Harry Packman
Henry McVey and John Britton
Grace Meigher and Mary Davidson
Tricia Salerno, Stephanie Hamburger, and Katherine Minster
Colleen Foster, Simon Park, and Anne Brennan
Richard Mishaan
Clive Gillinson, Michael Nelson and Carnegie Hall Chairman Sanford I. Weill unveil Breguet's new lobby clock
John Dunchick, Bill Okun, Jason Redlus, and Randy Winn
Charles Pavarini III and Inson Dubois Wood
Lilliana Cavendish and Geoffrey Bradfield
Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Barbara Walters, and Barry Diller
Marie-Josée and Henry Kravis
Jeanne Sorensen Siegel, Marilyn Sorenson, and Ms. Flom
Liz Hilpman with TEAK Alumna Cheryl Morris
TEAK Alumni Tarun Dani and Jia Ying Mei
Joyce Romanoff
Christina Juarez and Thom Filicia
Eric Sobotka and Karan Ahooja
Clive Gillinson, Congresswoman Carolyn B. Maloney, and Sanford Weill
Adam El Hout, Harry Daniell, and Pierre Berardo
Marc Mezvinsky and Chelsea Clinton
Ben Fooshee, David Niles, Russell Boggess, Shaker Kayatt, and Lloyd Byrne
Leonard Lauren and Ally Coulter
Athena Liu and Elizabeth Kurpis
Jennifer Skoda,Tori Mellott, and Don Schermerhorn


Maggie Betts
Rachael Kun, Tim Morehouse, Noella Coursaris Musunka, and James Masters
S. Menon, Rachna Meitra, Kirin Mahendro, Nita Raj, and Rita Singh
Nicola Lewis, A.J. Storinge, Sangha de Nardis, and Mainardo de Nardis
Natalie Barak and friend
H.E. Mrs. Irene deThalassinós,  H.E. Mrs. Ban Soon-taek, H.E. Mrs. Odeta Nishani, H.E. Mrs. Marta Linares de Martinelli, Mrs. Suzanne Wright, H.E. Mrs. Penehupifo Pohamba, H.E. Mrs. Deolatchmee Ramotar,  and H.E. Mrs. Eloise Gonsalves
H.E. Mrs. Amina Namadi Sambo, spouse of the vice president of Nigeria, with Suzanne Wright, co-founder of Autism Speaks
Jay Lehman and Sally Morgan Lehman
Nadine Ali and Irum Hasan
Alex and Valerie Twerdahl with Museum Curator Mark Norell
Madyha Farooqui, Madhuri Parson, and Aliya Khan
Anne Cook, Jane Dresner Sadaka, and Lynn Halbfinger
Sol Kjok and Hilde Marstrander
Alexander Gilkes, Bevin Butler, and Alex Adler
Mike Lake, Member of Canadian Parliament and son Jaden Lake, who has autism
Andrew Flug and Paulette Fox
Allan Buchman
Nancy Poses
inside Haunch of Venison for The Drawing Center's Annual Auction 2012.
Jaishri Kapur and Neelum Amin
Cameron Shay
Neelum Amin, Mona Sinha, and Gavin Berger
Amy Goodman
Marie Wilson
Sabyasachi Mukherjee, Nuchi Currier, and Bill Currier
Merrill Mahan, Rhiannon Kubicka, Brett Littman, Candace Worth, and Stacey Goergen
Emilio Steinberger, Emma Hall, Mililani Trent, and Aaron Baldinger
Lang Pew and Warrie Price
Ubah Hassan
Candice Mabey, Barbara Bulletti Newman, and Francine Wolterbeek
Usha Saxena and Aparna Tambar
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; R. Mickens (AMNH).
Sting sings at Cinema For Peace New York
Waqas Wajahat and Elizabeth Scwartz
Rajan Singh, Salman Amin, Ravi Sinha, and Mkrini Vasam
Anika Taylor and Philae Knight
Wendy Diamond and Roxanne Mankin Cason
Nina Katchadourian and Deanna Lee
Neelum Amin and Aasiya Arif
Blair Voltz Clarke and Stacey Goergen
Varun Narendra, Dharanjit Kumar, Sudhanshu Narendra, and Divya Narendra
Natalie Frank
Lynne Cherry and Olivia Bolar
Ellie Rines, Alex Glauber, and Begum Yasar
Neelum Amin, Rasika Reddy, Gavin Berger, and Preethi Krishna
Tina Lutz and Rhiannon Kubicka
Kara Vander Weg and Candace Worth
Tim Morehouse and Rachael Kun
Steering Committee member Joseph Cavanaugh and Kate Deming with Steering Committee member W. Jameson McFadden and Aimee Schreiner
Faith Hope Consolo and Joseph Aquino
Cheyenne Jackson
Linda Holiday, Angeli Gian, Ali Naqvi, and Adam Sharaff
Annalise Goldberg and Inka Essenhigh
Stacey Tisdale, Mike Woods, and Wendy Diamond
Anu Singh and Angeli Gian
Jaka Bizilj, Amy Goodman, Sting, Jessye Norman, Trudie Styler, Thomas Kipp, Allan Buchman, and Noella Coursaris Musunka
Simi Ahuja and Shilpa Sanger
Courtney Coleman and Bill Brockschmidt
Professor Saima Wazed Hossain with  H.E. Madame Ilham Hussein, first lady of the Maldives
Outside Haunch of Venison
Hans-Jürgen Beerfeltz
Co-chairs Zachary and Lori Pomerantz
Nushima Khokhar, Maheen Khokhar, Niti Walia, Santha Reddy, and Pratibha Reddy
Shannon and Brett Wheeler
Jessye Norman
From left to right, Mr. Bob Wright (co-founder of Autism Speaks), Ms. Katie Wright (daughter of co-founders of Autism Speaks), H.E. the first lady of the Maldives Madame Ilham Hussain, Mr. Mike Lake and Jaden Lake, Her Excellency the wife of the Vice President of Nigeria Mrs. Amina Namadi Sambo, H.E. the wife of the minister of foreign affairs of Turkey Mrs. Sare Davutoglu, H.E. the first lady of Panama Mrs. Marta Linares de Martinelli, H.E.the spouse of the foreign minister of Serbia Mrs. Natasa Jeremic, H.E Mrs. Ban Soon-taek (wife of UN Secretary-General), Ms. Saima Wazed Hossain (daughter of prime minister Bangladesh), H.E. the prime minister of Bangladesh Sheikh Hasina, Her Excellency the first lady of Guyana Mrs. Deolatchmee Ramotar, Mrs. Suzanne Wright (co-founder Autism Speaks), Her Excellency the spouse of the prime minister of St. Vincent and the Grenadines Mrs. Eloise Gonsalves, H.E. Dr. Liri Berisha spouse of prime minister of Albania,  Her Excellency the first lady of Namibia Mrs. Penehupifo Pohamba, HE the first lady of Albania Mrs. Odeta Mishani (front row), and HE the spouse of the prime minister of Croatia Mrs. Sanja Music
Will Cotton, Rose Dergan, Michele Oka Doner, and Inka Essenhigh
Rasika Reddy, Girish Reddy, Rita Singh, Manoj Singh, and Devin Sharman
Alexander Gilkes leads the auction
Kate Shepard and David Humphrey
David Mann and Fritz Karch
Candace Worth, Pat Steir, and Brett Littman
Stacey Goergen, Brett Littman, and Brooke Shields
Vaihari Patel and Jyoti Menon
Claudia Overstrom
Junior Council members enjoy cocktails in the Hall of Mexico and Central  America
Stacey Goergen, Suzanne Cochran, and Pam Goergen
Iris Marden and Thomas von Lintel
Peter Thum
Jaka Bizilj
Asmita Bhatia, Naresh Nagia, Greta Nagia, Ameet Goyal, and Alka Goyal
Meriwether and Tanner Powell
H.E. Sheikh Hasina, prime minister of Bangladesh
Shonda Hornbeck and Lynne Cherry
Eric Goode and Miye McCullough
Sri Reddy and Vani Birnbaum
Joyce Krawiecki and Nicole Gallo
Joe Berlinger, Trudie Styler, Sting, and Hans-Jürgen Beerfeltz
Noella Coursaris Musunka
Joe Berlinger and Trudie Styler
Halla Schlub and James Salomon
Frederick Doner and Joost Elffers
Jay, Rasika, and Sri Reddy
Asmita Bhatia, Victor Menezes, Tara Menezes, Dyvia Rajaraman, and Hans Taparia

Nancy Seltzer, Dr. Howard Fillit, and friend
Honorary Corporate Chair Pamela Codispoti and Irina Prokhorova
Choreographer Garth Fagan
Layla Khosrovani and Sasha Leviant
Actress Anna Kendrick and her brother Michael
Carol Launer and James Moe
Patricia Herrera, Erica Hertell, and Ana Maria de la Ossa
Mark Rosen and Arlene Dahl
Leonard Lauder, Mel Goodes, Nancy Goodes, David Goodes, and Melanie Caceres
Pierre Durand, Amy Fine Collins, and Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Jef Cohen, George Reithoffer, Karen Johnson, and Michael Robinson
Selden Illick, Christopher Illick, Jodie Eastman, and John Eastman
Silvia Zonana and Sharon Bush
Wynton Marsalis and Garth Fagan
Nada Jain, Sharon Sager, and Gane Galasso
Maggie Simmons, Barbara Doyle, and Mary Rose Taylor
Inmaculada de Habsburgo and Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Alice Shure, Kathryn Steinberg, and Sarah Good
Jessica Cohen, Conchita Tucker, Rachel Lane, and Maria Testani
Linda Sanders and Helena Wong
Jean Shafiroff and Michelle Gerber-Klein
Nancy Corzine, Alison McCall, Peter Eliel, and Debra Krulewitch
Kathryn Steinberg, Alice Shure, and Bette-Ann Gwathmey
Llewellyn Miller, Kevin Ryan, and Kate Pasik
Ted Hartley and Paula Zahn
Garth Fagan (center) and his dancers
Alice Shure, Christopher Johnson, and Bonnie Pfeifer Evans
Christine Quinn and William Lauder
David Wilshin, Bonnie Pfeifer Evans, Charles Evans Jr., and Ann Dexter-Jones
Wynton Marsalis and Co-Chair Jonathan Rose
Hannah Pakula, Mel Goodes, and Nancy Corzine
George Schiele, Merilee Bostock, and Carolee Friedlander
Jeffrey Cohen, William Rose, Pamela Kurtz, Christopher Johnson, and David Noto
Robert Polette and Elizabeth Jacoby
Olivia Flatto
Alexandra Trower and Diane Coffey
Kristi Witker Coons, Muffie Potter Aston, Jamie Figg, and Iris Love
Dr. Howard Fillit, Paula Zahn, and Leonard Lauder
Ann Dexter Jones and Yaz Hernandez
Patrick Stewart and Sunny Orzell
Bruce Ratner, BAM Board Member MaryAnn Gilmartin, and Mikhail Prokhorov
Patricia Herrera
Liliana Cavendish and Tony Bechara
Yanni Antonopoulos, Shirley Maytag King, and Joan Sutton Straus
Vivian Cardia, Lisa Salibello, and Linda Hoffman
Randal and Liz Sandler
Dr. Howard Fillit and Mary K. Bush
Robert and Renee Belfer
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia, Muffie Potter Aston, Rodman Drake, and John Bernbach
John Walsh, Sarah Walsh, and Mitch Eichen
Ann Tisch, Phebe Port, and Alexandra Trower
Chuck Diker, Barbara Schwartz, Joel Ehrenkranz, and Frederick Melhado
Richard Solomon, Paula Root, and Maurice Sonnenberg
Cornelya Dorbin, Jennifer Rogers, Sara Ann Vaughan, Maggie Simmons, Mary Rose Taylor, Barbara Doyle, Victoria Manley, and Natalie DiSantis
Nancy Corzine, Deb Gray, Liz Robbins, Nancy Lynn, and Sarah Gund
Ernie Larini, Mitch Eichen, and Sara Walsh
The Honorable Carolyn Maloney, Leonard Lauder, and Sharon Bush
Gillian Miniter and Sharon Bush
Shirley Maytag King, Yanni Antonopoulos, and Paula Root
Goldman Sachs CFO Harvey Schwartz and Anne Hubbard
Juan Pablo Molyneux and Pilar Molyneux
Efrem Weiss, William Bocra Jr., William Rose, Ian Griggs, and David Noto
Roz Jacobs and Beth DeWoody
Buzz Zaino and Harriet Weintraub
Muffie Potter Aston and Somers Farkas
Tiffany Dubin, Jackie Weld Drake, and Andrew Ovaltree
Marjorie and Ellery Gordon
Cocktails at the Metropolitan Club for the Alzheimer’s Drug Discovery Foundation's 3rd annual Luncheon & Symposium.
Jackie Weld Drake perusing
Co-Chair Diana Rose and composer Philip Glass
Carol Boulanger and William Lauder
Sarah Calderon and Elaine Delgado
Brooklyn Nets Head Coach Avery Johnson and Cassandra Johnson
Dr. Steven J. Romano and Paula Zahn
Nancy Shaw Raquet
Liz Robbins, Mitchell Lynn, and Nancy Lynn
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
(Alzheimer's); Etienne Frossard and Elena Olivo (BAM).
Judith and Alan Fishman with Diane and Adam Max
Bettina Zilkha and Leslie Tcheyan
Gaetana Enders
Amanda Taylor, Mary Snow, and Alexa Hamm Ryan
Ruth Baum, Pat Rowland, Jan Willinger, Cynthia Friedman, and Norma Teifel
Gala dinner at Skylight One Hanson, décor courtesy Fleurs Bella
Jackie Weld Drake and Christine Schwarzman
Alana Duff, Silvia Zonana, Deb Gray, and Amanda Mulally
Joseph Melillo, Bruce Ratner, Marty Markowitz, Irina Prokhorova, Mikhail Prokhorov, Karen Brooks Hopkins, and Alan Fishman
Alexandra Lebenthal and Robin Meltzer
Brooklyn Borough President Marty Markowitz
Melissa Berkelhammer and Andrew Ovaltree

Teri Brajewski, Anisa Romero, Melanie Holland, and Mendy Graves
Kimberly Chandler
John Fasano and Jonathan Rosen
Gilberto Santa Rosa and Padres Contra
Alexis Welch
Jeanine Jeo-Hi Kim and Madame Ban Soon-taek
Martha Busconi, Erica Armstrong, Alison Brettschneider, Dr. Gerald Loughlin, Courtney Nataraj, Claire Capello, and Amy Dieterich
Dr. Annette Rickel, Leslie Jones, and Minou Tirasteh
Madame Oketiniwati and Evie Evangelou
Amy Rosi and Benoit Lagarde
Dr. Annette Rickel and Grace Meigher
Joe Mia, Agusta Shaw, and Dennis Newsham
Miss Haiti International
Debbie Pipines and Victoria Vought
Judy Grubman, Alex Donner, Ava Roosevelt, Manuela Roosevelt, Kate Edmunds Donner, and Deborah Haschke
Derek Tjokro and Hilda Lam
Madame Oketiniwati, HRH The Otunba Adekunie Ojora, and HRH The Erelu Ojuolape Ojora
Megan Culfin, Kevin Delaigle, and Samantha Fox
Jonathan Rosen, Ashley Wendell, and Alex Falk
President Olusegun Obasanjo
His Holiness Gyalwang Drupka and Yue-Sai Kan
Tyler French and Brittany Sellers
Dr. Gerald Loughlin, Claire Capello, Amy Dieterich, and Marcie Pantzer
H.E. Toyin Saraki
Angelo Sosa and Karsten von Engein
Stephen Burroughs and Maggie Norris
Bob Dickinson, Leah Offenbach, and Dominic Chianese
Melissa Andreev, Robin Cofer, Flor Riccio, Cassandra Seidenfeld, and Lisa Simonsen Phillips
Dr. W Baldwin Spencer and H.E. Ambassador Francis Lorenzo
Martin Steger, Kurt Ullman, and Spencer Pumpelly
Santana Lopez and Gabrielle Giacalone
Leila Lopes
Carolina Carvalho and Amelia Lopez
Anki Leeds, Peter Webster, Caroline Nype, and Martha Webster
Petra Nemcova
Lily Cole, Livia Firth, Franca Sozzani, and Tommy Hilfiger
Don Felder and Miri Ben-Ari
Maggie Norris
Leslie Finerman, Erica Samuels, and Leigh Schwartzreich
Michele Gerber Klein
Marcus Malloy and Dominic Chianese
Tory Burch, Madame Oktiniwati Ulfadariah Hatta Rajasa, Evie Evangelou, and Martha Stewart
Evie Evangelou and Martha Stewart
David Paterson, Cassandra Seidenfeld, and Russell Simmons
Sammy Sosa
Mr. Chen Feng and Professor Han Demin
Franca Sozzani and Tommy Hilfiger
Carlie Seymour, Melanie Holland, and David Holland
Logan West
Alex and Kate Edmunds Donner
Lois Goodner, Marcie Pantzer, and Wandy Hoh
Stephanie Griswold, Hilary Dick, and Leslie Jones
Lindsey Pryor and Elizabeth Fuller
Catherine Schreiber
Reem Acra
Courtney Arnot, Amy Hodley, Marie Vantelt, and Katie Tozer
Travis Acquavell and Vaughn Dorrian
Christopher Twardy, Deborah Haschke, Kevin Buckler, Ava Roosevelt, and Manuela Roosevelt
Michael Chen, Michele Prandi, and Scott Damassa
Cassandra Seidenfeld
Amelia Lopez, Diego Gil, and Carolina Carvelho
Lobbo Traore Toure, First Lady of Mali
Kevin Buckler, Nick Alessi, Gloria Cressler, and Spencer Pumpelly
Leslie Jones, Rosemarie Audia, Minou Tirasteh, Ellen Haddigan, Melanie Holland, Jonathan Rosen, Elizabeth Fuller, and Hilary Dick
Photographs by PatrickMcmullan.com
Don Felder performs
Marcia Parris and Kate Sullivan
Diana Petroff Butensky, Melanie Charlton Fascitelli, and Zoe Weisberg
Dr. Shirley Madhere and Lily Cole
Jonathan Rosen and Melanie Holland
Gill Lamphere and Martha O'Brien
Franca Sozzani and Livia Firth
Leila Lopes, Miss Universe
Rebecca Minkoff
Marcie Pantzer and Alison Brettschneider
Roberta Flack
Yaz Hernandez
Dr. Shirley Madhere
Manuela Roosevelt and Deborah Haschke
Laura Prepon

Dr. Robert Recker and Debra Lappin
Brian Dennehy
Barbara, Sarah, Elizabeth, and Howard Grufferman
Patrick Brown, Chantal Riley, and Elton Fitzgerald White
Howard Gruffman and Kelley Connors
Vicki and Chris Kellogg
Cocktails on the mezzanine of the Metropolitan Opera House.
Judy Collins
Zani Gugelmann
Oliver Platt
Noelle Kowalczik and Mark W. Smith
Patrick Page
Barry Diller and Diane Von Furstenberg
Nora Zehetner
Patrick Stewart and Sunny Ozell
Dr. Nieca Goldberg, Sharon Marantz-Walsh, and Dr. Eva Kosta
David Knott, Francoise Girard, Gary Pinkus, and Mary Pinkus
Sharon Marantz-Walsh, Countess Brachi, and Kirke Walsh
Sahra Lese and Dr. Ethel Siris
Star Jones
Judy McLaren, Amy Porter, Anne Akers, Sharon Marantz-Walsh, and Andrea March
Crystal Renn, Zac Posen, and Erin O'Conner
Courtney Love
Jennifer Esposito
Michele Hicks
Jamie Figg and Margo Langenberg
Jessica Hart
Harold Prince
Peter Martino, Sharon Marantz-Walsh, and Dr. Robert Recker
Jamie DeRoy
Erwin Schrott and Anna Netrebko
William Ivey Long, Vanessa Redgrave, Heather Hitchens, and Joely Richardson
Kathleen Giordano, Dawne Marie Grannum, and Joy Marks
Beatrice and Christopher Daggett
Patti Smith and Jessie Smith
Amy Sacco
Joan Didion
Jeisa Chiminazzo and Lorenzo Martone
Rob and Marisol Thomas
Françoise Girard and David G. Knott
Beth Ostrosky Stern
Sasha Clynes, Dr. Felicia Cosman, and Dr. Neville Clynes
Molly and Connie Lippert
Andrea March, Dr. Fran Gare, and Judy McLaren
Paula Zahn, Sharon Marantz-Walsh, and Jane Hanson
Vanessa Redgrave and Joely Richardson
Jessica Chastain
Daisy Bevan, Ben Clark, Daniel Neeson, Michael Neeson, Franco Nero, Vanessa Redgrave, Joely Richardson, Kika Markham, Carlo Gabriel Nero, Annabel Clark, and Gabriel Owen
Lauren Brandt, Carol Saline, and Paul Rathblott
Madison and John Utendahl
Katherine Leitch and Terrence Kooyker
Bettina Holte
Daryl and Jordan Roth
Anna Netrebko
Andrew Saffir and Bianca Jagger
Lawrence Maxwell, Anita Maxwell, Amanda Drost, and Bill Drost
Henrik and Therese Lundqvist
Yuki Bouzari
Susan Duffy, Jane Weitzman, and Jackie Seaman
Heather Hitchens
James Palazza, Kathleen Giordano, and Peter Martino
Photographs by PatrickMcmullan.com
Jean Shafiroff
Matt Pappajohn, Beth Recker, Rachael Recker, Susan Recker, Dr. Robert Recker, Josie Ellerman, Sarah Recker, and Dion Stroble
Marta Ornelas and Placido Domingo with family
Martha Stewart
Chiu-Ti Jansen
Dr. Andrea Singer and Seth Ginsberg
Carol Saline and Dr. Max Gomez
Angelica Page
Renee Fleming
Ron Raines and Theodore S. Chapin
Dr. Felicia Cosman, Susan Randall, and Dr. Andrea Singer
Katie Lee
Chiu-Ti Jansen, Shayne Doty, and Adrienne Arsht
Maggie Grace
Pia Lindstrom
Andrew Saffir and Daniel Benedict
Dr. Ethel Siris and Ethel LeFrak
Georgette Mosbacher
Amar'e Stoudemire and Alexis Welch
Franco Nero and Vanessa Redgrave
Julie Macklowe and Zang Toi
Sharon Marantz-Walsh, Gail Sheehy, Dr. Felicia Cosman, Jane Hanson, Barbara Grufferman, and Dr. Andrea Singer
Michelle Mosner, Kathy Nicpon, and Elaine Dobrutsky
Michelle Trachtenberg
Tamara Mellon and Bob Colacello
Chloe Malle
Andrew and Celia Keenan-Bolger
Gillian Miniter
Penny Fuller
C. Berdon Lawrence, Gail Sheehy, and Dr. Robert Gagel
Radmila Lolli
Morley Safer

Fanciful Frog King lamp was among the auction items
Alison von Klemperer,David Macdonald, and Jacqueline Thompson
Amy Brandt, Nina Ibrahim, and S.A. Ibrahim
Dr Robin Ganzert, Allie Gray, Rob Roy, Jocelyn Ganzert, Robert Ganzert, Bart Ganzert, Rochelle Dever, and Patrick Dever
Mal Schwartz, Shannon Abbot, and Milda Darzinskis
Photographs by Annie Watt and Michael McAuliffe (American Humane Association); John Wegorzewski (Development Wing)
Talia Hermesh
Trupanion table
Amanda Bowman and Paul Katz
Rusty Meyers, Charlotte Ramsey, Gary Miller and Eileen Foley Miller
Philip and Elaine Getter, Jonathan Brielle, Cherie King and Barbara Martal
Leanne Borghesi and director Michael Bush
The Angel Ladies - Charlotte Ramsey and Eileen Foley Miller
Laya Khadjavi, Andrew Hoover, Elinor Hoover, and Hamid Biglari
Silvia Fernandez, Marta Fernandez and Chas Fox
Mandy Goldsmith and Dr. Eric Steinberg
Hero dog Gabe
Robert Ganzert, Dr Robin Ganzert, Tinsley Mortimer, Jocelyn Ganzert, and Rochelle Dever
Bobbi & Vin Godleski admire the flowers
Tom Johnson, Ann Johnson, Denise Benmosche, and Robert Benmosche
The Company - Leanne Borghesi, Ken Prymus, Jessica Burrows, Michael Bush, Jonathan Brielle, Brittney Lee Hamilton, Marcy McGuigan and Veanne Cox
Martin and Susan Tobias
Leanne Borghesi, Marcy McGuigan, Brittney Lee Hamilton and Veanne Cox in 40 Maked Women, a Monkey and Me
Paul Katz, Alissa Pinck, and Paul Raybould
Carson Kressley, Robin Ganzert, Hero Dog Soot, and Lorrie Burdettre
Jean Shafiroff with Stella
Lawrence and Amy Poster
Masa Tanaka, Kendall Hubert, and Gary Moriwaki
Donna & Russ Yarnell
Jonathan and Ken Prymus
Maureen Chatfield, Hampton Sailer, and Christine Layng
Leanne Borghesi, Marcy McGuigan and Brittney Lee Hamilton
Jake T. Austin with Stella
George Soros, Tom Russo, Princess Ghida Talal, and Henry Jarecki
Saman Adamiyatt, Massoud Heidari, and Maryam Ansary
Hayden Hosford and Jennifer Greene
Paulina Evgenidis
Artist Leslie Priggen
Shannon Donnely, Dr Robert Mackler, Walt Schwenk, Mary Anne Schwenk, and Lois Pope
Kathy Kluge and Tom Gelpke
Hulk, Lois Pope, Masa Tanaka, Roberta reardon, Tinsley Mortimer, Robin Ganzert, Captain America, and Hero dog Stella
Judy Ross
Elizabeth and Karlheinz Muhr
Suzi Goldsmith, Maude Cook, and Mary Anne schwenk
Steve Troha and John Schlimm
Buffet table with orange sunfowers
Allison Bennett and Joe Dwyer
Development Wing's Cherie King and Barbara Martal, Crossroads Theatre
Patti Kenner, Ruth Gruber, and Doris Schechter
Henry Jarecki, George Soros,Congresswoman Anita Lowey,Senator Pat Leahy, Marcelle Leahy, Mark Angelson, and Lyn Angelson
Hero dog Holly
Jessica Burrows
Elizabeth Lyman and Mel Lyman
Karlheinz Muhr and Henry Kaufman
Mark Kaplan, Helene Kaplan, and Tom Johnson
Rachelle Dever, The Incredible Hulk, Robert Ganzert, Captain America, and Jocelyn Ganzert
Carson Kressley, Lois Pope, JR Martinez, Maria Pope Kessel, Dr Robin Ganzert, and Prince Lorenzo Borghezi
Russell Hirshfield, Lili Forouraghi, Leila Larijani, Roya and Massoud Heidari
Tom Johnson, Lyn Angelson, Marcelle and Senator Pat Leahy, Mark Angelson
Dick Robinson and Amanda Bowman
Donna and Jack Greenberg
Wifred Thomas, Karen Holbrook,Amb. Harriet Elam-Thomas, Roger Brindley, Kiki Caruson, and Kyna Betancourt
Amy Brandt,Nina Ibrahim,S.a. Ibrahim, Ann Stock, and Hikment Ersek-Edit
Ruth Pitts, Hero dog Stella, Paul Raybould, Kate Edmonds Donner, and Alex Donner
Jack Greenberg, Donna Greenberg, and Hikmet Ersek
Peter Hancock, Tom Russo, Robert Benmosche
Kenn Bell
Patricia Waldeck and Victor Goldberg
Veanne Cox, Brittney Lee Hamilton Jonathan Brielle and Leanne Borghesi
Bjaye and Frank Pilotte
Tamiko Bolton and George Soros
Sgt. 1st Class Charles Shuck with Hero dog Gabe
Tara and Aldo Scrofani
Bill Abbot
Dick and Sally Robinson
Bruce Bobbins and Jody Frisch
Jonathan Brielle and Mary Horn
Maura and Frank Corvino
Christian Lerch and Jessica Burrows
Hero dog Soot
Jonathan Brielle and Brittney Lee Hamilton
Gul Rasolol, Afghani,Ann Johnson,Margaret Wager, and Tom Johnson
Donya Bommer and Shirin von Wulffen
Tom Newton, Larry Baer, and friend
Susan Magazine and Ronald E. Richter
Danielle and Lara Schriffen
Justin and Lauran Tuck
Bart Scott Stuart, Stuart Hayim, and Plaxico Burress
Kalkutta
Allison and Billy Frenz
Yue-Sai Kan, Ayla Farnos, and Antonio Farnos
Annelise Peterson
Wendi Murdoch
Larry Baer and Roger Barnett
Serge Tismen and Ida Liu
Jodie Snyder and Danielle Snyder
Frederic Fekkai and Shirin von Wulffen
Estelle and Selita Ebanks
Jackie Weld Drake
Aerin Lauder
Lindsay Ellingson
Campion and Tatiana Platt
Amara Toure, Jermaine Christian, Martin Jack, Brian Fleurimond, and Maurice Reid
Kevin Liles, Erika Liles, Shelby Coleman, and Roble Ali
Heidi and Richard Horowitz
Alexandra Lebenthal
Caroline Dean and Mark Gilbertson
Lisa Hayim, Brad Neuman, Gregg Hayim, and Max Hayim
Tess and Mathias Kiwanuka
Kate Hammond and Zak DeOssie
Selita Ebanks and Roe Williams
Hydra Mendoza and Joanna Rees
Eli Mizrahi
Richard Waters, April Dembosky, Ruzwana Bashir, and Michael Birch
William Lauder and Alina Cho
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (NYWF).
Andrew Sollinger, Jerry Kennelly, John Ridding, and Jim Clerkin
Ron Conway, Dick Costolo, and Richard Blum
Trish Goff
Hannah Bronfman
Ted Sann and Dini von Mueffling
Lou Branchinelli and Alfred Discipio with their family
Jim Scileppi, Lisa Scileppi, Marina Mancuso, and Dr. John Mancuso
Steven Freidel, Plaxico Burress, Eli Schwartz, and Stuart Hayim
Pia Ledy
Trevor Traina, Denise Hale, and Zaw Thet
Joanna Rees, Larry Baer, and Kyri McClellan
Roble Ali and Shelby Coleman
Eliza Bolen
Richard Monti
Topaz Page-Green
Andrew Sollinger, John Hollar, and Richard Waters
Samantha Barnes, Bruce Scott, Stuart Gray, Tex McCarthy, Stuart Barker, and Sheila Hackbarth
Gillian and Sylvester Miniter
Donna Froehle Dr. Alex Covey, and Stephanie Morandi
Susan Burden, Eric Brettschneider, and Susan Magazine
Michael Birch, April Dembosky, and Chris Tsakalakis
Lauren Remington Platt
Nikesha Brown and Maggie Keating
John Demsey and Alina Cho
Susan Magazine, Candice Posner, and Dr. Jennifer Mieres
Andrew Saffir, Marisa Brown, and Daniel Benedict
Gillian Tett, Dick Costolo, and Nancy Oakes
Sid Sheray, Bob Hamer, Jill Hamer, Kyri McClellan, Jim Clerkin, and Frank Doyle
Cory Kennedy
Charles Ferguson and Gillian Tett
Tania Higgins, Dayssi Olarte de Kanavos, Gillian Miniter, Susan Magazine, and Nick Scoppetta
Christine Schwarzman
Calvin Brown, Gianni Mercuri, Eli Youssian, Bart Scott, and Jack Bardakjian
John Ridding, Gillian Tett, and Mark Buell
Patricia Duff
Connie Anne Phillips, Tim O'Connor, and Lauren O'Keefe
Rob Grimshaw, Zaw Thet, Peter Stern, and Ron Huddleston
Jessica Whites
Allison Aston
Richard Blum, Ron Conway, and Paul Pelosi
Kim Anstatt Morton, Rob Grimshaw, and Erin Ganju
Hilary Rhoda
Yaz Hernandez
Kim Heirston and Dana Hammond
Rob Grimshaw and Ron Huddleston
Jean Shafiroff and Michelle Harper
Elizabeth Steves, Melissa Kinsella, and Julie Dwyer
Steven Kasher, Beth DeWoody, and Randy Polumbo
James Salomon and Mary Gail Parr
Kathy Hilton and Joan Schnitzer Levy
Meghan Boody and Randy Polumbo at the opening of Randy Polumbo’s “Love Stream at at the Steven Kasher Gallery.
Charlotte Moss
Emily Goldstein and Stan Stokowski

Paul Laster, Michele Gerber Klein, Dan Desmond, and Peter Wolf
Bonnie Comley and Sharon Kerr
Ana Oliveira, Ginny Day, and Diana Taylor
Neil Sedaka
Gloria Vanderbilt and Diane von Furstenberg
Bernard Leibov, Randy Polumbo, David Vincent, and Bonnie Young
Joan and her grandchildren
Danielle Colding
Joyce Cowin and Jean Troubh
Evie and Leslie Bricusse
Debbie Bancroft
Kate Ford and Frank Chopin
Sam and Anita Michaels, and Mai Hallingby
Carter Pottash, Ashley Gail Harris, and Mitchel Adam
Richard Nye and Francesca Stanfill Nye
Nydia Caro, Marti Stevens, and Nancy Biddle
Janna Bullock and Anne Delaney
Webb Turner, Dee Kowallik, and Jamie Figg
The Countess Sondes and Robert Sakowitz
Matthew Smyth
Peter Lowe, Betsey Lowe, Sarah Gessler, Kay Wheeler, and Don Wheeler
Gene and Jerry Jones
Nikki and Ira Harris
Patricia Shiah
Michael Goodwin, Jerry Portwood, and Patricio Del Real
George and Darcy Gould
Nancy Cain Marcus
Mark Gordon and Julio Salcedo
Bill Bartholomay and Mai Hallingby
Cindy Adams
Kyle DeWoody, Alex Mustomen, and Joe Sheftel
Michael Bruno and Gloria Vanderbilt
Ros Smyth and Elizabeth St. John
Audrey Gruss and Joyce Carol Oates
Kathryn Weisbeck, Paola Bacchini, and Sonia Nassery Cole
Ana Oliveira, Diana Taylor, Jean Shafiroff, and Ginny Day
Rick and Kathy Hilton
Alvina Patel, Dan Tanzilli, and Selmin Arat
Jack and Sharon Owsley
Ellie Rines, Aditya Julka, Suzanna Lee, and Michael H. Miller
Lauren and John Veronis
Hyatt Bass
Prince Pahlavi and Cami Goff
Melissa Schnitzer, Carol Levy, Joan Schnitzer, and Lisa Schnitzer
Tania Bien-Aimé and Peggy Jacobs Bader
Lynne Camer, Karen Newman, Viviane Silvera, Marc Newman, and Natalia Bernini
Elizabeth Fiore and Hiroko Onoga
Ben Brantley and Frederick Everstadt
Ann Rapp
Keiko Nishida and Patricia Dobiashi
Liz Smith and Elizabeth Peabody
Georgiana Bland, Michael Dweck, Serena Tufo, and Cecilia Dweck
Claire Watson, Betsey Ruprecht, Lisa Bowles, Ellen Scarbourogh, and Molly Ruprecht
Fe Fendi
Irvin Levy and Joan Schnitzer Levy
Gloria Vanderbilt and Anderson Cooper
Liz Peek and Jean Shafiroff
Meghan Boody
Douglas Schnitzer, Jr. and Jonathan Schnitzer
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (NYWF).
Paul Kasmin, Juliette Premmereur, and Elena Soboleva
Kirk Kessler and Diana Quasha
Aurelia Chaplin Thierre
Joan Schnitzer Levy and Jerry Jones
Wendy Goodman and David Mandel
Alexandra Stanton and Andrea Greeven Douzet
Cami Goff and Capera Ryan
Ralph Gardner and Mitzi Sewell
Christopher Madkour, Barbara Riley, and Adolfo
Jessamyn Waldman Rodriguez
Steve and Anne Cucchiaro with Francesca Bortolotto Possati
Guests were ferried to a concert at The Church of San Sebastiano, the site of one of Save Venice’s most important ongoing restorations (photo: Matteo De Fina).
Mara and Charles Robinson
Nick, Pamela, Kathryn, and Nicholas Lazares
Bob Guthrie, Patricia and Carlo Vigano, and Beatrice Guthrie
Andrea and Maria Clelia Zappala, Daniella Di Lorenzo
Denise De Luca, Nathalie Kaplan, and Dina Chartouni
Guillaume Halard and Siena von Tscharner Fleming
Martha and Georgia Wright
Munja Orzolek
Carolina and Theo Schulze
Elizabeth Stribling and Lou Rena Hammond
Leslie Contarini, Matteo Ceriana, and Melissa Conn
Michael LaPLaca

Francesca Bortolotto Possati with Ellen and David Rosand
Matteo and Monica Carlotti
Alberto and Marta Nardi
Roger de Montebello, Mary Frank, and Alberto Nardi
Jose and Beatrice Esteve
Mary and Howard Frank
Thomas Schumacher and Trudie Styler
Juan Prieto, Cat Jagger Pollon, and Beatrice Rossi-Landi
Giuseppe and Antonietta Bono, Gianni and Daniela Onorato, Corrado Antonini, Madeleine Arison, and Gunilla Antonini
Laura Maioglio and Gunter Blobel
Kit and Bill Pannill
Colleen Atwood, Trudie Styler and Matthew White
Jose Luis Martinez and Kathleen Berry
George Rudenauer, Molly Borthwick, and Randy Fishburn
Pier Luigi Foschi and Emanuela Venturini
Svetlana and Alexandre Borodin, Olga Litviniuk, and Frederik Paulsen
Matteo Corvino, Beatrice and Bob Guthrie, and Raffaella Curiel
Matthew White and Frederick Ilchman
Bikem and Roger de Montebello
John Staelin, Loue Rena Hammond, Richard Almeida, Elziabeth Locke, and Jill Almeida
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
Tanny and Courtney Jones
Richard Almeida, Irene Mecchi, and Jill Almeida
Brooke Lanier, Shana Terry, and Tina Walls
Carol and Ed Salgado
Irina Tolstoy Gans and Elizabeth Locke
Daisy Ames
Jens and Nataly Funk
Rick Miramontez, Jon Dimond, Thomas Schumacher, Andy Snyder, Matthew White, and Jamie Dumont
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Annie and John Fiorilla
Thomas Spry and Charles Tolbert
Jean Giamonco and Lisa Sohigian
Jill Esterman and Bruce Horten
Fiona Peel and Ronald Lee Fleming
Penelope Seidler, Anthony Ames, and Mel Oldenburg
Micky and Madeleine Arison
Steve and Anne Cucchiaro with Francesca Bortolotto Possati

Mara and Charles Robinson
Nick, Pamela, Kathryn, and Nicholas Lazares
Andrea and Maria Clelia Zappala, Daniella Di Lorenzo
Denise De Luca, Nathalie Kaplan, and Dina Chartouni
Guillaume Halard and Siena von Tscharner Fleming
Martha and Georgia Wright
Munja Orzolek
Carolina and Theo Schulze
Elizabeth Stribling and Lou Rena Hammond
Leslie Contarini, Matteo Ceriana, and Melissa Conn
Michael LaPLaca
Francesca Bortolotto Possati with Ellen and David Rosand
Alberto and Marta Nardi
Bob Guthrie, Patrica and Carlo Vigano, and Beatrice Guthrie
Roger de Montebello, Mary Frank, and Alberto Nardi
Jose and Beatrice Esteve
Mary and Howard Frank
Thomas Schumacher and Trudie Styler
Juan Prieto, Cat Jagger Pollon, and Beatrice Rossi-Landi
Giuseppe and Antonietta Bono, Gianni and Daniela Onorato, Corrado Antonini, Madeleine Arison, and Gunilla Antonini
Carol and Ed Salgado
Marco and Monica Carlotti
Kit and Bill Pannill
Colleen Atwood, Trudie Styler and Matthew White
Jose Luis Martinez and Kathleen Berry
George Rudenauer, Molly Borthwick, and Randy Fishburn
Pier Luigi Foschi and Emanuela Venturini
Svetlana and Alexandre Borodin, Olga Litviniuk, and Frederik Paulsen
Matteo Corvino, Beatrice and Bob Guthrie, and Raffaella Curiel
Matthew White and Frederick Ilchman
Bikem and Roger de Montebello
Guests were ferried to a concert at The Church of San Sebastiano, the site of one of Save Venice’s most important ongoing restorations.
John Staelin, Loue Rena Hammond, Richard Almeida, Elziabeth Locke, and Jill Almeida
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
Tanny and Courtney Jones
Richard Almeida, Irene Mecchi, and Jill Almeida
Brooke Lanier, Shana Terry, and Tina Walls
Laura Maioglio and Gunter Blobel
Irina Tolstoy Gans and Elizabeth Locke
Daisy Ames
Jens and Nataly Funk
Rick Miramontez, Jon Dimond, Thomas Schumacher, Andy Snyder, Matthew White, and Jamie Dumont
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Annie and John Fiorilla
Thomas Spry and Charles Tolbert
Jean Giamonco and Lisa Sohigian
Jill Esterman and Bruce Horten
Fiona Peel and Ronald Lee Fleming
Penelope Seidler, Anthony Ames, and Mel Oldenburg
Micky and Madeleine Arison
Steve and Anne Cucchiaro with Francesca Bortolotto Possati

Mara and Charles Robinson
Nick, Pamela, Kathryn, and Nicholas Lazares
Andrea and Maria Clelia Zappala, Daniella Di Lorenzo
Denise De Luca, Nathalie Kaplan, and Dina Chartouni
Guillaume Halard and Siena von Tscharner Fleming
Martha and Georgia Wright
Munja Orzolek
Carolina and Theo Schulze
Elizabeth Stribling and Lou Rena Hammond
Leslie Contarini, Matteo Ceriana, and Melissa Conn
Michael LaPLaca
Francesca Bortolotto Possati with Ellen and David Rosand
Alberto and Marta Nardi
Bob Guthrie, Patrica and Carlo Vigano, and Beatrice Guthrie
Roger de Montebello, Mary Frank, and Alberto Nardi
Jose and Beatrice Esteve
Mary and Howard Frank
Thomas Schumacher and Trudie Styler
Juan Prieto, Cat Jagger Pollon, and Beatrice Rossi-Landi
Giuseppe and Antonietta Bono, Gianni and Daniela Onorato, Corrado Antonini, Madeleine Arison, and Gunilla Antonini
Carol and Ed Salgado
Marco and Monica Carlotti
Kit and Bill Pannill
Colleen Atwood, Trudie Styler and Matthew White
Jose Luis Martinez and Kathleen Berry
George Rudenauer, Molly Borthwick, and Randy Fishburn
Pier Luigi Foschi and Emanuela Venturini
Svetlana and Alexandre Borodin, Olga Litviniuk, and Frederik Paulsen
Matteo Corvino, Beatrice and Bob Guthrie, and Raffaella Curiel
Matthew White and Frederick Ilchman
Bikem and Roger de Montebello
Guests were ferried to a concert at The Church of San Sebastiano, the site of one of Save Venice’s most important ongoing restorations.
John Staelin, Loue Rena Hammond, Richard Almeida, Elziabeth Locke, and Jill Almeida
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
Tanny and Courtney Jones
Richard Almeida, Irene Mecchi, and Jill Almeida
Brooke Lanier, Shana Terry, and Tina Walls
Laura Maioglio and Gunter Blobel
Irina Tolstoy Gans and Elizabeth Locke
Daisy Ames
Jens and Nataly Funk
Rick Miramontez, Jon Dimond, Thomas Schumacher, Andy Snyder, Matthew White, and Jamie Dumont
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Annie and John Fiorilla
Thomas Spry and Charles Tolbert
Jean Giamonco and Lisa Sohigian
Jill Esterman and Bruce Horten
Fiona Peel and Ronald Lee Fleming
Penelope Seidler, Anthony Ames, and Mel Oldenburg
Micky and Madeleine Arison

Dinner at the premiere for Showtime's "Homeland" aboard the Intrepid Sea, Air and Space Museum.
Claire Danes and Anna Wintour
Stephanie March
Leah Lane and Ted Hartley
Jazmin Grimaldi
Fiona and Jeff Slonem
Judy Licht and Jerry Della Femina
Maureen Donnell with Jerry and Diana Slocum
The scene in the Margo Feiden Galleries historic Stanford White townhouse
Irene Aitken and Henry Lynn
Joel Miller
Dee Cushing, Fern Tailer, and Thomas Cushing
Dana Walden and Gary Newman
Sean Calley
Dan Abrams
Ker Arvor
The New York Yacht Club, Newport, RI
Morgan Saylor
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (Homeland); John Wegorzewski (SH Hospital).
Barbara and Harry Hackett, Jr.
Dede Gotthelf Moan and Tom Edmonds
David Marciano
Antonella Bertello, Bob Rosen, and Melissa Cohn
Julie Chen and Leslie Moonves
Jim and Maryann Nugent with Bob Wines
Michael Figliolia, Francesca Dricot, Amleto Mazza, and Denise Pavilonis
Jennifer and Peter Buffett
Cocktails and hors d'oeuvres on the grounds of the Rogers Mansion
Daryl Schaefer, Jodi Stuart, Margie Steinman, Ellen Krass, and Bonnie Comley
Leah Lane
Diego Klattenhoff, Morena Baccarin, and Valentino
Isiah Whitlock Jr
Oldest one room schoolhouse in Southampton
Sandra Walser and Stan Glinka
Bruce Weber and Nan Bush
Palma Kolansky. and Joe Troiano
Southampton Trustee Nancy McGann and artist Eileen Dawn Skretch
Richard Kind
"Homeland" themed Cupcakes by Melissa
Cristina Roosevelt
Katrina Bowden
Author and architectural historian Gary Lawrance and portrait artist Zita Davisson
Newport Harbor
Maryann Horwath and Michael Shaheen
Kenneth Naem and Jaime Manrique, Spanish painter
Giancarlo Giammetti, Morena Baccarin, Claire Danes, and Valentino
Amy Rosi and Brittany Sellers
Angela Samii, Siamak Samii, Lauren Roberts, and Bonnie Comley
Janis Gardner Cecil
Peter Olsen, Bonnie Comley, and Stewart Lane
Peter Hallock and Marge Sullivan
Bill and Laura Masterson
Lynda and David Lindh
Melissa Cohn, Robert Epstein, Debra Halpert, and Jack Larsen
Damien Lewis and Helen McCrory
Barbara Cates with Jim Mitchell and Fern Tailer
Beaulieu, Ruth Buchanan's house on Bellevue Avenue
David Nevins, Alex Gansa, and Howard Gordon
Jean Shafiroff, Leesa Rowland, R Couri Hay, Charles Cecil, Cassandra Seidenfeld, and Robert Grant
Amy Hargreaves and David Harewood
Patti Lupone
Margo Feiden and Muriel Siebert
Board President Gerri MacWhinnie and Jean Shafiroff
Frankie Lane, Susan Solomon,Jodi Stuart,Ellen Krass, Sara Herbert Galloway, Stewart Lane, Bonnie Comley, Daryl Schaefer, Nancy Geller, and Lauren Day
David Zinczenko and Melissa Milne
Rosanna Scotto and Jenna Scotto
Maksim Chmerkovskiy
Wyndanch Early Morning, 30x36, Oil on wood by Eileen Dawn Skretch
Gregory D'Elia and Noel Herrick
Minnie Mortimer
Archie Panjabi
James Purefoy and Zuleikha Robinson
Amy Lau, Peter Rosenthal, and Laurie Dolphin
Barbara Graham, Joe Troiano, and Palma Kolansky
Bonnie Comley, Sara Herbert Galloway, Debra Halpert, and Lee Fryd
Mildred C. Brinn, Edward Callaghan, and Kay Gilman
Olivia Palermo and Johannes Huebl
Virginia and James Comley
Zachary and Oxana Crawfford
Dania Ramirez and Jessica White
Bailey's Beach, Newport, RI
Katherine and Gary Andreassen
Marie Glinka, Mary Welker, and Kathleen Glinka
Maggie Norris and Ella Newman
Montego Glover, Mandy Patinkin, and Kathryn Grody
David Roosevelt, Kathleen Durham, and Manuela Roosevelt
US Navy  service members
Stephanie Abrahams, Kerry MacWhinnie, and Gerrie MacWhinnie
Leah Lane and Bonnie Comley
David Lewis
Benjamin Walker and Stark Sands
Daryl Schaefer, Ted Hartley, Ellen Krass, and Margie Steinman
Susan Solomon and Nancy Geller
Barbara Cates and Fern Tailer
Katie Lee
Lauren Day Roberts, Sara Herbert Galloway, and Jack Larsen
Jennifer Missoni

Erica Lopez and Neil Aristy
Stephanie Seymour Brant and Donna Karan
Tiffany Koury and Barbara Regna
Dawne Marie Grannum, Alison Minton, and Joy Marks
Barbara, Sharon, and Jenna Bush
Esther Herror Gaffron
Anna Sui
Carlos Lamadrid and Gerry Byrne
Roger Padilha and Mauricio Padilha
Holly Bernesser and Cary Neer
Barbara Bush and Donna Karan
Claudia Mason
Iman, Elaine Irwin, and Amy Fine Collins
Langley Fox and Stacey Bendet Eisner
Emilia Sanit-Amand, Karen LeFrak, Eleanora Kennedy, Hilary Geary Ross, and Donna Aquavella
Nancy Bacich and Kenny Kenny
Iris Apfel and Gabriel Rivera
Robert Fontanelli
David Blond and Phillipe Blond
Dori Cooperman, Amy Fine Collins, and Sharon Loeb
George Hess and Caroline Stern
Annelise Peterson
Patty Harris and Mayor Michael Bloomberg
Fe Fendi, Yaz Hernandez, and Madame Mayhem
Jacqui Lividini, Tom Florio, Lori Rhodes, and Lanette Harrison
Jay Penske and Dan Loeb
Charlotte Moss and Dustee Jenkins
Cassandra Seidenfeld and Yaz Hernandez
Alexandra Lebenthal, Michelle Smith, Nadia Swarowski, and Donna Karen
Joe Lupo and James Watson
Julia Flynn and Lorry Newhouse
Gazelle and Christina Via
Camilla Pagowski and Tovarah Pagowski
Alex Basob and Marina Braude
Stacy Engman
Frederic Fekkai and Shirin von Wuffen
Kari Tiedemann and Hilary Geary Ross
Harry Kargman, Jill Kargman, Susan Fales-Hill, and Gail O'Neal
Miles Redd and John Truex
Karen LeFrak and Hilary Geary Ross
Jean Shafiroff and Mario Buatta
Dinner scene at the 9th Annual Style Awards.
Tara Levy and Cameron Silver
Ivanka Trump
Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Annette de la Renta, and Henry Kissinger
Patricia Ferrera Lansing, Reed Krakoff, and Delphine Krakoff
Prince Chenoa, Jacob DeKat, and Niki M'nray
Patrick McDonald and James Aguiar
Jerry Beersdorf and Chantel Miller
Valerie Steele, Alexandra Lebenthal, Eleanora Kennedy, and Liz Peek in their Oscar's, with the man himself.
Hamish Bowles
Jeff Gordon, Amare Stoudemire, Carolina Herrera, and Henrik Lundqvist
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Dr. Lisa Airan and Jill Kargman
Julie Macklowe, Stephanie Seymour Brant, Eleanora Kennedy, and Casey Paul
Elettra Wiedemann
Rachel Taylor
Chiu-Ti Jansen and Lucia Hwong Gordon
Katharine McPhee
Sarah Jessica Parker, Diane von Furstenberg, and Anna Wintour
Linda Fargo and Ron Frasch
Monica Rich Kosann
Deanna Rodriguez, Clare Brown, and Wendy Rokose
Chiu-Ti Jansen
Donna Karan
Matt Dillon, Aimee Kestenberg, Phillip Bloch, June Ambrose, and Derek Warburton
Hal Rubenstein
Joey Arias
Simon Doonan
Stephanie Winston Wolkoff
Cornelia Guest and Glenda Bailey
Pat Cleveland, Donna Jordan, and Maria Snyder
Tammy Mager, Stephanie Winston Wolkoff, and Jennifer Ruff
Nina Davidson, Liz Lange, and Jane Wagman
Carol Mack
Marcia Mishaan and Kim Hastreiter
Simon Spurr, Lisa Perry, and Ed Westwick
Whitney and Sarah Wolfe
Gail O'Neal, Joe Hubrich, Claudia Mason, and Susan Fales-Hill
Diana Taylor and Barbara Walters
Valentina Zelyaeva
Mae Alexander
Anna Wintour, Diane von Furstenberg, Oscar de la Renta, and Sarah Jessica Parker
Blake Tysinger and Eric Gartner
Jonathan Cheban and Nicole Richie
Cornelia and Carole Guest
Nina Garcia
David Patrick Columbia, Eleanora Kennedy, and Jane Holzer
Jane Holzer, Bronson van Wyck, and Carolina Herrera
Carolina Herrera and Katie Holmes
Cator Sparks and Fay Cantor-Stephens
Diana Taylor, Hamilton South, and Barbara Walters
Diane von Furstenberg, Anna Wintour, Jean Shafiroff, and Oscar de la Renta
Mai Hallingby Harrison, Kari Tiedemann, and Audrey Gruss
Roger Padilha, Fran Drescher, and Mauricio Padilha
Anita Sarko and Erzen Krivca
John Demsey

Murial Paton, Alison Manning, Isabel Ramirez, and Juliana Jerse
Frances Schneider and Linda Podhurst
Sima Honarbakhsh Pirnia, Arthur Loh, and Chantal Soret
Becca Light, Seth Canetti, and Heather Ingram
The Corcoran Group
Sharon Bush
Kent Farrington, winner of the 37th. Annual Hampton Classic
Joy Marks
Young Equestrian Lenny Lane
Lou Reed
Abby Thorsgaard, Sara Wojza, and Kristin Bailey
JC Iglesias, Tina Starr, Kristin Ratcliffe, and Larissa Bond
Ross Graham, IIsabelle Mentre, and Torquhil Campbell
Hermes
Erin O'Brien and Alana Leigh Harris
The Match begins
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Comley
Matias Magrini, Torquhil Campbell, Nacho Figueras, and Bash Kazi
Sotheby's International Realty
Ravi Rajan, Tim Mund, Anne Kern, and Jim Young
Peter Cook and daughter Sailor Cook
Chester Riding Club
Callan Solem Show Stables
Sunny Kalsa
Stacy Engman, Jonathan Sheffer, and Zoe Gettman
Cindy Sherman and Martha Stewart
Vanessa Wright, Torquhil Campbell, and Giaia Rener
Isabella and Jacquelin Whalen
Firooz Zahedi, Shelly Fremont, Beth DeWoody, and Vincent Fremont
Ross Bleckner and Rajan Mamtani
Diana Taylor
Bonnie Pfeiffer Evans
Hamptons Magazine
Adrianna Pidwerbetsky
Dottie Herman and Neal Sroka
Noamie Bauer, Giaia Rener, and Vanessa Wright
Robbins Wolfe Eventeurs
JK Brown, Ellen Kern, Eric Diefenbach, and Nancy Portnoy
Mai Moujin and Clifford Ross
Calvin Klein, Nicole Miller, and Jorn Weisbrodt
James Huniford
Suzanne Vega
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Rob Rich (Hampton Classic).
Swan Creek Farm
Rajan Mamtani, Ross Bleckner, April Gornik, and Eric Fischl
Eric Reimer, Belinda Reimer, and Chandler Reimer
Melissa Dixon and Leo St. Clair
Cindy Sherman and Lisa Phillips
Crowds in the grandstand on the closing day of the 37th Annual Hampton Classic.
Virgina and James Comley
Anh Duong and Malcolm Carfrae
Michelle and Peter Farmer
Franz Zach, Felicia Taylor, Marcia Mishaan, and Ovidio Diaz
Alli Kruk, Allie Gambino, Daniel Bush, Andrea Roderiguez, and Lauren Doyle
Kerri Berson and Jason Hirsch
Natalia Shirokova and Michael Shetzer
Kristin Cecehi
Charles Regensberg, Karen Kelly, Jill Zarin, and Regina Quinan
Elliot Cooperstone, Barbara Cooperstone, Tim Hall, and Lisa Hall
Langhorne Racing
Giaia Rener, Torquhil Campbell, Duke of Argylll, Peter Brant, and Vanessa Wright
David Yurman
Judge Jerry Sheindlin, Cindy Adams, and Judge Judith Sheindlin
Julia Rhee and Samina Rind
David Maupin and Stefano Tonchi
David Boysmaster, Eric Alfieri, Caroline Hemphill, Kate Hemphill, Steve Alfieri, and Robert Alfieri
Barry Klarsberg and Sara Herbert Galloway
Rockafellow/ Lopez-Balboa
Laurie Anderson
Dushi Roth, Roman Roth, and Indira Roth
Mickey Straus
Ringmaster Alan Keeley
EquiFit, Inc.
Susan Asch, Thomas Lynch, Sue Weiss, and Margaret Luberda
Jean Sharfiroff, Diana Taylor, and Sharon Kerr
April Gornik and Laurie Anderson
Scott Sanders and Peter Wilson
Nacho Figueras greets his fans
Carlton DeWoody and Russell Steele
Robert Lyster and Cassandra Seidenfeld Lyster
Bryan Gulyas, Ashley Snyder, and Ryan West
Beth DeWoody and Alexander Vreeland
Lucia Hwong Gordon and Sophia Gordon
B. Smith and Dan Gasby
Nicolock
Firefly Farm
Eleni Sotiriou and William Kelman
American Eurocopter
East End Organic Icemelt
Rod Gilbert, Mayor Bloomberg, and Judy Gilbert
Dr. Howard and Gayle Sobel
Dianne Blell
David Boysmaster, Eric Alfieri, and Robert Alfieri
Edwina von Gal and John Maroney
Mayor Bloomberg and Ann Throne Holst
Josephine Johnson, Bianca Scotto, Julia Falsetta, and Rosanna Scotto
Desiree Gruber
Bob Balaban and Hazel Balaban
Georgina Bloomberg and Jill Rappaport
Avenue
Felicity Sargent and Mark Molle
Kate and Caroline Hemphill
Shamin Abas
Rufus Wainwright, Jenni Muldaur, and Jorn Weisbrodt
Young equestrian Frankie Lane
Renee Bigler, Ron Barba, and Kathy Barba
Rick Hilton
Pilatus Aircraft
Kim Richards and sister Kathy Hilton
Gary DePersia and Donna Livingston
Brooke Millstein, Howard Lorber, Erica Grossman, and Marc Leder
Kelly Klein
Alaina Raftis, Alexia Rempoutzakou, and Vanessa Fuchs
Paige Patterson
Bloomberg
Robert Stepanian, Jenn Danzi, Carrie Lazarus, and James Parker
Randy Slifka
Edwina von Gal
Lou Reed and Cindy Sherman
Morgan
Sandra Brant
Stewart Lane, Bonnie Comley, and Leah Lane
Nan Bush, Firooz Zahedi, and Bruce Weber
Boris Talan and Rory Tahari
Patricia Griffith
Seth Labenz and Roy Rub
Jorn Weisbrodt and Ani Antreasyan
Sally and Molly Miller
Hana Deleuse, Mariana Fazilova, and Cass Almendral
Penelope Greene, Griffin Greene, Bennett Greene, and Jean Hitchcock
___, Candi Crawford, ___, ____, and Michelle Hunt
C3
Crawford Brock, Janet Brock, Helen Brock, Laura Brock Chandler, Leigh Brock Friend, and Ryan Friend
Kyle Zeigler "stands in water for a living"
Wayne Moore, Lisa Moore, Justin Cox, Molly Cox, Crawford Brock, and Christina Geyer
Sarah Johnson and ___
Nicole Noonan and Sandy Madera
Leigh Friend and Paige Slates
Jeffrey Beri and his dog Sinatra
Leesa Rowland and Jane Pontarelli
The Subscribers
Lexi Maounis
McCann Girls and Niven Morgan
Valerie Angeli of the ASPCA
Amanda Callahan, Heather Furniss, and Austin Ames
Stefan Lasek, Catherine DiMatteo, Kevin Hart, and Emmanuel Faccio
Lillie Keenan
Josh Berger, Marissa Gribbin, MaryAnn Carpenter, and Denise Crocitto
Rick Corso
Mary Rivas
Kelly Klein
Molly and Justin Cox
Jusy Hadlock and Steven Stolman
Leigh Brock Friend, Ryan Friend, Nina Sachse, and Deck Sachse
Austin Ames, Amanda Callahan, and Chart Westcott
Echelon Ball Committee and Executive Committee
Ryan Friend and Leigh Friend
The RocknRunway scene
Vittorio Assaf Jr, .Charlotte Assaf, Valentina Assaf, and Vittorio Assaf
Earl Crittenden, Justin Terzi, and Ross Meltzer
Cornelia Bregman and Inge Lasusa
Karmen Noble and Lanka Lenart
Rose Clark, Wayne Moore, Lisa Moore, Molly Cox, Justin Cox, Heather Furniss, Crawford Brock, and Christina Geyer
Ally Macatee and Breanne King
Matt Cain and Krystal Schlegel
Gregory Delia, Judy Hadlock, and Lee Cannon
___ and ___
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Comley
Cassandra Seidenfeld and Madame Mayhem
Josh Cortez, Patrick Benoit, and Patrick Anderson
Laura Lofaro Freeman
Jennifer Tripoli and Donna Drake
Charlotte Jacobs
Atmosphere
Moroccan Sheepherders
Addison, Arianna, and Erica Reid
Tom Short, Joe Calvillo, Hunter Brouss, and Justin Cox
Leila Cornelius
Rose Clark, Crawford Brock, and Christina Geyer
Heather Lange, Preston Evans, and _____
Kendell Cronstrom, Alejandro Saralegui, and Kevin Hart
Edgar Bronfman
Sean Bruns
Alli McGuiness, Peter Dysert, Sarah Johnson, Kathryn Lott, Caroline Fair, Patrick Benoist, Tracy Glesby, Pat Anderson, Kate Hall, Josh Cortez, and Christina Geyer at the second annual ROCKNRUNWAY fashion event hosted by Stanley Korshak in Dallas.
Jessi Moreau and Steven Strobe
Jim Dratfield displays his photos
Ross Meltzer and Denise Johnston
Jennifer Freeman
Scott Sander, Sean Mellyn, Kendell Cronstrom, and Marianne Howatson
Ellen Welsh and Scott Sander
Catherine DiMatteo and Stefan Lasek
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (Scalamandre); Rob Rich (Hampton Classic); James Edward (RocknRunway)
Shanette Barth Cohen and Dennis Susskind
Kevin Hart, Jeff Smith, Tracy Smith, and Emmanuel Faccio
Leah Lane
Barbara Ostrom and Earl Crittenden
Dominick D'Alleva and Robin Cofer
Joe Pastora and Melissa Pastora
Christina Lopez-Balboa and Olivia Lopez-Balboa
Janice Langrall and Marianne Howatson
Rich Wilkie and Robert Taft
The Holiday Electric
Melanie and John Wambold, and Judy Hadlock
Andrea Scavione and Christina Koleoglou
Krystal Schlegel and Rebecca Bowen
Caroline Fair, Jen Andrew, and Sadie Batson
David Hudson and Amber Brust
Livvi Luttrell, Lindsay Gehan, Blake Johnston, Helen Brock, Kara Jones, and Janie Cardwell
Getting fitted for boots
Patty and Ashley Raynes

Jeanne Greenberg Rohatyn, Jackie Greenberg, and Bettina Zilkha
Olivia Chantecaille and Julia Erdman
Cricket Burns and Melinda Hackett
Reginald Van Lee, Daren Thomas, and Omar Karriem
Lisa Nilsson Levin and Chris Lukas
Maria Lowe and Enrica Arengi Bentivoglio
The competition begins
Karla Harwich and Kimberly Yeary
Kimberly Yeary, Nathalie Kaplan, Barbara Hemmerle Gollust
Cheri Rice, Kathleen Rice, Lisa McCarthy, and Beth Ostrosky
Famed painter Frank Wimberley and sculptor Hans Van De Bovenkamp
Dori Cooperman, Dana Hammond Stubgen, Bettina Zilkha, and Barbara Hemmerle Gollust
Monte Albers DeLon and Michael Meltzer
Tony and Peabody award winner Murray Horwitz and Edward Callaghan
BJ Blum and Lesley Schulhof
Cristina Greeven Cuomo
Francis Hayward and Lionel Larner
Manicure before showtime
Clea and Valesca Guerrand-Hermes
Melissa Berkelhammer, Elizabeth Kurpis, and Anne Huntington
Getting a rubdown after competition
Sofia D'Angelo, a 14-year-old rider who sang the National Anthem
Stacy Engman
What's all the fuss with the horses? Look at me!
Lara Shiffman and Jackie Harris Hochberg
James and Virginia Comley, Bonnie Comley, Stewart Lane, Leah Lane, and Claudette Darrell
Hostess Joyce Mullins Jackson welcomes Reginald Van Lee
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Lisa Tamburini (Hampton Classic)
Caryn Zucker, Debbie Bancroft, and Heather Mnuchin
Nina Stuart
Showering before showtime
Up next ...
Beatrice Del Favero, Elisabeth Holder, and Amanda Sheppard
Candace Dyal and Murray Horwitz
Renowned sculptor Hans Van de Bovenkamp and Denise Moore
Dana Hammond Stubgen and Simone Levinson
Yesim Philip and Mary Kathryn Navab
Stephanie Riggio, Michael Bulger, and Louise Riggio
Don Cornwell, Bob Adams, and Corey White
Scot Evans and Linda Umla
Set for lunch ...
Georgina Bloomberg, Alison Boris, Susan Alcala, and Toni Condon
Adriel Reboh and Christine Schott
Lisa McCarthy, Robert Lyster, and Cassandra Seidenfeld
Fashion designer Edward Wilkerson
Donna Zilkha and Alexandra Lebenthal
Bob Perry, Peg Alston, and Willis Burton
Constance Saunders, Robert Perry, and Gail Monroe Perry
Michelle Bergeron and Barbara Hemmerle Gollust
Wolffer Estate Vineyard Ladies ready to serve....
Saddle scene
Saddles for sale
Danielle Ganek
Former First Lady of D.C. Cora Masters Barry and Reginald Van Lee
Laura Lofaro Freeman
Lauren Grafer and friend
Phyllis Yoo, Charlie Ward, and Grace Palmer
Lisa Simonson Phillips and Cassandra Seidenfeld
Dushy Roth, Joyce Mullins-Jackson, and Roman Roth
Louise Riggio and Sara Davison
Kristopher Hegland, Nicolas Turko, Julia Erdman, and Michael Tomei
Cheryl Buck, Bonnie Cannon, and Denise Moore
Anna Eagle and Khephra Burns
Kylie Cavaco Reck and Blair Voltz Clarke
Enrica Arengi Bentivoglio, Barbara Hemmerle Gollust, Lisa Jackson, Ann Hasiotis, Margie Loeb, and Charlotte Assaf
Georgina Bloomberg and Jill Rappaport
Elisa Bitton, Joana Klausen, and Debra Siffert
Stacey Pashcow, Alexandra Gardi, Dori Cooperman, Valesca Guerrand-Hermes, and Clea Guerrand-Hermes
Alexandra Titone and Lila Titone
Anna Eagle, Robert Kirk, and Susan Taylor
Karen Duarte, Stephanie Riggio, and Keith Dane
A little down time at the opening day of the 37th annual Hampton Classic.
Adelina Wong Ettelson and Stephanie Winston Wolkoff
Elisa Bitton, Debra Siffert, Herbert Roberts, and Jennifer Faga
Samantha Boardman Rosen
Fiona Rudin, Michelle Bergeron, Michelle McMaster, and Pamela Ludwick
Wolffer Estate Vineyards Lounge in the VIP tent
Hunter Ring Entrance
Walton Ward, Kassidy Babcock, Elliott Levenglick, and Benjamin Brey
Charlotte Assaf, Dayssi Olarte de Kanavos, and Madeline Hult Elghanayan
Sculpture Garden
Round 1 ...
Rob Jones, Todd Hutcheson, Calum Gair-Stephenson, and Alex Hamer
Bob and Judy Adams
Melissa Biggs Bradley, Jamee Gregory, and Mary Kathryn Navab
Adelina Wong Ettelson
Hannah McFarland, Alexia Hamm Ryan, Yesim Philip, and Mary Snow
Hat ladies ...
Stephen and Marlon Wald
Leonard Riggio and Louise Riggio
Evidence Dance Company associate artistic director Arcell Cabuag
Amanda Fraser Gajwani and Madeline Hult Elghanayan
Clare McKeon and Nathalie Kaplan
Corey McCathern and Reginald Van Lee
Jennifer Faga, Julie Ratner, and Joan Kraisky
Karla Harwich, Adelina Wong Ettelson, and Clarita Fodor
Dayssi Olarte de Kanavos and Cecile Andrau
Brian Simonson, Jenny Dunion, and Craig Reynolds
Lunching in the VIP tent
Ready to go
Wendy Frank and Michelle Bergeron
The bubbly is ready!
Michelle Bergeron and Phyllis Yoo

Donna Zilkha, Bettina Zilkha, and Christina Robert
Eugenio Lopez Alonso, and Esthella Provas
Steve Heinzer and Kiki Heinzer
Aaron Hsu and Sasha Cutter
Guests on the porch
Michael, Ava, and Anna Safir
Billy Kimball, Alexandra Kimball, and George Farias
Leo Daly, Anne Kopelson, and Arnold Kopelson
Nancy Saladino and Sevi Regis
Gary Pudney and Sharon Sondes
Shelley And Michael Carr
Robert Zimmerman and Debbie Bancroft
Rob Wiesenthal and Chris Isham
Sylvia Mazzola, John Mazzola, and Alison Mazzola
Wendy Stark, Annette Tapert, Georgia Howe, and Lou Howe
Fred Seegal, Charlie Moss, and Robyn Seegal
Jane Fonda and Richard Perry
Leo Hoenighausen, Bebe Reed, and John Dewis
Lupo and Priscilla Rattazzi, and Chris Isham
Carol Laffey and Kelly Laffey
Susan Fales-Hill and Angela Costanzo
Valerie Cox
Kilkare At 135 Years Old
Susan Fales-Hill and Christopher Robbins
Alex Hitz, Marin Hopper, Alessandro Uzielli, and Kimm Uzielli
Laurie MacCaskill	and	Becca Thrash
Liliana Cavendish in J.McLaughlin
Jill Davis, Ed Conard, and Susan Fales-Hill
Sophia Signorelli and Jim Signorelli
Ann Keating and Susan Malloy
Alex Hitz hosted a dinner for a hundred guests high above Sunset Plaza in Los Angeles.
Susan Fales-Hill and Laurie Wofford
Harriet and Ronald Weintraub
Valentina, Bryan Hunt, Clifford Ross, and Matthew Dontzin
Kyle Blood, Barbara Dixon, and Lisa Schultz
Eleanora Kennedy and Christine Schwarzman
Lee Fryd, Anki Leeds, and Christine Biddle
Nick Leighton and Andrew Ferrinelli
Carole and Philippe De Louvier
Eric Freeman and Suzanne Cochran
Harry and Harrison Hurt
Tom Dittmer, Lisa Fine, and Bill Smith
Cheryl Bergenfeld and Jamie Figg
Catherine Carey, Polly Onet, Robyn Joseph, Leslie Maheras, and Dr. Annette Rickel
Mark Hissey and Christina Robert
Susan Fales-Hill and Christina Robert
Annabelle Shulman, Steven Shulman, and Joan Linclau
Christine Kirk and Jason Kirk
Robin and Robert Leacock
The staff: Abraham Setbom, Justin Eden, Gil Jackson, Dutch Johnson, Nick Ballard, and Ted Burkow
Best-Ever Brownies
Heather and Tom Leeds
Jennifer Maguire and Priscilla Rattazzi Whittle
Diana Nathanson and Jeff Klein
Thomas Dewey and Michelle Dewey
The view
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Anniewatt.com (Kilkare)
Ken Wyse, Dr. Annette Rickel, and Burt Minkoff
Barbara Davis
Sima and Morad Ghadamian
Carly Steel
Ava with Staff
Susannah Kagan and Claudia Overstrom
Ed Victor and Nicholas Calloway
Denise Deluca and Dina Chartouni
Chip Conlan and Carol Mack
Chef  Jeff Parker
Pamela Snyder
Nikki Haskell
Carol Matthews, BeBe Reed, Rudolfo Monaco, and Frank Bowling
Grega Daly and Leo Daly
Joan and John Jakobson
Jane Holzer and Eric Shiner
Beth Rudin DeWoody, Susan Stroman, and Craig Starr
Alison Gorsuch and Devin Corrigan
Beth Rudin DeWoody, Billy Kimball, and Justine Bloomingdale
Susan Kraus
Susan Calhoun, Idoline Scheerer, Jo Carol Lauder, Ronald Lauder, Eleanora Kennedy, and Mary Hilliard
Melanie And David Holland
Beverly Hills Barbecue Chicken
Michael Kennedy, Tim Malloy, and Stephen Schwarzman
Colt Givner and Pamela Fiori
Hutton Wilkinson and Ruth Wilkinson
Marin Hopper and Frances Schultz
Heirloom Tomato Pie
Frank Bowling and Freddie Windsor
Annette Tapert, Alex Hitz, and Jane Fonda
Susan Fales-Hill and Laura Blair
Joanie McDonell
Michael Kennedy, and Jenny and Steve Kroft
Philipe And Gigi Bigar, and Amza and Andrew Bossom
Leo Hoenighausen and BeBe Reed
Geoffrey Thomas and Richard Johnson
Bob Gianos
Gunnar Overstrom and Peter Kagan
Jamee and Peter Gregory
Richard Conway, Michael Chae And Alexa Chae, and Greta Weil
Alison Mazzola and Norman Polonofsky

Ronnie and Charles Lavine with Mona!
Mike De Paola and Wendy Cromwell
Suzy Malick, Patrick McMullan, and Deanna Raida
Scott Alper, Jessica Udell, Scott Udell, Sheri Lane, Darren Lane, Riki Udell, Jared Udell, Randi Udell-Alper, Bob Eisenstadt, and Zach Udell at the Animal Rescue Fund of The Hamptons' Jewels of Summer.
Brian McCarthy and Steven Dunaif
Mayer and Fran Udell
Michael, Dylan, and Cheri Friedman
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Riki Udell and Jessica Udell
Jean and Martin Shafiroff
Shawn Frankel and Tricia Kallett
Tricia Kallett and Craig Klosk
Lisa Weinstack and Brad Weinstock
Gale and Ira Drukier
Bettina Prentice
Marcy Gordon and Diana Chudnoff
Gene Pressman and Christine Pressman
Christopher Robbins, Samantha Yanks, and David Yanks
Amanda Gimble, Myron Glucksman, and Judah Kraushaar
Franco LaCosta, Natalie Kates, and Fabrizio Ferri
Faran Cohen, Marcy Czeizler, and Jayme Cohen
Talin Schlachet, Lara Schlachet, David Schlachet, Greta Poretsky, and Cedric McNebb
Steven Price and Craig Klosk
Steve Eckhaus, Sherry Eckhaus, Douglas Oliver, Sherry Oliver, Warren Terwilliger, and Aki Terwilliger
Lisa McCarthy and Donald the Dog
Meghan Boody, Mary Gail Parr, and Melody Dourof
Candy Udell and Martin the Dog
Robert Albertson and Suzanne Murphy
Alana McCarthy and Haley Baldwin
Omeed Malik and Brooklyn Elias
Andrea Fasman, Dr. Rick Hodes, Craig Klosk, Tricia Kallett, Molly Klosk, Dejene Hodes, Zach Fasman, and Steven Price
Catlean de Monchy and Lawrence Boschetto
Hope Sandrow and Lowery Sims
Sheri Lane, Steve Kalman, and Jill Kalman
Nico Lemoal-Polumbo, Randy Polumbo, and Meghan Boody
Carolyn Sterling, James Sterling, and Bettina Prentice
Jackie, Devon, Mike, and Madison De Paola
Judah Kraushaar and Sarah Eisenman
Tim Claire, Lin Claire, Candy Udell, Rita Castagna, and Frank Castagna
Brett Marcus Coady, Suzy Malick, Deanna Raida, and Preston Wood
Mary Brosnahan and Lawrence Boschetto
Lawrence Boschetto, Steven Kinder, Michelle Pavlu, and Edward Pavlu
Bob Gordon and Marcy Gordon
Doreen Eisenstadt, Candy Udell, Linda Singer, Riki Udell, Jessica Udell, and Betsy Ferrara
Ted Kauffman and Stacey Boral
Joshua Liner, Lauren Sivis, and Josh Sivis
Lance Korman, Brian Waterman, Craig Klosk, Tricia Kallett, Lauren Lesser, Jodi Waterman, and Shawn Frankel
Chuck Scarborough, Sara Davison, and Frances Hayward
Doreen Eisenstadt and Linda Singer
Kathleen Rice, Chuck Scarborough, Candy Udell, and Scott Udell
Andrea Fasman, Dejene Hodes, Dr. Rick Hodes, Molly Klosk, Craig Klosk, Tricia Kallett, Steven Price, and Zach Fasman
Steven Price, Dejene Hodes, Ilie Wacs, JoAnn Silverstein, and Sam Silverstein
Eve Urvater, Ann Kelman, and Debbie Karol
Judith Hope and Dorothy Frankel
Jennifer Landes and Priscilla Bayley
Marty and Lauren Geller
Leslie Stevens
Gale Drukier, Candy Udell, and Sara Davison
Andrew Andrew
Sheri Pasqarella, Francine LeFrak, and Rick Friedberg
Karen McKinnon and Billy Copley
Donna Slotnik and Barry Slotnik
David Yurman and Dr. Jay Gladstone
Hayley Foster and Adam Foster
Shelly Fremont, Eric Shiner, Jane Holzer, and Eneas Capaldo
Alyssa Weiss, Guy Billauer, Jill Smith, and Bob Smith
Polly Bruckman, Jay Kuhlman, Sarah Alward, and John Trentacoste
Larry Harrison and Mary Brosnahan
Suzanne Murphy and Donald the Dog
Fran and John Gutleber
Shelly Fremont, Austin Fremont, Vincent Fremont, Rex Crowe, and Casey Fremont Crowe
Justin Friedman, Luka Vassilaros, Victoria Zaro, Tonio Vassilaros,and Brian Brown
Bettina Prentice and Casey Fremont Crowe
Rex Crowe and Shelly Fremont
Laurence Kimmell, Joanne Vitulli, and Joseph Vitulli
Kim Seeherman, Tricia Kallett, David Seeherman, and Debbie Karol
Denise LeFrak Colicchio, John Colicchio, Rick Friedberg, Francine LeFrak, and Dr. Barry Coller
Dr. Howard Sobel and Gayle Sobel
Ronald Perelman, Usher, and Pharrell Williams
Greg Kelly
L.A. Reid and Damien Smith
Donna Karan, Sandy Gallin, Anjelica Huston, and Jimmy Buffett
Richard Johnson and Sessa von Richthofen
Robert Kraft, Russell Simmons, and Ernie Isley
Caroline Merison, Rebecca Seaman, Cat Kennan, and Karen Klopp
Ken Shelley, Steven Blauner, Simon and Loli Roosevelt
Alicia and Dan Bythewood
Dr. Barry Coller and Dr. Bobbi Coller
Ron Lauder
Natalie Kruglyak, Hudson Shapiro, Lucas Shapiro, and Rachel Kruglyak
Susan Abu Haidar and Barbara Tober
Molly Schaefer, Chris Spitzmiller, and Dana Cowin
Barbara Tober and Olivia van Melle Kamp
Kirsten Fitzgibbons, Eileen Arascott, and Kelli Ford
Brad and Cassandra Grey
Olga Ovchynnikova and Andrew Chapman
Karen LeFrak, Jennifer Diggins, Denise LeFrak Colicchio, and Dr. Bobbi Coller
Lorna Luft, Barry Manilow, and Penny Marshall
Diane Chapman, Tim Zagat, Becky Thornton, and Molly Schaefer
Enjoying the horse trials
Erica Reid and Jennifer Hudson
Irene Banning, Susan and Munir Abuhaidar, and Ann Denny
Lorna Luft, Barry Manilow, and Anjelica Huston
Katie Gallagher and Leah LaBelle
Rick Friedberg, Gertrude Friedberg, and Greg Kelly
Lelee Brandt and Tom Francoline
Alvin Schechter and Janine Gordon
Denise LeFrak Colicchio
Sharon Sternheim, Somers Farkas, and Carol Penn
Ethel LeFrak, Raymond Kelly, and Greg Kelly
Cutting the ribbon
Molly Schaefer, Linda Daines, and Anne Busquet
Daniella DeClarico, Ray Perelman, and Carmen Sonders
Monica Wambold, Becky Thornton and Barbara Tober
Dutton, Roosevelt, Dady, and Colman children
Comissioner Ray Kelly and Veronica Kelly
Lynne Goldstein and Paul Goldstein
Alexander and Margaret Bancroft
Dr. Bobbi Coller
Alise Murray, Ron Isley, Kandy Isley, and Ernie Isley
Lorraine Bracco and Richard Parsons
JohnSykes, Rico Love, Usher, and Pharrell
Molly Schaefer, Marta Nottebohm, and Susan Abu Haidar
Julianne Hatkoff, Jane Rosenthal, and Penny Marshall
Allen Spiegel, Jan Vilcek, and Marica Vilcek
Chris Spitzmiller and Alexandra Kasmin
Cat Kennan and Lisa Prince Fishler
Yolanda Ferrell Brown and Alvin Brown
Dr. Jo Ivey Boufford and Dr. Barry Coller
Cat and Chris Kennan
Arlene Shaner
Matthew and Susan Blank
Craig Ingber and Alison Diamond
Adam Shapiro and Lucas Shapiro
Tom, Bonnie, and Grant Uger
Ron Meyer and Jeff Zucker
Loic Villepontoux and Jasmine Mullers
Donald Tober, Ursula Gwynne, and Bob Thomas
Peter Hermann, Mariska Hargitay, Desiree Gruber, and Kyle MacLachlan
Donna Karen and Sandy Gallin
Dr. Barry Coller
Usher, Ron Isley, Paul McCartney, and Jon Bon Jovi
Richie Notar, Richie Sambora, and Scott Greenstein
Donald and Barbara Tober  with rider Phillip Dutton, who just returned from London Olympics riding Young Man
Tim and Nina Zagat
Jennifer Hudson and Roberta Flack
Emily Smith, Paul Deleon, and Vanessa Smith
Nancy and John Bruno
Jimmy Buffett and Ronald Perelman
Peggy Kauffman bronze auction item
Kevin Sheekey and Lorraine Bracco
Denise Herman and Barbara Tober
The scene of the Millbrook Horse Trials
Laurie Durning and Roger Waters
Millana Snow and Marcus Kane
Anthony Edson and Jennifer Drexler
Jack Banning and Cat Kennan
Joan Rothman and Hilary Less
Midge Richardson and Raymond Kelly
Jennifer Diggins and Raymond Kelly
Ricky Lander and Robert Kraft
Helen Lasichanh, Pharrell Williams, and Rico Love
Tommy Mottola, Jane Rosenthal, and Aryeh Bourkoff
Blaine Fogg, Diane Fogg, Karen LeFrak, and Richard LeFrak
Pharrell Williams and Usher
Rick Friedberg, Dr. Jo Ivey Boufford, Raymond Kelly, Francine LeFrak, Dr. Bobbi Coller, Dr. Barry Coller, Greg Kelly, and Dr. Lee Goldman
Alyssa Shapiro, Adam Shapiro, Dr. Barry Coller, Dr. Bobbi Coller, Lucas Shapiro, Hudson Shapiro, Natalie Kruglyak, Rachel Kruglyak, Leonid Kruglyak, and Hilary Coller Kruglyak
Jane and Richie Notar
Doug Dundas and Jennifer Dundas
Ray and Vivian Chew
Jennifer Diggins, Sharon Sternheim, Francine LeFrak, and Denise LeFrak Colicchio
Judy Berkowitz, Arturo Constantiner, and Caren Constantiner
Donald Tober, Ali Wambold, and John Ike at the 12th annual Millbrook Horse Trials.
Valentin and Yaz Hernandez
Christina Taylor, Steny Hoyer, Lauren Taylor, and Richard Parsons
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com & Shahar Azran (Apollo); AnnieWatt.com (Milbrook)
Jeffrey Terrance and Lilly Hartley

Oskar Eustis with Tom and Billie Tisch
Jean and Martin Shafiroff
Mitch Winehouse and Jane Winehouse
Rod and Judy Gilbert
Tovah Feldshuh and Dr. Ruth
Avis Richards and Beth Ostrosky Stern
Robert Albertson
Shayla Franden and Michelle Javian
Jill Brooke
Michael Greif, Maggie Lacey, Bill Heck, and friend
Jonathan Marc Sherman and Perry Granoff
Event Chairs Jamie Mitchell, Sara Joyce Scharfer, Stacey Bronfman, Ramy Sharp, Harriet Croman, and Jennifer Gardner Trulson
Sally Field
Cynthia Nixon
Karen Kastenbaum and Marcia Riklis: Karen Kastenbaum and Marcia Riklis
Frank Rich and wife Alex Witchel
Anjali Arora and Jacqueline Markot
Trenton Harrison Lewis and Jessica Walsh
Kelly Bensimon
Christina Haag (Come to the Edge)
Lynn Sher (Swim)
Ginnie Frati and Rob Carmichael with Kalala the Owl
Dr. Ruth Westheimer and David Hryck
Ramy Sharp and Star Jones
Robert Caro
Camryn Manheim and Oskar Eustis
Dmitry Seron and Fallon Rechnitz
Keri Millstein and Susan Sabin
Taja Sevelle and Mitch Winehouse
Rutina Wesley
Ava Watkins and Blance Williamson
Michael Paraskevas signing
Lisa Hartman
Photographs by Rob Rich (Wildlife Rescue Center); Steve Shevett (Public Theater); Lisa Tamburini (Authors Night); Gail Tobias (UJA); Sunny Norton (Harboring Hearts)
Andy Siegel (Suzy's Case)
Dr. Ruth signing her books
Jeffrey Lyons (Stories My Father Told Me)
Harboring Hearts Supporters
Children's book author, Michael Paraskevas
Ann Ligouri (A Passion For Golf )
Craig Pravda, Michelle Javian
Monte Lipman and Mitch Winehouse
Donna and Dick Soloway
Dr. Tara Allmen, Lawrence Kimmel, and Dr. Joann Vitulli
Co-chair, Ken Auletta
Beth Ostrosky Stern
Chip Zien and Joanna Gleason
Bonnie Comely, Stewart F. Lane and Leah Lane
Dorothy Frankel, Dr. Ruth, and George Stephanapolis
Paul Schindler, Billy Walters, Leslie Alexander, and Howard Lorber
Robert Klein (The Amorous Busboy of Decautur Avenue)
Eric and Mary Raff with Joseph and Joann Vituli
Jett Four
Christopher and Joanie Fischer
Mitch Winehouse and Dominick Farinacci Quartet
Mitch and Janis Winehouse
Ali Wentworth (Ali in Wonderland)
Authors waiting to sign and sell their books
Public Theater Executive Director Patrick Willingham, Stephen Sondheim, James Lapine, and Public Theater Artistic Director Oskar Eustis
Suzanne Murphy
Martino the Owl
Ted Shen
Dr. Ruth and Ali Wentworth
Jeff and Wendy Barker
Jamee Gregory (New York Parties - Private Views)
Maria Barnett and Mikelle Kennedy
Sam Talbot (The Sweet Life)
Leah Lane and Katie Lee
Mortimer Zuckerman and Camille Douglas
Ward Morehouse III (Inside the Plaza)
Elyse Newhouse
Karyn Mannix and Lori Schultz showing their new purchase
Debbie and Bill Gorin
Hilary Knight signing his book
Chuck and Ellen Scarborough
Martha Rogers and Dick Cavett
Mitch Winehouse and Judy Limon
Michael Lindsay-Hogg
Sarah Kernochan and Barry Rosenstein
Alan Cumming
Nancy Seid and Jonathan Sabin
Kim Catullo, Christine Quinn, State Assemblyman Daniel O’Donnell, and friend
Denis O’Hare and Amy Adams
Bob Gersh
Mathew Cullen, Norey Dotterer Cullen, and Effie Ellis Taylor
Lauren Lefkovits, Cheryl Lefkovits, Marion Waxman, Ramona Singer, and Carol Singer
Kitty Cushing and Annie Owen Pontez
Marilyn Borysek, Kim Standish, Candace Leeds, and Judy Gilbert
Shari Applebaum
Richard and Nancy Rogers
Aliza Zelin, Alix Anfang, Sammi Steinberg, Grace Bronstein, Brittain Youngblood, and Alissa Jacob
Dana Trulis and Chris Savoglou
Cynthia M. Boyea
Maria Fishel and Alvin Valley
Pam Morgan, Mario Singer, Marion Waxman, Jean-Georges, Ramona Singer, and Dr. Samuel Waxman
Diane De Chiaro and Father Francis Gasparik
Nancy Isherwood and Stephen Lipman
Ernie Anastos, Joan Lunden, and Father Francis Gasparik
Marion Waxman, Dr. Samuel Waxman, Michael, and Jack
Jamie Tisch and Caio Fonseca
Ryan Sabinsky, Juan Valez, Benjamin Kurtz, Lyna Juong, Samuel Waxman, Jean-Georges Vongerichten, Joseph Murphy, Ron Gallo, Anthony Rico, and Frank Calamia
Ariele Gordon, Sara Hansen, Ali Ziph, and Jessica Weber
Derek and Nicole Limbocker
Emily Lohrman and Chris Wragge
Emma Kurz and Lukasz Mosakowski
Pattie Samuel, Michael Gerazounis, and Liset Cordero
Marion Waxman, Mary Kantor, Adrienne Kantor, and Pam Morgan
Nir Hod
Father Francis Gasparik and Christine Chipurnoi
Tina Vasan and Molly Zinzi
Paul Stoffel and Gayle Stoffel
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (Waxman); Anniewatt.com (St. Francis).
Jessica French and Martin Shnay
Jared Verteramo and Erica Pearl
Michelle Cooper and Dr. Robert Sideli
Grace Gengenbach and Michelle Cooper
Cover from her new children's book, Liana
Hilary Ayala, Francis A Resheske, Agnes Zakrzewska, Margaret Grioli, and Joseph Sano
Colleen Reid, Emily Lohrman, Nicky DeFosset, Suzie DeFosset, and Monika Plocienniczak
Caterine Milinaire with friends and Liana masks
Edie Cushing, Elizabeth Mc Millen, and Julie Warburton
Mera and Don Rubell
Oliver Barker with Tom Friedman’s Which
Bill Selby and friend
Lyndsey Rodrigues, Kara Venner, Sarah Sarpolis, Jared Verteramo, Erica Pearl, Christine Hogan, and Linda Gjelaj
Tom Sachs' Poche Vide (2011-2012) was among the highlights of the live auction. It sold for $155K – well over its $120K estimated value.
Terry Siracusano and Abigail Garcia
Natalia Saavedra, Linda Shapiro, and Isabel Saavedra
Lewis and Elizabeth Rutherfurd
Allen Questrom and Lisa Dennison
Dr. Samuel Waxman, Pat Keefe, and Richard Plotkin
Marion Waxman, Meryl Sherman, Adrienne Jordan, and Laurie Schaffran
Margo Catsimatidis and John Catsimatidis
Bob Sylvestri and Honoree Diane Dechiaro
James Coleman Jr.
David and Dee Gordon, Wendy and George David, Caterine Milinaire, and Fred Cushing
Soledad and Robert Hurst
Eleanore and Domenico De Sole
Father Andrew O'Connor, Father Francis Gasparik, and Thomas Vendetti
John and Jae French
Cindy Feinberg and Father Francis Gasparik
Xaviera Simmons and Emilio Perez
Sandy Taub, David Blum, Jean-Georges, and Marc Taub
Michelle Cooper anmd Father Francis Gasparik
Barbara Duncan, Monique and Jamie Coleman, and Kate Gubelman
Sara Fitzmaurice and Perry Rubenstein
Al Vivier, Erin Gibbs, and Adriana Pidwerbetsky
Tom Sachs and Sarah Hoover
John and Gretchen Berggruen
Tina Vasan and Father Francis Gasparik
Joe Mele
Ernie Anastos, Faith Hope Consolo, Father Francis Gasparik
Alecia Joy Bloom, Maria Fishel, and Erika Szabo
Tom Blake and Brownie Warburton
Ryan Lee, Adriana Pidwerbetsky, Ken Wielebinski, Erin Gibbs, Peter Maroney, and Al Vivier
Alexandra Lopez, Stacey Asher, and Stephanie Arbelacz
Luis Gispert
Nicola Marcus, Jeff Marcus, and Carolyn Powers
Ken Johnson, Janice Piszczatowski, Anthony Viviani, and Lisa Canty
Dasha Zhukova, Anne Pasternak, and Haley Mellin
Anne Dayton, Karen Boyer, and Meri Miller
Karen Dome and Father Francis Gasparik
Shameem Shah and Wendy Jackson
Ellen Canny-Goldberg and Father Francis Gasparik
Jen Mitchell, John Burman, and Abigail Gibavic
James Cushing and Mimi Anthony
Jacqueline and Jeff Wray
Rob Pruitt and Jonathan Horowitz
Dane Trulis, Morgan Gorospe, and Cat Trenner
Gina and Tim DiPietro
Lisa and John Runyon
Joseph Sano, Faith Hope Consolo, and Father Francis Gasparik
Dr. Samuel Waxman, Diane Steiner, Ken Koopersmith, Era Brown, and David Brown
Debra Cole and Amy Bearss
Ken and Maria Fishel
Ed and Sally Callahan
Joanne Foulke, Nicole Duspipa, and John Chiodi
Caterine Milinaire with one of her photographs on exhibit
Fitzie Ism, Jessica Mackin, Jenna Mackin, Nicole B. Brewer, Melanie Fitzgerald, Susan Kirby, and Robert Lacey
Nick Benson, Diana Oswald, and Alix Flood
Chris Stone, John Bossard, and David Fox
Angel Otero
Mt. Carmel Holy Rosary Violin
JJ Watson and Francisco Echeverri
Heidi Zuckerman Jacobson, Lance Armstrong, and Amy Phelan

Sophie Askew and Jay Soave
Nancye Simpson and Peter Larkin
Abhay Deshpande and Michele Shapiro
John Wambold, George Wambold, and John Wambold Jr,
Louise Collins, Elizabeth Morford, Graham Watkins, Hildegarde Jones, and Anne Miller
Helga Fisch and Richard Hodosh
Jason Wright and Jeff Ganz
Lowline supporters
Lisa Arnold, Rome Arnold, and Mary Unsworth
Planned Lowline Park
Madame Mayhem and Alex Donner
Kay Hanson, Michael Davis, Kitty Kelley, Jodi Ann Russo, Dr. Martin Stone, and Nancy Stone
Karen Carpenter, Tanya Rosen, Charlie Brock, Mira Spektor, and Mary Jane Brock
Cheri Kaufman and Bill Sclight
Shail Upadhya and Karen Bass
Bobby Debbs, Merrill Debbs, Cathy Duemler, and Lee Duemler
Helen Charash and Murray Charash
Ira Leeds and Ellen Saidenberg
Hilary Rosenman and Bevin Kaplan
Jack Hadlock and Melanie Wambold
Clockwise from top left: Dr. Doug Steinbrech and Jeff Sharp with their extended family; Dr. Doug Steinbrech; Betsy Maloney and Catherine McCormick; Priscilla Rattazzi and Peter Brown.
Jonathan Etzion, David Cohen, and Seth Generide
Susie Wagner and Dr. Gerard Turino
PMP chorus
Linda Yates and George Yates
Joe Fuchs, Shelia O'Malley Fuchs, Mildred Brinn, Rob Fox, and Alison Downey
Sydney Stark and Morgan Stark
Jim Gray, Jeff Kronemeyer, and Elyn Kronemeyer
Lauren Grushkin and Louis Renzo
Gallery view
Eilene Oehl and Ronald Oehl
Karen Lippman and Jay Dweck
Clockwise from top left: Beetle boats; Dark Island; Lavender skies; Kelp.
The Perltones
Itzhak Perlman, Governor David Paterson, Hank Keilly, and Jeff Greene
Leighann Loftus, Clotilde Dedecker, and Miranda Lewis
Serena Miniter, Steven Stolman, and Gillian Miniter
Cindy Willis
Thank You presentation to the Starks
Edward Jacobs and Nigel Marcussen
Christine and Randall Blank
Stephanie Moller and Kathy Price
R. Couri Hay, Patricia Duff, Robert Zimmerman, and Debbie Bancroft
Paola Bacchini Rosenshein, Suzanne Murphy, Nancy Silberkleit, Lucia Hwong Gordon, Jean Shafiroff, Joy Marks, Sara Herbert-Galloway, and Cheri Kaufman
Ellen and Chuck Scarborough
Margo MacNabb Nederlander and Mary MacNabb
Bob Chaloner, Jean Remmel Little FitzSimmons, Melanie Wambold, and Larry Horton
James Ramsey, Dan Barasch, and Cooper Cox
Maestro Perlman conducting  the orchestra
Itzhak Perlman and Toby Perlman
Toby Perlman, Jenny Sibony, Tom Skilken, Susan Lloyd, Paul Gridley, and Itzhak Perlman
Paige Pederson and Nancy Lopez-Balboa
Michael Aaron and Christine Aaron
Frances Jin, Frank Cohen, and Sarah Harvey
Garrett Albert and Morgan Stark
Cornelia Foss and Keren Saks
Reed Baron and Justin Martin
Svetlana Wachtell and Herbert Wachtell
George Wambold, Wells Johnston, Kate Root, John Wambold Jr, Kirsten Root, Angela Hearst, and Kip Geddes
Esther Gaffron and Eduardo Gaffron
Patty Bigelow and Dr. Phil Piro
Mei Sze Greene and Tracey Keilly
Dan Barasch and Zach Aarons
Gordon von Broock and Emel Dilek
Robert Cahill Jr. and Adele Keogh
Melanie Wambold and Somers Farkas
Phyllis Kessler and Douglas Harrington
Agnes Zilyte with John and April Trigg
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (SH Hospital); Lisa Tamburini (Lowline); Anniewatt.com (Perlman)
Steven Stolman, Judy Hadlock, and Rich Wilkie
Carla Solomon and Grace Yun
Jean Shafiroff and Sharon Kerr
Southampton Village Mayor Mark Epley and Bob Chaloner
Sandra McConnell and Christopher Obetz
Jackie Walsh and Danielle Levy
Julia Hornig and David Haber
Alex Moazed, Joan Hornig, Will Roush, and George Hornig
Julie Su, Julia Hornig, Jackie Marino, and Lizzy Geldres
Christopher Welton and Kelly Thomas
Charles Daucourt and Steven Barlow
Richard Flood, Michael Stout, Barbara Gladstone, and Marc Goldstein
Dylan and Peter Brant
Leesa Rowland and Larry Wohl
Priscilla Zoullas, Stella Chalabi, and Ana Macedo
Anna Okshteyn and Shimon Okshteyn
Janice Gerton and Robert Siegel
Christine Aaron and Paul Gridley
Dusty Phillips and Claus Moller
Timothy Godbold and Whitney Fairchild
Jim Freeman and Laura Lofaro Freeman
Julia Hornig and Dustin Blank
Arnie Rosenshein, Jim Gray, and Martin Shafiroff
Clockwise from top left: Michael Carlisle, Sally Peterson, and Peter Cary Peterson; David Kleinberg and Luke Redgrave; David Kleinberg and Priscilla Rattazzi.
Lana Smith and Polina Proshkina
Clockwise from top left:  Peter Cary Peterson, Paige Peterson, and David Peterson; Peter Marcelle and Paige Peterson; Anki Leeds; Greta Weil and Richard Conway.
Toby Perlman and Jenny Sibony
Stefan Reyniak, Katie Juhas, Christina deforest Keys, and Pauline Reyniak
Martin and Audrey Gruss
David Cohen, Jonathan Etzion, and Emily and Paul Devlin
Simi Ahuja and Laura Brightsen
Lisa Simonson Phillips
Steven Stolman takes the lead at Southampton Hospital's 54th annual Summer Benefit.
Sarah, Robbie, and Christine Browns with Paul Ferrillo
Will Bancroft and Sandra McConnell
Alex Donner and Band
Tom Skilken and Susan Lloyd
Christopher Cory and Helen Rattray
Christine Blank, Ran Blank, Governor David Paterson, and Hank Keilly
David and Christina deforest Keys

Fern Mallis, Howard Sobel, Katie Couric, Gayle Sobel, Rosanna Scotto, Julie Ratner, Rose Franco, and John Franco at  the annual "Heat" benefit for the Ellen Hermanson Foundation.
John Franco, Rose Franco, Rosanna Scotto, and Louis Ruggiero
Dr. Mark Kot and Kelli Delaney
Mercedes Ruehl
Haley and Jason Binn
Roshi Ameri and Simone Hossackv
May Wuthrich
Renowned Flautist Wendy Luck.
Mike Fogarty and Rachael Langer
Adriana Trigiani with Ann J. Parks
John and Margo Catsimatidis
Dorothy Lichtenstein
Drama Desk Lifetime Achievement Award Winner, Performer/Actress Mary Testa
Harry Johns
Filmmakers Constance Marks (Sundance Award-Winning "Being Elmo") and James Miller with their daughter
Julian Mommert, Robert Wilson, and Shaikha Paula al-Sabah
Julie Ratner, Joe Pontarelli, and Jane Pontarelli
Fabiana Dutesco
Emily Levin and Julie Ratner
Lou Reed
Edie Falco, Geoffrey Zakarian, and Aida Turturro
Geoffrey Nimmer, Dianne Benson, and Robert Wilson
Reid and Aviva Drescher
Amy Palmer and Chris Wragge
Katie Couric and Rosanna Scotto
Host Tim Stephenson with Peter and Heather Rooney
Author & filmmaker Adriana Trigiani with husband, lighting producer, Tim Stephenson, at their Greenwich Village townhouse.
Countess Luann de Lesseps, Heather Thomson, Michelle McCool, Samantha Yanks, and Aviva Drescher
Gina Zecharelli (whose family was the inspiration for Trigiani's "Very Valentine") and friend
Molly Chappellet, Jack Lenor Larsen, and Luanne Wells
Dee Dee Ricks and Karine Bakhoum
Nicole Sexton and Chele Chiavacci
Philip Glass
Ron Wendt and Baroness Sheri DeBorchgrave
Anne Hearst McInerney and Jay McInerney
Rafella De Angelis with best-selling author Susan Fales-Hill ("Always Wear Joy", "One Flight Up")
Sharon Bush and Bettina Zilkha
Nancy Bolmeier Fisher.
Samantha Daniels and Steve Farber
Dee Dee Ricks and Armando Vuksonovic
Michael and Jamie Brickhouse
Anne Hearst McInerney, Robin Meltzer, Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia, and Bettina Zilkha
Cricket Burns
Robin Meltzer and Deborah Grubman
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (Hermanson, Alzheimer's)
Melinda Miller, Cary Randolph Fuller, Ross Burack, and Michael Gleicher
Claudia Fleming and Geoffrey Zakarian
Jay Diamond and Alexandra Lebenthal
Lauren Thayer and Lisa Lori
Geoffrey Zakarian, Fern Mallis, Katie Couric, Howard Sobel, Gayle Sobel, and Rosanna Scotto
Cocktails and hor d'oeuvres
Magdalena von Behr
Alexis Hurley, Patti Reynolds, Dee Dee Ricks, and Leslie Falk
Mary Vetri, Karolann Rubin, and Karen Towey
Martha and Peter Webster
David Perry, Gayle Sobel, and Lauren Perry
Monique Knowlton and Cindy Sherman
Roger Meltzer, Robin Meltzer, Marline Sexton, and Nicole Sexton

Stacy Engman, Charles Renfro, Zaldy, Daniel Gortler, and Elsa Silvan
Traditional Burmese dancer
Alan Kalter, Sarah Higgins, Judie Taylor, Time Callahn, and Quintano
Jorn Weisbrodt and Simon de Pury
Geoff Simone, Larry Festa, Steve Santoro, and Tom Bradbury
Fred Tanne and Laura Moore
Brian Whelehan, Michael Reardon, and Eric Koelmel
Midge Richardson and Joan Hornig
Jay McInerney
Carlos Soto and Jorn Weisbrodt
Patricia Velasquez and Russell Simmons
Karyn Mannix and Tariq Alexander
Peter Tunney and Sonja Muttall
Guido Aren and Chenault Spence
Guy and Gayle Tudisco
David Preyser, George Hornig, and Jane Preyser
Margarite Almeida and James Cavello
Jeffrey Slonim and Shamin Abas
Tamia Hill and Grant Hill
Ed O'Toole, Jason Carlough, Palmer Whitney, and Peter Brennan
Kevin McLaughlin, Debbie Bancroft, and Barbara McLaughlin
Sybrina Fulton and Jahvaris Fulton
Charles Riley, Bettina Witteveen, Raoul Witteveen, and Susan Rockefeller
Christine and Richard Reibick, Chiara Lei, and Cristina Verger
Julia Vance Carter and Joan Hornig
Marty Litt, Steve Ballinger, and Jon Zack
Valerie Boster, Lisa Anastos, and Sophia Sanchez Barrenechea
Frankie Kineavy, Greg Hannah, Ed Matthews, Pat Roddy, Len Berman, Nick Gaynor, Jill Flint, and Spencer Ross
Tatiana Platt, Chris Brown, and Alina Cho
Stavros Tsibiridis and Christine James
Simone and David Levinson
Ali and Jill Zarin
Sarah Hoover and Tom Sachs
Jorn Weisbrodt, Susan Rockefeller, Klaus Biesenbach, and Todd Bishop
Jonathan Farkas and Somers Farkas
Miguel Ortiz and Kevin Moore
Persia White
Stefano Tonchi and Lisa Perry
Roni Jackson and Kevin K. Williams
Cindy Sherman and Lou Reed
Sara Herbert-Galloway and Barry Klarberg
Jeremy H. Fitzgerald, Jeremy Fitzgerald, Susan Kaufman, Aaron Kaufman, and Amy Bearss
Erin Nida, Shwezin Win, Dr. Myat Myat Mon, and John Nida
Tariq Alexander, Jane Preyser, and David Haber
Karen, Stewart, and Bruce Clarke
Soledad O'Brien
Lana Smith, Henry Buhl, and James Cavello
Aoki and Ming
Sophia Sanchez Barrenechea
Alfred E. Smith IV, Sheila Lennon, and John Madigan
Justin Waldron, Misaki Kawai, and Andrew Gilchrist
Henry Buhl and Linda Silverman
Yung Hee Kim, Richard Meier, and Tamara Braverman
John and Erin Nida with Joan Hornig
Pat Iuto, Michael Schatz, and Nora Coblence
Nicholas Gaynor, Jill Flint, Len Berman, and Frankie Kineavy
Joesph "Rev Run" Simmons
Jane Gropp, Kevin Murphy, and Susan Jennings
Peter Brant Jr., Samantha Zaitz, and Andrew Warren
John Coppeto, Paul Vitale, and Rob Cardone
Peter Olsen, Jack Lenor Larsen, and Louis Gropp
John Lombardo, Jill Flint, and Christopher Laul
Tika Sumpter and Rocsi Diaz
D'Anna and Bill Hawthorne
Leila Straus and Mickey Straus
Louise Hirschfeld Cullman and Dirk Luckow
Ken Carmel and Ken Rosenberg
Jack Lenor Larsen and Toni Ross
Sabrina Leder, Marc Leder, Samantha Leder, and Russell Simmons
George Hornig and guests
Bill Hughes, Kieran Quinn, Brendan Farrell, Golf Pro, and Brenda O'Connor
Matilde Guidelli Guidi and Alain Coblence
Sheikha Paula and Al Sabah
Shwezin Win, Lois Dickason Young, and Dr. Myat Myat Mon
Nicole Miller and Kim Taipale
Carla Moran and Shayna McClelland
David Luce and Ashley Carlson
Amy Bearss and Aaron Kaufman
Tangie Murray
Tando Ntunja and Danny Simmons
Jim Stein, Tom Murray, and Tom O'Halloran
Janete Rodas and DJ Cassidy
Lauren LoGiudice and Jonathan D Lovitz
Brian Harrington and Greg Hannah
The dinner scene at the 13th annual Art For Life.
Klaus Biesenbach and Todd Bishop
B Michael and Mark Anthony
Sessa von Richthofen, Kyle DeWoody, and Richard Johnson
Roopal Patel, Meredith Melling Burke, and Valerie Boster
Shany Ellenberg, Rica Udani, Denise Vizcarra, and Lindsey Acree
Alexis di Chimay and Chiara Lei
Noreen Buckfire, Joan Hornig, and Ken Buckfire
Traditional Burmese refreshments were offered
Sir Ivan, Rabmila Lolly, and Jeffrey Beri
Baby Face and Star Jones
Lauren Remington Platt and Annelise Peterson
Burmese artwork
Diann B., Peter Olsen, Tina Maria Birch, and Jack Lenor Larsen
Marc Dennis and Stephanie Roach
Chenault Spence, Pres. of Cetana, with Cynthia Scott
Conversation and cocktails
Len Berman with Ken and Susan Auerbach
Tando Ntunja, Danny Simmons, Angela Simmons, Ming Lee Simmons, Miley Simmons, Russell Simmons, Russy Simmons, Justine Simmons, and Joseph 'Rev Run' Simmons
Adam and Beatrice Forbes with Noah and Lauren Lowry
Lisa Anastos and Robert Wilson
Justine Simmons
Gill Pattison and Lois Dickason Young
Daniel Gortler and Charles Renfro
Hope Waterbury, James Fischer, Lindsay Waterbury, Sue Rose, Debbie Beck, and Len Conway
MC Lyte
Spencer Ross, Len Berman, and Ed Matthews
Jason Oshiokpekhai and Lauren LoGuidice
Rufus Wainwright and Jorn Weisbrodt
Bedeta Hanley, Fabiola Belfort, and Shakira Ferrell
Michel Taittinger and Victoria Wyman
Eugenio Lopez and Jane Holzer
Antoinette Clark
Dr. Holly Phillips
Decorative Burmese objects were for sale
Steve and Sherry Stackhaus
Adrienne Conzelman, Damian Krause, and Sharon Dorram-Krause
Joan and George Hornig greeted guests
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com (Watermill, Art for Life, Hermanson); Lois Silver (UCP); Lisa Tamburini (Burma).

Guests sit by the bonfire
Stephen Rubin and Suzanne Ponsot
Southampton Animal Shelter Foundation's 3rd annual Unconditional Love Benefit at the home of Sandra McConnell raised over $375,000.
Courtney S. Crivits and Kris Magel
Rudy and Lydia Touzet
Monique Merrill and Diane de la Begassiere
Gayle Muszynski, Ali Abruzzese, John Nolan, Robert Abruzzese, Melissa Abruzzese, and John Oldman
Ken Bycoff and Martine Soren
Christy Birnbaum, Carolyn Comparato, and Marsha Harris
Susan and Peter Twombly with John Michael Murphy
Alex Schwartz, Mark Lewis, and Kerner Smith
Tracy London, Susan Lucci, and Sherri Abruzzese
Claudia DiFabrizio and Catherine Rawson
Michael Lynne, Liz Robbins, and Roy Furman
Peggy and Tia Walker
Robert Abruzzese, Matty Parker, and Antonia Walker
Sasha Greenawalt and Claire Gillman
Sara and Mark Lewis
Cassandra Seidenfeld
Dawne Marie Grannum, Isabel Ushery, David Ushery, and Dr. Penny Grant
Sherry Cohen and Suzanne Ponsot
Bill and Jessica Koenigsberg, and Sherri and Joe Abruzzese
Christopher and Joni Fischer
Zibby Right, Julie Smigel, Jen Harris, Cindy Mark, and Lisa Barr
Carl Sylvestre, Ben Oaks, and Iris Tapia
Laura Siegel, Jeffrey Siegel, and Tricia Pantzer
Jason and Tricia Pantzer
Joe Nehman, Susan Nehman, Joan Cohen, Ed Cohen, and Pam Pantzer
Brooke Laing and Brie Bythewood
Connie and George Magoris
Madeline McLaughlin
Joe Abruzzese, B. Smith, Dan Gasby, and Joe Abruzzese
Elena Truman, Dr. Lindsay Rich, and Marcy Czeizler
Photographs by Annie Watt (Festive in Flip Flops); Hanif Abdur Rahim  (Mission).
Gigi Bigar and Ming Lui
Tara and Riad Abrahams
Helmut Huber and Susan Lucci
George Mason and Emery Westfall
Allison Berg and Ashu Singh
Lisa Mahar, Ana Christina Alvarado, and Anne Bass
State Representative Arthur J. O'Neill and Dr. Rubi O'Neill
Doug Bycoff and Jenna Foley
Adam Nashban, Ann Herbst, and Jeremiah Hernandez
Shelly Styer, Boomer Esiason, and Patty Baker
Hilary Cushing Block, Brooke Block, and Macaulay Bogdanovics
Brett Heyman and Anne Cecilie Speyer
13. Jean Shafiroff, Lucia Hwong Gordon, Kim White, and Melanie Wambold
Orme and Mitchell
Kirsten Peckerman (board), Senator Richard Blumenthal, Linda Allard, and Jack Rosenberg
Jean Shafiroff, Jonathan McCann, Sandra McConnell, and Jane Hanson
Stacy London's shoes
NancyJane Loewy
Jean Shafiroff
Terry Hall, Natalie Royer, Mara Urshel, and Dorothy Silver
Dana Klein and Mark Feuerstein
Stacy London
Elizabeth Shafiroff, Lindsey Spielfogel, Jean Shafiroff, and Susan Allan
Sara Lewis and Marcy Callahan
Doug and Judy Hamilton with Frogard and Kevin Ryan
Marquesa de la Varela and Marcy MacDonald
Stanley Rubough, Anki Leeds, and Wendy Sarasohn
Cornelia Bregman and Lloyd W. Brown II
Jessica Burnstein and Jay Moorehead
Lisa and Michael Barr
Lisa Barr, Debbie Colaccino, and Pam Henes
Ninah Lynne, Ed Pantzer, and Frieda Furman
Sandra McConnell and Bob Chaloner
Peter Vaughn and Jim Millstein
Shelly and Ralph Styer
Alexis Thomas, Lloyd Brown, Patrick O'Connell, and Stephanie Palmer
Jay Baker, Mark Feuerstein, and Patty Baker
Robert Frost, Navah Perlman, Jeffrey Siegel, Laura Siegel, Tricia Pantzer, and Jason Pantzer
Anna, Carol, and Nina Abrams
Ed Pantzer and Michael Lynne
Jason and Jordan Pantzer
Kris Masel, Courtney Crivits, Juliet and Dan Hahn, Nick Botta, and Tracy Annacone
Jean Shafiroff and Lloyd W. Brown II
Valentine Hernandez and Yaz Hernandez
Ira Millstein and Susan Frame
Save The Date
Jeffrey Siegel playing for guests
Charlene Nederlander, Somers Farkas, Jonathan Farkas, and Margo Nederlander
Danielle Matton, Dianna O'Doherty, and Craig Andrus
Joseph and Maria Smith
Jay Moorehead and Virginia Loving
Ruth Henderson and Linda Allard
Mayor Mark Epley and Jean Shafiroff
Mark Feuerstein, and Ileen and Henry Gayer
Ellen Scarborough and Chuck Scarborough
Spencer Morgan and Alexis Bryan Morgan
Julian Lethbridge, Claire Gilman, and Conley Rollins
Tricia Pantzer, Pam Pantzer, and Joan Cohen
Andrew Barnes and Sherwin Gold
Mary and Michael Levine
Rebecca and John Bond
Maria Orengo, Abenaa Abboa Offei, and Mary Van Pelt
Jackie Sussi, Ken Sussi, Alex Schwartz, Patty Holmstrom, and Kerner Smith
Jason Pantzer, Dan Leibowitz, Jon Henes, and Michael Barr
Mercedes Mestre and Anne Sutherland Fuchs

Luis Peyrelongue-Guerra, Celia Fox, and Vanessa Peyrelongue-Guerra
Veronica Webb and Chris Del Gatto
Feli Thorne and Oakleigh Thorne, Jr.
Punch
Richard and Rene Steinberg
Donna and Dick Verilli with John and Lin Burgess
Kate Rogers and Herb Roberts
Carina Erickson
Bil Mills, Rachel Mills, Aubrienne Krysiewicz-Bell, Alex Content, Tom Bell, and Dr. Susan Krysiewicz
Clancy Himself and Bonnie Stedt
Karen Klopp
Marion de Vogel
Nancy Atlas
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Comley
Michael and Seren Sheo
Feli Thorne and Richard Lambertson
Devoucoux
Carolyn McCarthy, Kerry Resnick, Lauren Viczak,Hannah Mohrman, and JJ Krane
Countess Luann de Lesseps
Ruthie Lyman
Gladys Bucove
Rocky and Pat Stensrud
Hilary and John Block
Brad Mitchell and Fernanda Gilligan
Diana Lenz and Maryann Hegel
Dessert from Slammin' Salmon
Alexandra Kasmin and Karen Klopp
Bernadette Murray and Darren Henault
Leah Lane
Dr.Howard Sobel, Dottie Herman, and Neal Sroka
Jeffrey Rackover
Maggie Norris
David, Sadie, and Samantha Yanks
Jackie Swerz
Piers Lloyd Owen
Paige Oken and Christine Gaffney
Peter Brandt and Nacho Figueras
Francesca Beale
Philip Thomas
Penelope Hall and Molly Schaefer
Fernanda Kellogg
Peyman Umay
Fernanda Gilligan
Abigail Kazam and Carolina Kim
Beth Ostrosky Stern
Lydia Siska
Kelly Bensimon
Fernanda Kellogg and Wendy Svarre with New York Irish Dance Company
Diana Niles King
Retiring the horses
Linda Buckley
Craig Callen and Dick Verilli
Derek Warburton
Cari Swanson and Rex Peterson
Lauren Rae Levy
More Horsepower, courtesy of Ferrari
Barrie Taylor
Perrin Martin and Paul DiMarco
Sue Devitt and Aliina Cho
Nacho Figueras
Chris Brown, Finn Brown, and Liliana Cavendish
John Truex, Fernanda Kellogg, and Combalache, ridden by Paige Garson
"Combalache" and Paige Garson
Alex Washer
Peter Kross, Richard Lambertson, and Bill Hamilton
Hadley Nagel
Elizabeth Taylor and Matthew Tulley
Jason Binn, Neil Hirsch, Veronica Webb, Chris Del Gatto, Valerie Salembier, and Guest
Josh Guberman, Morgan Shara, Emilia Grabowska, Alisha Golodner, and Mike Wudyka
Bob Thomas and Merlin
Diana Niles King fits a hat for Sang Milea
Josette Content, Aubrienne Krysiewicz-Bell, and Alex Content
John Klopp, Angel Parlange, Bob Hottensen, and Pam and Eames Yates
Joan McLaughlin, Kirk Henckels, Jay McLaughlin, and Gloria Callen
Natalie and Stratis Morgan
Richie Notar and Beth Ostrosky Stern
Tom Bell, Susan Krysiewicz, Tracy Young, and Rachel and Bill Mills
Photographs by  Mary Hilliard (Fitch's Corner); Rob Rich (Bridgehampton Polo).
Prince Rudolph Melikoff and Milan Qu
Mario Rinaldo of Champagne Paul Goerg, Wendy Svarre, Feli Thorne, and Fernanda Kellogg
Shamin Abas
Shopping at Fitch's Market ...
Alicia Adams, Antonio Biagi, and Debbie Montgomery
Feli Thorne
Colleen and DeForest Howland
Sabrina Gordon, Isolda Kessel, Lucia Hwong Gordon, and Sophia Gordon
Fernanda Kellogg, Barbara and Donald Tober, Tony Cutugno, and Wendy Svarre
Reed, Denise, and Larry Shapiro
Campion and Tatiana Platt
Andrew Saffier and Daniel Benedict
Ken Moore (Piaget) and Nacho Figueras
Eames Yates
Nancy Hathaway
Weekend finale at Fitch's Corner.
Sylvester and Gillian Miniter, Sharon Bush, and Michael Elder
Alicia Adams and Andrew Gundlach
Chris and Cat Kennan, Kevin McClatchy, and Jack Basilone
New York Irish Dance Company
Jenn, Paige and Erik Oken, with Christine Gaffney
Gabby Karan
Pam Bontecou, Len Lomangino, and Diana Bontecou

Judy Evnin, Chairman Emerita honored Michael Barrett for his decade long leadership to Caramoor
Chairman of the Frick’s Board of Trustees Margot Bogert with Associate Director of Development Maureen Nash
The 70th Street Garden
Will Crutchfield, Caramoor's Director of Opera, with Anne Lichtblau
Paul Arnhold, Lindsay Gordon, and Wes Gordon in the new Portico Gallery
Kevin McDonald, Bill Ulfelder, Marissa McNaoughton, Chris Chapp, and Adam Starke
Ori and Rebecca Bukai
Sarah McNear, Frick Director Ian Wardropper, and Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Frick Board member Franklin W. Hobbs, Lauren Miller, and Nicholas B. Hobbs
Max Sinsteden, Maureen Howe, Caroline Smee, and Justin Kush
Forested sprites completed the Midsummer Night's Dream theme
Syvlia Smolensky, Zita Rosenthal, Bebe Neuwirth, Barbara Spector, Bim Cohen, and Jeanette Cohen
Lydia Tower, Maureen Nash, and Eliza Scott
Missie Taylor and Zac Taylor
Kristina Kovakyuk, Christine Eberli, Julia Flynn, and Juliet Falchi
Gretchen Smith
John Habich, Tom Gold, and Anne Bass
Ema Ricardi, Isabelle Ricardi, Jessica Kempner, and Charlotte Van Dercook
William FitzGerald, Isabelle Forbes, and Weston Quasha
Catherine Cahill, the Frick’s Deputy Director and Peter Jay Sharp Chief Curator Colin B. Bailey, and Hope Annan
Anthony Perricone, Toby Greenberg, Ayesha Bulchandani-Mathrani, and Bonita Bulchandani
Chris Chapp, Kim Raver, and Marissa Mcnaughton
Fashion writer Patrick Michael Hughes in Lilly Pulizer pants
Monika Plociennicziak, Tommy Gilbert, and Alicia Gorman
Jim Attwood, Chairman, with Caramoor trustee Nancy Offit and Morris Offit
Whimsical décor provided by Ned Kelly and Company
Allison Ecung (in Betsey Johnson), Michael Pecnik, and Kim Le
Russell Matthews, Marilyn Albanese, and Russell Albanese
Ben Rodriguez
Sloan Overstrom, Casey Sills, and Alyson Gerken
Tana Chung and Louise Chen
Chrissy Rutherford and Matthew D’Elia
Cator Sparks and Meghan McGinnis
Sonal Aggarwal and Sunil Aggarwal
Nina and Michael Stanton, and Jill Brooke
Mark F. Gilbertson, Christina Coleman, and Kevin Richards
Jim Attwood welcomed the guests and spoke of supporting Caramoor's Arts-in-Education programs, which features Jen Pena and her Eurasain Eagle owl named Boo
Photographs by Christine A. Butler (Frick); R.Cole for Rob Rich (Nature Conservancy).
Frederick Iseman, Alan Wintermute, and Olivier Berggruen
Nina Wainwright, Charlene Chuang, Callie Belser, and Katharine Brooks
Scott Asher, Sara Maslin Nir, Lucy J. Lang, Charlotte Vignon, and Cator Sparks
Jeff Volling, a guest, and Lisa Volling
Chris Hubert, Martha Stewart, Jim Attwood, and Nita and Steven Lowey
Callie Belser and Katharine Brooks
Christine Groome and Dr. Donald Quest
Garden Party Chairmen Emily T. Frick, Deborah Royce, Lisa Volling, Alexandra Porter, Jennifer Wright, Wesley Royce, and Ayesha Bulchandani-Mathrani
Leslie and Emily Keno and Emmanuel and Simon Shaw
Dr. Colin Bailey, Alan Wintermute, Dr. Judy Sund, and Fred Hammerman
Andrew Fulton and Casey Hurley
Collins Ward and Joann Payson
Anka Palitz admiring Boo, the Eurasian Eagle owl, handled by Jen Pena
Bob and Kate Hanna, Ayesha Bulchandani-Mathrani, and Lynn and Paul Ingrassia
Boo, 14 year-old Eurasian Eagle owl was the highlight of the event
Co-Chairman Lisa Volling, Charles Jacoby, and Young Fellows Steering Committee member Maggy Frances Schultz
Frick Trustee Charles Royce and Garden Party Co-Chairman Deborah Royce
Gala tent set among Caramoor's gardens
Holly Maloney and Taylor White
Jared Angle, Devin Alberda, Abi Stafford, Gretchen Smith, Likolani Brown, and Amanda Hankes
Natalie Filman-Lepaitre and Jessica Balboni
Jason Girard, Alexis Versandi, Devon Safran, Brie Blythwood, and Gavin Apter
Juliet Falchi and Christine Eberli
Devin Alberda, Likolani Brown, Jared Angle, Abi Stafford, Amanda Hankes, Russell Janzen, Gretchen Smith, and Tom Gold
Abi Stafford and Jared Angle
Ariella Patrick and Eric Taylor
Caramoor trustees Sue Groner and Richard O'Leary
Crystal Mccrary and Ray McGuire
Gala guests danced the night away to Vince Giordiano's Nighthawks
Dr. Kenneth Cohen, Chris Conway, Molly Hoyt, and Robert Aranowitz
400 guests celebrated the opening of Caramoor's 67th season and helped raise over $450,000
Jen Pena, Caramoor's master falconer, with Boo, Eurasian Eagle Owl, and Linda Abbey of Great Performances
Sloan Overstrom and Elisabeth Saint-Amand
Andrea Vizcarrondo, Paul Vizcarrondo, and Karen Hughes
Chris Marcellin and Jesse Kester
Justin Dent and Willow Lindley
Annika Connor
Sandeep Mathrani and the Frick’s Deputy Director and Peter Jay Sharp Chief Curator Colin B. Bailey
Guests enjoy the 70th Street Garden at The Frick Collection's annual Garden Party.
Guests aware of the presence of NYT photographer Bill Cunningham in the 70th Street Garden
Garden Party Co-Chairs Alexandra Porter, Wesley Royce, and Tess Porter
Jaime Jimenez, Michelle Tashjian, Thomas Pierce
Sadie Stein and Stephen-Andrew Hiltner
Linnea Wilson and Ryan Hayworth
The Fifth Avenue Garden
George Wayne and Nicola Vassell
Jim McNabb and Laura Pels
Garden Party Co-Chairman Wesley Royce, Manon Roux, Anne Bolitho and Elizabeth Bolitho
Christina Santelli and Jonathan Santelli
Nancy Kelley and Chris Kelley
Bill Ulfelder, Kim Raver, and Nancy Kelley
Maria Veronica Leon and Lucia Vallarino
Frederico Azevedo, Gail Freeman, and Jonathan Wells
Haley Binn, Jason Binn, Jimmy Cohen, and Lisa Cohen
Alyssa Micciulla and Frederica Tompkins
Jordan Wilcox, JP Cole, and Rob Fonseca
Parrish Art Museum Midsummer Party in Southampton, NY
Kristin Buttner and Jessica Mitchell
Jonathan Wells and Sharon Giese
Laura Laumont, Collins Ward, Louisa Rechter, Brad Vanderstarren, Rachel Pollard, Julien Baccash, and Joanie Payson
Allison Morrow, David Granville-Smith, and Elizabeth Granville-Smith
Jackie McKay and Tripoli Patterson
Andrea and Marc Glimcher
Kyle DeWoody and Harry Dubin
Conrad Clevlen
Joseph Fichera and Patricia Duff
Geoffrey Bradfield and Debbie Bancroft
Avis and Bruce Richards
Terrie Sultan and Dan Rizzie
Anne Huntington, Chloe Richards, and Josy Hamren
Olivia Chantecaille and Ren Grady
Michael De Anda, Rachelle, Raphael diTommaso, and Nicole Libsschik
Alice Aycock and James Salomon
Gillian and Sylvester Miniter
Daniel Gosselin and George Pontos
John McLaughlin and Sarah Hanson
Polina Proshkina, Katia Stotsky, and Lana Smith
Yung Hee Kim and Patrick McMullan
Larry Perse, Carrie Perse, Jill Tauber, and Larry Tauber
Halsey Stebbins and Owen Hoffman
Elizabeth Haveles, Peter Haveles, Gale Drukier, Ira Drukier, and Dorothy Lichtenstein
Alicia Longwell, Barbara Grodd, and Dorothea Rockburne
Ira Drukier, Gale Drukier, David Wassong, Christine Pressman, and Gene Pressman
Carlton and Beth Rudin DeWoody
Alixe Laughlin and Betsy Maloney
Terrie and Donald Sultan
Lewis Koppelman and Etta Froio
Clay Tompkins, Karen Tompkins, Carey Fieldcamp, Gloria Fieldcamp, Ladd Willis, and Cindy Willis
Frances Hayward, Patricia Birch, and Immi Storrs
Ryan Ross and Heather Ross
Click here for NYSD Contents
Linda Shelton, Abby Terkuhle, Eva Faye, and Thomas Van Winkel
Debbie Bancroft and Geoffrey Bradfield
Leslie Brille and Mary Kathryn Navab
Margo MacNabb Nederlander, James Nederlander, Jimmy Nederlander, Charlene Nederlander, Frances Hayward, and Grethe Holby
Fiona and Eric Rudin
Christine Pressman, Gene Pressman, Alina Cho, and Emily Smith
Jackie McKay and Jeff Burch
Robin Cofer, Sara Herbert-Galloway, and Joy Marks
Michael Levy and Jessica Hodin
Bonnie Clearwater and Haley Binn
Ellen Lewis, Donald Sultan, Dorothy Lichtenstein, and Ralph Gibson
Julie Zeff and Renee Ryan
Alexis and Priscilla Zoullas
Chris Arnold and Ted Kruckel
Muriel Siebert and Mildrid Brinn
Suzanna Lee and Manish Vora
Brittany Weeden and Jared Abrams
Marco Paparella, Karen Mastrandrea, Lynn Levy, Nazee Moinian, and Joseph Moinian
Gabriel Gibbs
Vaughn and Michael Dorrian
Jean and Martin Shafiroff
Lorena Bedoya, Jill Tauber, and Amanda Nortman
Gregory D'Elia and Angela Hearst
Jacques D'Amboise and Barbara Goldsmith
Polina Proshkina and Yan Assoun
Meg Blackburn and Jenny Isakowitz
Lisa and Samantha Perry
Scarlett Hinson and James Bell
Rachel Carter and Travis Meyer
Chuck Close, Terrie Sultan, Patricia Birch, Barbara Goldsmith, Paul Taylor, Taylor Barton-Smith, Tony Ingrao, and Randy Kemper
Jonathan Sobel, Marcia Sobel, Sara Fitzmaurice, Molly Fitzmaurice, and Allison Morrow
Jody Donohue and Scott Chiles
Dr. Heidi Waldorf, Sharon Giese, Dr. Erin Gilbert, and Kimberly Giese
Almond Zigmund and Jason Weiner
Grethe Holby and Malcolm Morley
Lauren Schwartz, Heather Ross, and Ryan Ross
Cameron Shay, Elizabeth Fekkai, and Alexis Manice
Maureen Bash, Elisa Scott, and Colette Arredondo
Andrea Glimcher and Bosco Sodi
Serena Tufo, Lizzie Reifenheiser, and Casey Cook
Bonnie Clearwater, Keith Pollock, and Nina Zagat
Whitney Fairchild and Alexandra Stanton
Ian Shapolsky, Ysatel Tinyol, Baroness Sheri De Borchgrave, and David Braunstein
Amanda and Glenn Fuhrman
Noreen Ahmad, Amir Ahmad, and Anne Huntington
April Gornik and Eric Fischl
Lydia Carlston
Liliana Cavendish, Di Mondo, Carolina Portago, and Ingrid Drotman
Liza Rand, Stewart Lane, and Bonnie Comley
Mark and Elizabeth Meyer
Jessica Maher, Lisa Wassong, Priscilla Zoullas, Stephanie von Watzdorf, and Molly Aston
Stephanie Madison and Valentina Monte
Xenia Platt, Campion Platt, Tatiana Platt, and Fox Platt
Donna and Richard Soloway
Meg Blackburn and Mark Segal
Gracie Berkowitz and Ed Moses
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
R. Couri Hay and Sharon Bush
Michael and Alessandra Bush
Greta Tufvesson, Christina McDonald, and Veronica Arzeno
Tim Schifter and Helen Lee Schifter
Christophe de Menil
Michelle Travis and Lucas Rossignol
Michael Combs and Lida Morley
Betty Birnbaum and Suzie Blitz
Jan and Randy Slifka
Charlotte Schryber and Ben Schryber
Kelli Shaughnessy, Domna Stanton, and Jim Stanton
Alex Douzet
Emma Becker, Alison Price Becker, William Becker, Patricia Birch, Peter Becker, and Kristin Becker
Calum Gair-Stevenson, Adriana Farietta, Todd Hutcheson, Stacy Engman, Richard Chang, and Maria Baibakova
Brad Comisar and Kelli Delaney
Emily Smith, Alina Cho, Robert Zimmerman, Frances Hayward, Sharon Bush, and Katlean de Monchy
John Christensen, Carolina Portago, and George Moringer
Patty Raynes

Photographs by  PatrickMcMullan.com
Montego Glover
Judy Kaye
Francoise Gilot
Marcia Mishaan
Megan Hilty
Nancy and Henry Kissinger
Ultra Violet
Nina Arianda
Hal Witt, Anne Bass, and Helene Alexopoulou
Anna Calloway, Susan Calloway, and Kerin Backhaus
Gillian and Sylvester Miniter
Linda Lavin
David and Julia Koch
Ed Moses, Andy Moses, and Kelly Berg
Norm Lewis
Karolina Blaberg, Robert Wilson, and Marina de Brantes
Andrea Ackerman and Judith Giuliani
Dick Latessa
Cheech Marin in front of a Margaret Garcia
Mary Tyler Moore and Bernadette Peters
Joel Grey
A President’s Committee Reception in anticipation of the Southampton Hospital’s 54th annual Summer Party.
Bill Berloni
John Dossett
Sonja Caproni and Judith Powers
Rachel Moore and Adrienne Arsht
The Craze
Richard Meier and Liz Derringer
Kara Lindsay
Rita Moreno
Nancy Opel
Carole and Fred Guest
Nate Dog and Mr Pink
The Cast of "One Man, Two Guvnors"
Olivia Flatto and Brigitte Lefevre
Mary Kathryn Navab and Nancy Hebert
Bebe Neuwirth
Kristen Krusen, Jean Shafiroff, President Bob Chaloner, Nancy Stone, and Melanie Wambold
Jim Freeman, Laura Lofaro Freeman, Lisa Arnold, Michelle Lindsay, Mrs Evenson, and Gregory D'Elia
Audra McDonald
Charlene Nederlander, and Margo MacNabb Nederlander
Michael Cumpsty
Lisa Rinehart and Mikhail Baryshnikov
Angel and Ming Sheng
Geoffrey Bradfield
Albert Podell
Catherine Farley and Jerry Speyer
Robert Norton
Ira and Inga Rennert with Reynold Levy
Melanie Wambold, Dr. Morrell Avram, Maria Avram, and Gregory D'Elia
Jeremy Jordan
Bryce Pinkham
Kathy Brown and Arlene Shuler
Michele Pesner and Marina Couloucoundis
Dayssi Olarte de Kanavos and Olivia Flatto
Celia Keenan-Bolger and Adam Chanler-Berat
Tamar Podell and Hal Witt
Julie Halston
Lloyd and Barbara Macklowe
Gigi Fisdale and Myra Weiser
Caissie Levy
Syndee Winters
Sterling McAndrew, Michael Dianda, and Francis Nestor
Cindy Willis, Jon Cohen, and Allison Morrow
Jean Shafiroff and Patricia Shiah
Steve Kazee
Hildegarde Jones, Marion Piro, Dr. Philip Piro, and Merritt Piro
The Bridgehampton Community House
Sahra Lese
Helena Barquet, Anna Van Munching, Brian Kasbar, and Caitlin Turner
Tom Edden
Claudine and Jean-Francois Theodore
Chloe Malle
Gloria Muller, Anne Miller, and Marianne Strong
Benjamin Pech
Freddy Hill and Virginia Dadey
Ben Vereen
Julie Weiss and Sharon Jacob
Marie-AgnËs Gillot
Nancy Weber and Russell Steele
Randy Kemper, Julia Koch, David Koch, Olivia Flatto, Tony Ingrao, and Adam Flatto
Christophe Tardieu and Renaud Dutreil
Alison Smeed and Julie Walker
Michael Cerveris
Mika Sterling and Justin Concannon

Jane Ponterelli
Julib Zeff and Linda Benlevy
Yvon Ross, Ysabel Pinyol, and Baroness Sheri De Borchgrave
Mark Septembre and Anna Feo
Laura O'Reilly, Ryan Ross, and Pamela Willoughby
Hilary Rhoda and Nicole Trunfio
Holly Bernesser and Cary Neer
Tessa Von Richthofen, Richard Johnson, Samantha Yanks, and David Yanks
Lisa McNee, Karen McCarthy, and Karen Scacchi
Kenny Maszkit, Christl Maszkit, and Mark Epley
Chris Wragge, Kelli Delaney, and Dr. Mark Kot
Joy Marks and Leif Bringslimark
Fiona Bradley and Melissa Biggs Bradley
Gary Andreassen
Zoe and David Ganek
Alicia Bythewood, Dan Bythewood, Pamela Cohen, Nick Korniloff, Ann Liguori, Scott Vallary, and Brie Bythewood
Kim and Paula White
Celine Kaplan, Amy Socazio, and Mark Addison
Dolores and Frank Berrafato
Baroness Sheri De Borchgrave and Yvon Ross
Diana DiMenna and Tiffany Moller
Lucia Hwong Gordon, Karola Jain, Vittorio Assaf, Erica Karsch, and Elise Evans
Photographs by  PatrickMcMullan.com; Tom Fitzgerald & Pam Deutchman (Art Southampton).
Susan Butler and Courtney Parmenter
Carol Kogan and Alex Kogan
Berry Brown and Dawne Marie Grannum
Kyle McEneaney, Charlotte Ronson, Nico Mizrahi, and Jamie Schneider
Ann Liguori and Scott Vallary
Glen Arbeitman, Shari Farber, Jodi Eisenberg, Julia Mazrodian, and David Descoteaux
Margaret Watson, Peggy Mahoney, and Mary Ann Fitzgibbons
John Wegorzewski and Edward Callaghan
Matthew Satz and Francesca Channing
Valentina Assaf, Elise Evans, and Erica Karsch
Jim Freeman, Laura Lofaro Freeman, and Andrew Freeman
Dini von Mueffling and Peter Davis
Julian Navab, Alex Navab, Arabella Navab, Neva Avab, and Mary Kathryn Navab
Laura Henson, Ted Sand, and Dini von Mueffling
Annette and Grace Cacucciolo
Berry Brown and Kevin Berlin
Tucker Johnston, Doug Feagin, Zach Peel, Frederick Masri, and James Hailey
Gail Schoentag and Amanda Dickerson
Kay Gilman, Carol Nelson, Tarudl Geraghty, and Mildrid Brinn
Tarudl Geraghty, Kenny Maszkit, Hildegarde Soame, and Beate Sorenson
Rob Schaffer and Dana Jones
Paulina Keszler, Michaela Keszler, Lulu Keszler, and Brendan Manley
Charlie Krusen, Lion Krusen, Blakesle Krusen, and Kristin Krusen
Katie Reed, Ashley Forer, Teddy Reed, and Stephanie Monsalve
Denise Incandela and Mike Cassidy
Ryan Hennessy and Annika Smith
Brie, Dan, and Alicia Bythewood
Erin Cullison and Scott Lipps
Katy McCormick and Elisabeth Ponce
David Lipke and Kristian Laliberte
Silence by Mel Bochner
Alison Cronin and Sal Strazzullo
Lisa Yom and David Lipke
Anna Aranan, Graham Black, and Hannah Ricker
Peri Bogert, Cyrena Fink, and Larry Bogert
Ian and Annabelle Snow
Carole and Fred Guest
Muriel Siebert
Cliff and Raya Knight
Kristi and Emily Avram
Dana Auslander, Jessica Lichcenscern, and Nancy Rabinowitz
Celia Knight, Celia Czelatka, Anthony Nieto, Alan Czelatka, and Matthew Czelatka
Jeff Muhs, Beth McNeill Muhs, Nick Korniloff, and Pamela Cohen
Alexia and Alexandra Ryan
Martin Shafiroff, Jean Shafiroff, and Mark Epley
Alexandra Fairweather and Nick Korniloff
Wendy Harris, Bronwen Baumgardner, and Jenn Press
Amy Palmer, Stephanie Hirsch, Dana Auslander, and Laura Henson
Dan Del Rio and Maria Del Rio
Ron Myers and Erika Faust
Polina Proshkina
Jackie Hochberg, Jackson Hochberg, and Robin Avram
Declan Hessler, Stephanie Hessler, Maclean Hessler, Dashell Hessler, and Steve Hessler
Dara Sowell, Jean Shafiroff, and Lucia Hwong Gordon
Nick Barham, Laura Nicklas, Kathleen Ryan, Brent Nicklas, Karen Carwin, Valentina Assaf, Lisa Evans, and Erica Karsch
Christopher Cuomo, Mario Cuomo, Cristina Greeven Cuomo, and Bella Cuomo
Erika Seff, Lori Levine, Mimi Brown, and Heather Feit
Ian Shapolsky and Chris Norwood
Jared Fine, Amelia Nelson, Todd Gallagher, and Shany Ellenberg
Melanie Wambold, Mark Epley, Mildrid Brinn, and Marianne Epley
Morgan Hertzan, Beth Hertzan, Maron, Sadie, Samantha Yanks, and David Yanks
Ley Yoo
Oat Ajimasook and Jamie Sharpe
Peggie and Tia Walker
Anne Mahoney, Peggy Hill, Peggy Mahoney, and Aidan Minick
Cognac Wellerlane
Avis Richards, Stephanie Hirsch, and Kelli Delaney
Mandie Erickson and Haya Maraka
Leigh Rosen and Jamie Schneider
Elyse Taylor, Eric Taylor, and Arielle Patrick
Amy Goodfriend, Kelley Johnston, Doug Feagin, and Alison Feagin
Caroline Fare and Eric Villency
Shelia O'Malley-Fuchs, Gregory D'Elia, and Christl Maszkit
Rebecca Minkoff
Voula Nikolopoulos, Rimma Doudinskaia, and Dr. Michael Clarjen
David Yanks, Sadie Yanks, and Samantha Yanks
Jean Shafiroff and Pamela Cohen
Jeanine Edington and John Wegorzewski
Heather and Ryan Ross
Susan Madonia, Ian Burliuk, Grace Burliuk, and Daphne Hoge
Cindy Farkas, Ron Burkhardt, James Brickley, and Vessela Brickley
DJ KISS
Katherine and Gary Andreassen
Dini von Mueffling and Tati von Mueffling
Andrew Saffir and Daniel Benedict
Jeff Slonim, Dianne Vavra, and Michael Combs
Ros and Fran L'Esperance
Dashell Hessler, Declan Hessler, and Maclean Hessler
Amazing by Mel Bochner
Katy McCormick, Elizabeth Ponce, Irene Ponce, Mario Ponce, and Danielle Ganek
Kevin Berlin and Sara Herbert Galloway
Patrick McMullan and Ken Wolfe
Sydney Sadick, Joann Jedell, and Amy Kamin
Pam Michaelcheck, Bill Michaelcheck, and Lucy Lamphere
Ron Burkhardt and Cindy Farkas Glanzrock
Vanessa Noel Toube
Ben Pike, Eric Denataly, Wendy Hoffman, and Scott Celander
Ryan Ross, Heather Ross, Nick Korniloff, and Pamela Cohen
Grace Feagin, Chloe Fink, Gwenston Rossiter, and Caroline Johnston
John Freeman, Cole Bessent Freeman, and Scott Bessent
Robert Hochberg, Harrison Hochberg, Jackie Hochberg, Jackson Hochberg, and Alexander Hochberg
Arielle Royston and Sarah Saeli
Sheri Dobbin and Mark Fasanella
Barbara and Cece Glatt
Tom Kent and Elizabeth, Kate, and Peter Haveles
Owen Klinsky, Elizabeth Dennis, and Maureen Klinsky
Shany Ellenberg and Amelia Nelson
Jennifer Avrams and Hallie Lorch
